TEXT FLY IN THE 
BOOK 



< 

00 



64438 



OSMANIA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY 

Call No. / ' tt- Accession No. 

Author 




This book should be retMrne<J on or before the date last marked below, 



THE PHILOSOPHY 
OF THE PRESENT 



PUBLISHED ON THE FOUNDATION 
ESTABLISHED IN MEMORY OF 

PAUL CARUS 

EDITOR OF THE OPEN COURT AND THE MONIST 
1888-1919 




GEORGE HERBERT MEAD 



THE PHILOSOPHY 
OF THE PRESENT 



BY 

GEORGE HERBERT MEAD 

EDITED BY 

ARTHUR E. MURPHY 

Professor of Philosophy in Brown University 
WITH PREFATORY REMARKS BY 

JOHN DEWEY 

Lectures upon the Paul Cams Foundation 
THIRD SERIES 



THE OPEN COURT COMPANY, 

PUBLISHERS, 

86, STRAND, LONDON, W.C.2. 



Copyright 1932 by 
OPEN COURT PUBLISHING 



PRINTED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 
FOR THE PUBLISHERS BY R. R. DONNELLEY 
A SONS CO., CRAWFORDSVILLE, INDIANA 



PREFACE 

This volume contains the material from which Mr. Mead's 
Philosophy of the Present was to have been developed. No 
part of it, except the last two Supplementary Essays, was 
intended for publication in the form in which it now appears. 
Chapters One to Four are the Carus Lectures as read at 
the Meeting of the American Philosophical Association at 
Berkeley in December, 1930. They had not been planned 
as more than a partial statement of a more extensive project. 
Unfortunately, Mr. Mead, in his capacity as chairman of 
the department of philosophy at the University of Chicago, 
Was forced to surrender the time he had set aside for the 
completion of the lectures to administrative concerns of an 
unexpected and disturbing character. As a consequence the 
lectures were written hurriedly, in large part on the journey 
from Chicago to Berkeley; and he had no opportunity in 
the weeks immediately following their delivery to begin the 
revisions he already had in mind. By the end of January 
he was seriously ill and he died within a few weeks. As 
here printed, the lectures are in substance precisely as they 
were presented at Berkeley; but the whole has undergone 
verbal revision, and the second lecture has been divided to 
form Chapters Two and Three. All footnotes are additions 
to the original manuscript. 

After Mr. Mead's death there were found among his 
papers two additional manuscripts which are obviously pre- 
liminary drafts of the Carus Lectures. In large part these 
cover the same ground as the lectures themselves, but each 
also contains additional material of importance. The first 
three of the Supplementary Essays have been selected from 
these manuscripts. In the second, two parallel versions of 

vii 



viii PREFACE 

the analysis have been retained. The difficulty of the ex- 
position seemed to indicate the desirability of such repetition. 
The titles for these essays have been supplied by the editor. 
The fourth Essay is reprinted from the Proceedings of the 
Sixth International Congress of Philosophy, and the fifth 
from the International Journal of Ethics, April 1925. Each 
presents an essential aspect of Mr. Mead's theory not ade- 
quately dealt with in the lectures themselves. 

Those who have known Mr. Mead through his teaching 
will feel keenly the incompleteness of this presentation of 
his philosophy. He himself was reconstructing his theory 
in the light of "emergent" material just as long as he was 
able to do so. At the time of my last conversation with him, 
in the week before his death, he was at work on Bergson's 
Duree et Simultaneity in its relation to his own account of 
relativity in Chapter Three. The importance of the material 
as it stands, however, both in the account it offers of the 
development of social experience and of scientific hypotheses, 
and in its suggestion of the more comprehensive theory 
toward which he was working seems fully to justify its pub- 
lication in the only form in which it can now be made avail- 
able. 

I am greatly indebted to my colleague Professor Blake 
and to Miss Natalie Washburn for their generous help in 
the preparation of the manuscript for publication. The 
index is the work of Mr. F. K. Ballaine. 

ARTHUR E. MURPHY. 
Providence, R. I. 
April, 1932. 



CONTENTS 

PAGE 

INTRODUCTION xi 

PREFATORY REMARKS xxxvi 

CHAPTER 

I THE PRESENT AS THE Locus OF REALITY 1 

II EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 32 

III THE SOCIAL NATURE OF THE PRESENT 47 

IV THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 68 

SUPPLEMENTARY ESSAYS 

I EMPIRICAL REALISM 93 

II THE PHYSICAL THING 119 

III SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS AND EXPERIENCE 140 

IV THE OBJECTIVE REALITY OF PERSPECTIVES. ..... 161 

V THE GENESIS OF THE SELF AND SOCIAL CONTROL. 176 

INDEX 197 



INTRODUCTION 

The title Mr. Mead selected for these lectures "The 
Philosophy of the Present" contains an instructive am- 
biguity. The term "present" does not here refer directly 
to the contemporary situation in philosophy, but rather to 
the status of any object when it occurs and while it is occur- 
ring. If anything that exists is in some genuine sense tem- 
poral, as so many philosophers seem now to agree, then its 
foothold in reality is to be found in that present within 
which it not merely was or will be but effectively is, in the 
full and categorical sense. In a temporalist philosophy the 
tenses of the verb "to be" must be taken seriously, and 
Mr. Mead's theory is, above all things else, a philosophy 
of nature in the present tense. It seeks to understand the 
world as centered in a present, and to locate past and future, 
meanings and possibilities, in their function with respect 
to it. To see the past as past, for example, is to see it when 
it is past, in relation to the present whose past it is. What 
it, or anything else that claims existence, may be inde- 
pendent of its temporal reference, it is not empirically pos- 
sible, and if Mr. Mead is right, it is not necessary, to inquire. 

Yet the philosophy of being present is also, in a perfectly 
real sense, the philosophy of our contemporaries. "Proc- 
ess," "development" and "emergence" are catchwords of 
recent thought, and while the current is perhaps less strong 
to-day than it was ten or even five years ago it still represents 
a dominant theme among us. Mr. Mead's account will 
hardly take its place among the most popular manifesta- 
tions of the "time spirit," but it does provide an unusually 
searching and independent analysis of its basic tendencies. 
Here is a temporalist philosophy that accepts its intellectual 



xii INTRODUCTION 

responsibilities. Those who "take time seriously" will find 
in it a thoroughly serious and consistently temporal stand- 
point from which to determine what "the philosophy of 
the present" in the present philosophical situation can con- 
tribute to a constructive and consistent theory of reality. 



There are in this theory three related tendencies, each 
of which has its distinctive part in the total view. The 
setting of the problem and many of its characteristic develop- 
ments are determined by a pragmatic theory of knowledge 
which Mr. Mead defended in his earlier works and which 
here, after brief restatement (pages 4-5), is accepted as 
a basis for what follows. Its influence is apparent (1) in 
the statement of the philosophic alternatives between which 
a choice must be made and (2) in the place given to "ex- 
perience" as the ultimate referent of all knowledge claims. 

(1) There are, for Mr. Mead, a whole set of traditional 
theories, all grounded in a false epistemology, which so in- 
terpret the objects to which knowledge refers as to place them 
"outside experience," not merely in the trivial sense that 
they are held to be other than the "immediate data of con- 
sciousness," but in the "metaphysical" sense of excluding 
from their permanent and self-contained reality the essen- 
tial features of that world of common experience within 
which experiment and verification occur. When such ob- 
jects are made the unique objectives of knowledge, ex- 
perience, falling short of such reality, becomes "mere 
appearance," and the experimental validation that our ideas 
can in fact receive becomes irrelevant to the transcendent 
validity they are supposed to claim. In opposition to all 
such theories, pragmatists have held that knowledge is con- 
cerned not with any "antecedent" or "ulterior" reality, but 



INTRODUCTION xiii 

rather with the direction of activity in shared experience, 
and with objects in so far as they organize such activity 
around meaningful objectives of cooperative action] The 
reader will find, for example, in Mr. Mead's criticism of 
space-time as a "metaphysical" reality, that he has carried 
this familiar issue into the philosophy of science without 
essential modification of the basic dichotomy. 

(2) Mr. Mead maintains that a view of this second type 
must defend its own ultimacy by holding that experience 
itself, as simply "there," "had" or possessed, has no ulterior 
reference that there is no significant philosophical problem 
about the status of experience as such. And since conscious- 
ness, with its use of ideas and meanings, does involve such 
problematic reference, he further holds that consciousness 
is a development within experience, and not the final or 
inclusive form of our relation to it. This wider experience, 
the world which is "there" and with respect to which the 
problem of an external or transcendent reference does not 
arise, is foundational to Mr. Mead's view, and is assumed 
throughout. 

Pragmatism as a philosophy has tended to encourage the 
activities of its protagonists in two directions. In many 
cases the polemical interest has been paramount, and here 
the sins and "pseudo-problems" of the epistemologist have 
come in for much attention. It seems not unjust to observe 
that while this criticism has played an important part in 
some earlier controversies it remains in itself too exclusively 
occupied with the very problems whose legitimacy it denies 
to offer great promise for the future. But when pragma- 
tists have followed their enthusiasm for experience to the 
fact itself, and have called attention to the detailed struc- 
ture of some objects of knowledge, their contributions have 
been outstanding, Jit was with this constructive pragma- 
tism that Mr. Mead^vas primarily concerned. His approach 



xiv INTRODUCTION 

to special problems of social psychology and of the history 
of scientific ideas was not at all that of a philosopher seek- 
ing ammunition for a special thesis; it was that of the pains- 
taking, first-hand investigator, viewing the subject in its 
concrete detail and allowing it to tell its own story. 

This second tendency in his thought is particularly mani- 
fest in his devotion to "research science" and to the objects 
and methods it presupposes. His insistence, against phe- 
nomenalism and relativism, that the material objects em- 
ployed in physical experiment are neither to be reduced 
to sense-data nor dismissed as mere appearances is so 
emphatic as to call for defense against the suspicion that 
he is "hankering after the fleshpots of materialism." (page 
148) It is not materialism but common sense, together with 
a healthy respect for the detailed process of physical dis- 
covery as opposed to sweeping generalizations, that governs 
his discussion of scientific objects in the third Supplementary 
Essay. And his own work in social psychology has its 
unique value as a contribution to the social sciences quite 
independently of any particular philosophic interpretation 
that may be placed upon it. 

The third and perhaps the dominant strain in these lec- 
tures, however, is derived neither from pragmatism nor 
from research science, but forms part of that philosophy 
of nature which will no doubt be regarded as the character- 
istic contribution of the 1920's in Anglo-American philos- 
ophy. Alexander's Space, Time and Deity was the pioneer 
work in this transition from problems of knowledge of 
"realism," "pragmatism" and "subjectivism" to specula- 
tions about space and time and finally to metaphysics and 
the categories. The development of Whitehead's philosophy, 
from its early preoccupation with "sense data" and logical 
constructions, through the Concept of Nature with its 
"objects" and "events," to the daring speculations of Proc- 



INTRODUCTION xv 

ess and Reality sums up in striking fashion the tendency 
of the period. And the principles of this development are 
natural enough. The various theories of knowledge that 
were phases of the "revolt against dualism" all sought to 
objectify those features of experience which a dualistic 
philosophy had regarded as merely subjective. This meant 
that what had previously been allocated to "mind" must 
now find its place in "nature" and that nature must be re- 
constructed accordingly. And finally, in the extension of 
relativity to the objective world, a criticism was required 
of the notions of "perspective," "time-system," "sociality" 
and the like, in order to show how these notions, purified of 
their merely subjective connotations, could take their place 
in a system of categories as the pervasive characters of 
reality. The Philosophy of the Present is an important 
contribution to this great undertaking, 

To show that "social and psychological process is but an 
instance of what takes place in nature, if nature is an evolu- 
tion" (pages 173-4) is the expressed intent of this later phase 
of Mr. Mead's philosophy. The principles of pragmatism 
are by no means abandoned, but they are generalized to 
include the whole process of evolution, and within this more 
general development distinctively human or conscious phases 
of "sociality" and relativity are to be understood as special 
cases of a process that takes all nature for its province. 

Older problems recur here, but with a difference. The 
superficial reader may find in Chapter One only a revival 
of a too familiar controversy about our knowledge of the 
past. But in fact the theory is grounded not in special 
requirements of knowledge or verification but in what it 
means to be past and on the status of emergence and novelty 
in natural processes. The most original feature of these 
lectures is the daring extension of "the social" into what 
is at least a philosophy of nature, and, if the name did not 



xvi INTRODUCTION 

offend a pragmatist, might also be called a metaphysic. 
The pity is that Mr. Mead did not live to carry through 
the project which Chapters Three and Four serve at best 
to outline. Whether it could have been carried through con- 
sistently within the limits of a pragmatic theory of knowl- 
edge is a further question. My own view is that "sociality," 
like Whitehead's "feeling" is too essentially subjective a 
category for this metaphysic of process with which they were 
both concerned. But Mead, like Whitehead and Alexander, 
ventured as a pioneer into that territory of change and 
relativity which contemporary philosophy must certainly 
explore, and his chart of the country, incomplete as it neces- 
sarily is, may well prove of permanent value to those of 
us who follow, though less adventurously, the routes that 
have been opened for us. 

II 

The subject-matter of the lectures may be divided as fol- 
lows. There is a theory about the nature of time and emer- 
gence, a theory about relativity and its social implications, 
and a synthesis of tl^ese in a theory of emergence as social 
and of sociality as a character of emergent evolution. In 
this section and the two following these topics are considered 
in this order. 

The present is to be taken as the locus of reality. This 
means, I take it, that to consider anything as real is to 
consider it as existing in, or in relation to, a present. Now 
what, in relation to any present, is the status of its past? 
This is not to ask what it was when it was present, for then 
it was not past and did not stand in that relation by virtue of 
which it acquires the status of pastness. The past of an 
event is not just an antecedent present. This is Mr. Mead's 
main thesis throughout, but it does not often get as clearly 



INTRODUCTION xvii 

expressed as in the following statement. "When one recalls 
his boyhood days he cannot get into them as he then was, 
without their relationship to what he has become; and if 
he could, that is, if he could reproduce the experience as 
it then took place, he could not use it, for this would involve 
his not being in the present within which that use must 
take place. A string of presents conceivably existing as 
presents would not constitute a past." (page 30) 

The distinctive character of the past in its relation to the 
present is manifestly that of irrevocability. As conditioning 
the present, as making its occurrence possible, the past must 
have been of a determinate character. It expresses the 
settled condition to which the present must conform and 
without which it could not have been what it is. And this 
means not merely antecedent occurrence, it means causal 
determination or, as Mr. Mead tends to put it, the "carry- 
ing on of relations." The past is that out of which the 
present has arisen and irreversibility the appeal might 
here have been made to Kant has its critical value in terms 
of such conditioning. 

Yet this carrying on of identical relations is never the 
whole story. The doctrine of emergence asks us to believe 
that the present is always in some sense novel, abrupt, some- 
thing which is not completely determined by the past out 
of which it arose. A present, if it is really new at all, will 
have in it an element of temporal and causal discontinuity. 
Recent quantum physics has taught us to believe that such 
indetermination is quite consistent with rigorous physical 
analysis, (page 17) But how is it possible to reconcile this 
novelty with scientific determinism? 

The answer to this question supplies the basic principles 
of the theory. Before the emergent has occurred, and at 
the moment of its occurrence, it does not follow from the 
past. That past relative to which it was novel cannot be 



xviii INTRODUCTION 

made to contain it. But after it has occurred we endeavor 
to reconstruct experience in terms of it, we alter our inter- 
pretation and try to conceive a past from which the recalci- 
trant element does follow and thus to eliminate the discon- 
tinuous aspect of its present status. Its abruptness is then 
removed by a new standpoint, a new set of laws, from which 
the conditions of our new present can be understood. These 
laws could not have been a part of any previous past, for 
in the presents with relation to which those pasts existed 
there was no such emergent element. To assume a single 
determinate past to which every present must wholly con- 
form is to deny emergence altogether. But at the same 
time, to treat the emergent as a permanently alien and ir- 
rational element is to leave it a sheer mystery. It can be 
rationalized after the fact, in a new present, and in the past 
of that present it follows from antecedent conditions, where 
previously it did not follow at all. As the condition of the 
present, the past, then, will vary as the present varies, and 
new pasts will "arise behind us" in the course of evolution 
as each present "marks out and in a sense selects what has 
made its own peculiarity possible." (page 23) 

Is there any contradiction between this novelty of the 
past and its essential irrevocability? None at all, for the 
two apply in different senses. The irrevocable past is the 
past of any given present, that which accounts for its oc- 
currence. Its determining conditions will be ideally if not 
actually fully determinable in the present to which it is rela- 
tive. But when a new present has arisen, with emergent 
facts which were really not contained in the former present, 
its determining conditions, hence its past, will of necessity 
be different. The determinism then holds of the past im- 
plied in any present, the emergence in the relation of one 
such present, with its past, to another. 

This hypothesis, in Mr. Mead's opinion, has two main 



INTRODUCTION xix 

advantages. In the first place it accounts for the attitude 
of the research scientist toward the data he is describing, 
an attitude otherwise highly paradoxical. The laws of any 
science do in a sense reconstruct the past out of which its 
given elements have arisen. So much is assumed in the 
establishment of determinate laws, and for the scientist to 
suppose that the present did not follow from the past in 
terms of the laws he had established would be to deny their 
adequacy to the data they interpret. So far as it goes in 
any field science tends to be deterministic. Yet this "follow- 
ing" of present from past is wholly relative to the data on 
which the interpretation is based, and the scientist looks 
forward with equanimity to a new interpretation, and hence 
a new past, relative to the emergent data which the future 
will supply. And this combination of relative determinism 
and future reconstruction which holds for the research 
scientist, holds also, on this theory, for the nature he is 
describing. 

Secondly, this view is in harmony with the emergence of 
novelty in experience, and the reorganization of experience 
in terms of it. This is the theme of the first Supplementary 
Essay. Even those who "bifurcate" nature most relentlessly 
must admit that in experience data may appear as intrusive 
elements in a world which has, in its present constitution, 
no place for them. They stand in contradiction to that 
world as currently interpreted and set a problem for recon- 
struction. To interpret the world exclusively in terms of the 
conditioning objects which a given period has isolated as the 
permanent background of becoming is to relegate novelty 
to a merely subjective experience. But in the case of data 
relevant to his own problems a scientist makes no such 
bifurcation. Rather does he treat the data as provisionally 
isolated in a world that does not now account for them, but 
as candidates for admission to a reconstituted world which 



xx INTRODUCTION 

may make the facts previously rejected the very center of 
its interpretation. So it was, for example, in the status of 
the Michelson-Morley experiment, first in its relation to 
classical mechanics, then in the theory of relativity. Within 
experience new objects are continually arising and a new 
present reorients the settled conditions of an older era in 
the light of its discoveries. And if the past is this orienta- 
tion of settled conditions with respect to present data, the 
past does empirically change as evolution proceeds. This 
empirical description has been a part of Mr. Mead's philos- 
ophy for many years. The novelty of the present account 
arises from its correlation with the structure of temporal 
reality as such, in the relation of a determining past to an 
emergent present. 

At this point the reader will be all too likely to object that 
it is clearly only our viewpoint or interpretation of the past 
that has altered here. The past in itself has surely not been 
changed by the new way in which we have come to look 
at it. This however is just the distinction that Mr. Mead's 
whole analysis attempts to supersede. For a temporalist 
philosophy the past "in itself" is not a past at all its rela- 
tion to the present is the ground of its pastness. And this 
relation is empirically a causal one. If becoming is real 
that causal relation is never such as to exclude emergence. 
When emergence occurs a new perspective of the past, a new 
relatedness, will ensue a relatedness which is a natural 
fact about the new situation, though it could never have oc- 
curred in the old. And what is here new is precisely the way 
in which what, in the older present, was merely novel and 
abrupt has become a part of the world of causal objects, 
hence a part of the past through which they are supposed 
to operate. The relatedness is real, and the perspective past 
it generates, the past of the new present, is the real past of 
that present, and only for a present can the past be real at all. 



INTRODUCTION xxi 

Mr. Mead's most objective version of his thesis occurs 
in Chapter Two, in the contrast between the past as relative 
to a present and the past as absolute. He holds, espe- 
cially in criticizing Alexander, that the past which physics 
requires is simply the expression of identical relations in 
nature, not an antecedent environment, existing in itself and 
giving rise, in its isolated being, to all subsequent reality. 
Space-Time in Alexander's metaphysic seems to be a mathe- 
matical structure taken out of relation to the physical data 
it interprets and transformed, in all its abstract independ- 
ence, into a metaphysical matrix from which all the com- 
plexities of nature are somehow to be derived. This, on 
Mead's view, is just what the past "in itself" would be, a 
conditioning phase of natural process turned into a meta- 
physical substance. The search for such a substance is not 
ruled out for those whom it may concern. But the re- 
search scientist cares for none of these things. 

We seem, then, to have discovered in temporal transition 
itself a unique sort of relativity, and a set of what we are 
now to describe as "temporal perspectives" or "systems." 
Each such system is distinguished by the temporal center 
from which its relation to past events is organized, and they 
differ primarily in this, that what is external, contingent, 
hence "emergent" for one such standpoint will "follow from" 
and hence be reflected in the past of another. How are such 
perspectives related, and how does the transition from one 
to another take place? The answer can be given only 
when we have inquired into the nature of relativity, and 
into its social implications. 

Ill 

The problem of relativity appears in its most crucial 
form, for Mead, in the theory of physical relativity. The 



xxii INTRODUCTION 

"Minkowski space-time" as even the most casual reader 
may gather, is his major preoccupation. The form of the 
problem is characteristic, and, whatever one may hold as to 
its solution, clearly raises an issue that philosophers who 
deal with this subject must face. What the theory of rela- 
tivity has apparently done is to undermine the ultimacy, in 
scientific investigation, of the world of material objects in 
terms of which experimental physics has been accustomed 
to verify its theories. That world, as Mr. Mead argues 
in the first Supplementary Essay, is by no means a world 
of sense data or of private impressions. It is the world of 
solid macroscopic objects that can be measured and handled 
in common, objects whose permanent and relatively isolable 
characters can be identified under varying conditions, and 
mainly by the appeal from sight to touch, from distant to 
contact values, in what Mead calls the "manipulatory area." 
Lovejoy's devotion to the properties an object possesses 
"within its own spatio-temporal limits" furnishes eloquent 
testimony to the importance attached to such entities by 
common sense and its epistemological prophets. These are 
ultimate, standard properties in the sense that they provide 
the unquestioned criteria by which the dubious parts of ex- 
perience can be tested. Of course, an epistemology that 
makes all experience a problem will find these factors as 
dubious as any, but the research scientist has not been much 
troubled by such considerations. His "materialism" has 
not been a godless metaphysics but rather an experimental 
reliance on contact values in measurement. If these, too, 
are "merely relative" and if they are valid only in reference 
to something else never in itself thus experimentally attain- 
able, we seem to have placed our physical standard of va- 
lidity clear outside the material world. A pragmatist can 
hardly fail to take account of such a crisis. 
Now it seems to Mead that this is exactly what the 



INTRODUCTION xxiii 

doctrine of space-time, taken in a simple and realistic sense, 
has done. It undermines the authority of the material ob- 
ject and its place in scientific experiment, without putting 
anything tangible in its place. This is evidenced in three 
ways, (a) The distinction between space and time is broken 
down. And for ordinary material objects this distinction is 
essential. "But from the standpoint of relativity no physical 
object can be isolated from what is happening to it." (page 
144) There is no permanent character in it independent 
of its changes. Again (b) the values that attach to the 
newer physical object are not those which a material object 
can possess in itself, but are relative essentially. "Energy, 
like space-time, is a transformation value." (page 146) This 
means that the properties in terms of which we have pre- 
viously identified our validating objects are variable, not 
constant, and "the metaphysical question is, can a thing 
with changing spatio-temporal and energy dimensions be 
the same thing with different dimensions, when we have 
seemingly only these dimensions by which to define the 
thing." (page 79) Now physics has often enough in the 
past relegated seemingly intrinsic characters to a merely 
relative status, but here the alteration is fundamental. For 
(c) it is no longer possible to interpret distance values in 
terms of possible contact experience or to regard the prop- 
erties which a thing has where it is as uniquely characteriz- 
ing it. The space and time values which an object has 
from a distance under conditions of relative motion will not 
be identical, even ideally, with those which a measurement 
of it in its own local space and time units would reveal. Nor 
can we simply correct the distance values, those given in 
terms of signals, by those which an observer at rest on the 
body itself would discover. For his calculations only come 
out even, when he imputes to us measured values which 
again would be falsified by experience in our manipulatory 



xxiv INTRODUCTION 

area, that is, with our local time and space standards. Thus, 
in the theory of relativity, distance experience, in terms of 
light signals, comes to have an autonomous value not re- 
ducible to contact or local values. This has been commented 
on with enthusiasm by Brunschvicg and with suspicion by 
Bergson, who reaches the conclusion that imputed times, 
those determined at a distance, do not really belong to their 
objects at all. 

Mr. Mead reaches no such negative conclusion. He is con- 
tent to follow the theory whither it leads and to accept 
space-time for whatever the scientist as contrasted with 
the metaphysician may find in it. Does this mean that 
we are to treat the measured values of physical objects as 
"subjective" and to set up outside the experience in which 
we measure and manipulate a new object standing in the 
same relation to primary qualities as that in which the 
primary have traditionally stood to the secondary? Space- 
time would then be a sort of attenuated material object with- 
out material properties. The alternative would be to re- 
examine that whole relation of experience to its "real" or 
standard objects of which the problem about space-time 
is but an instance. Such reexamination is Mr. Mead's con- 
tribution to the much argued subject of relativity. Its char- 
acter can best be illustrated by examples drawn first from 
the familiar type of social interaction which is to serve as 
a model for the whole account, next from the physical field 
in which a scientific verification has normally operated and 
finally from the theory of relativity itself. In each case 
it is to be shown that the correction and organization of 
relative experiences in terms of the "real" objects to which 
they refer involves not a non-empirical reality to which they 
must somehow correspond, but rather a way of acting which 
relates past and future to the present from the standpoint 
or perspective of its widest social meaning. 



INTRODUCTION xxv 

There is a vast difference in ordinary social experience 
between what a man has and what he owns. Possession may 
be nine-tenths of the law but it is never the whole of it. 
Yet this further fact, additional to mere possession, can- 
not be embodied in a purely self-centered experience; it 
involves a reference to such claims as would be recognized 
in a court of law. The rights of property are objects of 
present experience in so far as any individual surveys his 
situation as an owner, in relation to the claims of others, and 
of the law, and reacts accordingly. To understand the 
implications of his conduct from this standpoint he must see 
them as others see them and must, in consequence, have 
come to take a socially objective attitude toward his own 
behavior. The meanings that this relationship confers upon 
experience are real and important facts about it. But they 
arise only for an individual who, as Mead would say, can 
react to his own reactions in the role of his fellows, and 
can take the standpoint thus achieved as authoritative for 
the direction of his own activity. 

Thus to "take the role of the other" is to see all experi- 
ence in a new context, in terms of what it means or portends 
relatively to the objects or objectives which this stand- 
point defines as central. The more of the past and future 
such a standpoint commands, the more will it transform 
experience into the substance of things hoped for and the 
evidence of things not seen and the more, above all, will 
it enlighten action by giving a present relevance and value 
to occurrences not literally given in immediate experience. 
The ordinary function of standard objects is to mediate ac- 
tion by bringing within the range of conscious selection alter- 
natives that only this wider standpoint can encompass. The 
process of adjustment by which a child learns to play various 
parts in a social situation and finally to judge himself as a 
responsible person in the light of the value others would 



xxvi INTRODUCTION 

place upon his conduct, and which his own conscience, acting 
in their person, now accepts as authoritative, is outlined 
in the final Essay, It is the key to much that is most dif- 
ficult, and most original, in the earlier Essays. 

The second Essay attempts to extend this account of 
objectivity as "taking the role of the other" to our knowl- 
edge of physical objects. The requirements of the situa- 
tion if the analogy is to hold good will be the following: 
(1) The meaning to be explained must be such as an in- 
dividual experience could not possess in itself or in its 
immediacy; it must arise out of its interaction with ex- 
ternal agencies. (2) It must nevertheless be possible for 
the individual to distinguish in experience between what 
is merely his own contribution and what on the other hand 
can be identified with the action of the other party to the 
transaction. If he is to react in the role of the other he must 
be able to identify some activity of his own through which 
and in terms of which he can act in its person. (3) The 
standpoint which he thus achieves must become so authori- 
tative within experience that the meanings data take on 
in relation to it will be the index of their objective value. 
Finally (4} experience, as mediated by such meanings, will 
include the past and future, thus introducing into the present 
the conditions and consequences of the alternative reactions 
between which an individual must choose. To bring the 
conditions of action into the range of conscious deliberation 
in such fashion that we can direct conduct in the light of 
them is the goal of this whole development. 

In our knowledge of physical things we can trace each of 
these factors. (1) The distinctive nature of the physical 
thing, its "having an inside," as Mead puts it, is not a char- 
acter which our own experience, taken in its individual 
aspect, can reveal. We do not, for example, first discover 
an inside to our own bodies and then interpret others on 



INTRODUCTION xxvii 

this analogy. The body is known as a physical thing only 
in its relation to other physical things. "Genetically the 
infant advances from the periphery toward his body." (page 
119) (2) It is the experience of resistance that provides 
the necessary external reference. In pushing and resisting 
things the organism can regard its own activity as identical 
in kind with that of the thing upon it. Action and reaction 
are equal and opposite. Thus in resisting the thing we 
are behaving towards it as it is behaving towards us. The 
"inside" of the physical thing, what it is for itself and in 
its own person, is thus what we find in contact experience, 
in the "manipulatory area." In the case of color, sound and 
the like there is no such persistent tendency to equate the 
thinghood of the thing with its effects in experience. (3) 
If we now assume that what experience would be from the 
standpoint of such a contact experience what it is in its 
own spatio-temporal limits is its real or standard nature we 
can judge its more immediate aspects accordingly. It is 
in leading up to the object as it exists where it is that 
distance experience becomes significant. We have here a 
standpoint, a relational focus of meanings, which, if we act 
in the role of the physical thing, becomes authoritative as 
against other perspectives or standpoints. "Real" shape 
and size, for example, are determined more correctly in the 
"manipulatory area" than they could be at a distance. There 
is some equivocation, I think, in Mr. Mead's use of the 
term "resistance" both for the deliverance of contact ex- 
perience itself and also for the authority which such contact 
values come to have in directing or inhibiting our reactions 
to the thing. But his main view is clear. There are many 
contexts in which our experience is involved. The one we 
accept as a standard will determine the direction of activity 
and its meanings. It is by seeing the world as it would be 
for the fully realized values of thinghood that this standard 



xxviii INTRODUCTION 

is in fact applied. (4) The power of the human animal to 
discover such meanings transforms present experience 
into a world of objects whose potentialities are the pos- 
sibilities of action. The scope of such action explains and 
justifies that transcendence of immediacy which epistemol- 
ogists have so frequently emphasized and so rarely under- 
stood. 

The application of all this to the theory of relativity is 
now comparatively easy, and the reader will follow it in 
Chapter Four and, in a less complicated statement, in Essay 
Four in fairly straightforward fashion. Again we have rel- 
ative values, which, if Mead is right, are essentially social 
in the sense that they involve a reference, for their meaning, 
to that which exists outside the "time-system" within which 
they are reckoned. Again there is a search for something 
identical that will enable the individual to "take the role of 
the other" and to interpret experience not only from his 
own standpoint but from that, say, of the man on Mars. 
But here the range of the generalization has taken us clear 
beyond the physical object and its value of resistance. We 
are in the realm of a "generalized other," of an attitude 
which enables us to pass from any physical perspective to 
any other, occupying each or any in passage, and iden- 
tifying in each only that which is in fact identical, the 
formula that justifies the transition from one to another. 
We have, then, in space-time, not a curious and unattainable 
new sort of object, but a generalization of that social ob- 
jectivity which extends the generous capacity of seeing our- 
selves as others see us to include the views of our stellar 
neighbors. In this context of meaning the world of space- 
time has its locus and function. Nor does its importance 
discredit the physical object when the latter is viewed within 
its own proper limits. The conclusions of scientific research 
must not discredit the objects with which it operates and 



INTRODUCTION xxix 

through which its conclusions are tested. But if space-time 
is understood not as the metaphysical superior of the physi- 
cal object the "reality" of which its relative being is but 
a "shadow" but rather as a further development of that 
"community of interpretation" of which the physical object 
itself is a limited but highly valuable expression the two 
are perfectly compatible. We are then able to accept the 
theory of relativity as a phase not necessarily final, of 
course in that process by which man achieves social ob- 
jectivity through the organization of relative perspectives. 

IV 

We are now ready for the most daring development in 
this theory. Can sociality so far considered in its specifi- 
cally human aspect be so generalized as to characterize the 
whole course of natural development? We found relativity 
occurring in nature in the perspectives that emergence im- 
plies. And some sort of organization of such perspectives 
seemed to be required. If this readjustment should turn 
out on all levels of development to be a form of sociality, 
we should have succeeded in linking up sociality with the 
whole time process and putting mind back into nature with 
a vengeance. Thus "to present mind as an evolution in 
nature, in which culminates that sociality which is the 
principle and form of emergence" (page 85) is the final 
goal of the Car us Lectures. This culminating hypothesis 
took shape, if I can judge from my conversations with Mr. 
Mead, only while the lectures were being written. It re- 
mains the most suggestive and, as it stands, the most dif- 
ficult part of his philosophy. 

The sociality of emergence, and the evolution, through 
emergence, of sociality into higher and more complex ob- 
jective expression are the parallel themes of this hypothesis. 



xxx INTRODUCTION 

(a) In what sense is emergence social? In emergence, as 
in the theory of relativity there is a plurality of "systems," 
that is to say of distinct standpoints, and we have the con- 
sequence that the "same" object must be in different systems 
at once. The system of physical relations is one thing, 
with its own organization of experience; the system of vital 
relations includes, as essential, elements which, from the 
merely physical standpoint, are external and contingent. 
And neither of these can be reduced to the other, since the 
vital really is emergent and hence additional to the merely 
physical while the physical is, in its scientific standpoint, 
determined exclusively by relations in which uniquely or- 
ganic features of the world have no place. And yet the 
living animal belongs to both orders of relation and is in 
both "systems" at once. Consciousness is additional and 
irreducible to mere organic behavior, yet a sensation is at 
once an organic event and also implicated in that system 
of meanings which, in objectifying the possible future ac- 
tivity of the organism, is the distinctively conscious aspect 
of experience. 

Sociality is "the situation in which the novel event is in 
both the old order and the new which its advent heralds. 
Sociality is the capacity for being several things at once." 
(page 49) But in its dynamic aspect it is more than this. 
The novel event must not merely be in two systems; it must 
adjust this plurality of systematic relations in such fashion 
that "its presence in the later system changes its character 
in the earlier system or systems to which it belongs" (page 
69) while its older relations are reflected in the new 
system it has entered. It carries over the old relations, yet 
in its emergent novelty it reflects back upon the older world 
the uniqueness of its new situation. "So Rousseau had to 
find the sovereign and the subject in the citizen and Kant 
had to find both the giver of the moral law and the subject 



INTRODUCTION xxxi 

of the law in the rational being." (52) And so, to com- 
plete the picture, the monarchical system from which Rous- 
seau's citizen and Kant's rational being emerged could never 
be quite the same again after their advent. The readjust- 
ment of the new social order to the old, of that which was 
carried over to that which emerged, is "sociality" in its 
most general sense. That it fits in neatly with the "recon- 
struction" of experience on the intrusion of novel elements 
as described in Section II will be evident. 

The theory of relativity has been found consistent with 
"sociality" in its narrower sense. In Chapter Three Mr. 
Mead attempts to bring it under the more general formula 
he has now achieved. The "emergent" here will be that 
which appears only for some special perspective or "time- 
system" and is additional to that identical "carrying on of 
relations" expressed in the space-time structure common 
to the whole set of such perspectives. Motion is relative 
to the time-system selected, and the increase in mass which 
follows from increased velocity will occur only where the 
requisite motion occurs. And this "emergent" motion 
changes a physical character of the object its mass in 
that time-system within which it occurs. The analogy seems 
to Mr. Mead so obvious that he interprets more orthodox 
instances of "emergence" in terms of this one. "Emergent 
life changes the character of the world just as emergent 
velocities change the characters of masses." (page 65) 

Now the body that moves in one time-system is as truly 
at rest in an alternative system it is as much in the one 
as in the other. And its character in either is only adequately 
grasped when we understand its status in the other as well. 
Thus the relativist can explain the Fitzgerald contraction 
and its physical consequences only by assuming that the 
physically valid results reached in alternative time-systems 
will not in general coincide, and that each is to be seen 



xxxii INTRODUCTION 

therefore as relative, as requiring the recognition, as equally 
legitimate, of its alternatives. In this sense, that the physicist 
must be able to place himself in either perspective, the 
theory does indeed approximate the pervasive form of 
sociality as already outlined, and it is possible to refer to 
an increase in mass as "an extreme example of sociality." 
(page 52) To understand this increase as relative, as de- 
pendent on a special time-system and "emergent" for space- 
time as such, we must see the event in question both in the 
system in which the increase occurs and in that in which it 
does not and regard the event as genuinely a member of 
each. 

When Mr. Mead goes beyond this to argue that the actual 
measurement of an increase in mass in one system requires 
the use, in this system, of space and time values derived 
from an alternative system (page 52 ff.) and hence that 
the two systems "cease to be alternatives" (page 54) the 
discussion becomes very involved and, if I have not mis- 
understood it, would seem to me mistaken. He could hardly, 
I think, have intended to retain it in its present form. But 
the main thesis is not necessarily compromised by the in- 
adequacy of its detailed application. And the main thesis 
is this: The abruptness of emergent process is reflected in 
a plurality of relational systems irreducibly distinct yet so 
mutally implicated in "passage" that an object, belonging 
to two such "systems" at once will import into each a charac- 
ter with which its presence in the other has endowed it. 
The process of readjustment in which the object maintains 
itself in each system, through being also in the other, is 
sociality. 

(b) How does sociality evolve? Since Mr. Mead holds 
that "the appearance of mind is only the culmination of 
that sociality which is found throughout the universe" (page 
86) he naturally distinguishes between the common prin- 



INTRODUCTION xxxiii 

ciple of this form of emergence and the special distinction 
it achieves in what is, so far as we know, its highest ex- 
pression. With the common principle of sociality we are 
now familiar. The distinctive character of mind or con- 
sciousness is best seen in its contrast with the merely organic 
behavior from which it has emerged. "Primarily living 
forms react to external stimulation in such fashion as to 
preserve the living process. The peculiar method that dis- 
tinguishes their reactions from the motions of inanimate 
objects is that of selection. This selection is the sensitivity 
of the living form. . . . The conscious animal carries selec- 
tion into the field of its own responses. . . . Life becomes con- 
scious at those points at which the organism's own responses 
enter into the objective field to which it reacts." (pages 71-3) 
What it means to respond to one's own responses we have 
already seen. The relations in which the environment stands 
to our reactions are its meanings. To respond to such mean- 
ings, to treat them, rather than mere immediate data as the 
stimuli for behavior, is to have imported into the world 
as experienced the promise of the future and the lesson of 
the past. Meanings are now the very essence of what an 
object really is and in seeing it in terms of its meanings, 
in reacting to what it can do to us under crucial or standard 
conditions, we are bringing organic sensations into a new 
and emergent context. The human individual is alive and 
also conscious. His conscious behavior organizes his sensa- 
tions in themselves mere organic reactions into qualities 
and meanings of things. This new place in a system of mean- 
ings alters the import of the sensation. Yet such behavior 
is dependent on the vital interactions from which it has 
emerged and the dependence of the thought on sensation 
carries over into the conscious system the reflection of its 
organic conditions. In reacting to the meaning of his sen- 
sations the individual is in both systems at once. 



xxxiv INTRODUCTION 

The highest level of conscious experience is, of course, 
that in which the individual can apprehend meanings in their 
fullest generality, and can thus command so wide a variety 
of standpoints toward his world as to isolate that which is 
common to all and would hence be valid for any rational 
individual. This is the role of the "generalized other," and 
the meanings which the sciences find in the world are those 
which so impersonal a standpoint will reveal. And yet it 
is just in this impersonality of standpoint that the individual 
becomes a "person" a real member of the community of 
rational beings. To participate in the life of the community 
he must see himself as a participant and must respond to 
its claims and responsibilities as his own. In its person he 
can survey the "perspectives" which individual attitudes en- 
gender and can relate them all to the demands of the com- 
mon purpose in which they are equally involved. 

There is, clearly, a notable difference between that general 
"sociality" in terms of which an animal, by simply being 
both material and alive is "several things at once," with 
the resulting consequences of such systematic plurality, quite 
independently of any consciousness of the situation, and the 
more special situation in which an individual, by "taking 
the role of the other" can see himself from different stand- 
points and can make the correlation of these standpoints a 
part of the meaning of his world. If Mr. Mead has suc- 
ceeded in portraying the latter situation as a natural "emer- 
gent" development from the former his major task is 
accomplished. 

The argument returns at the end, as it should, to its point 
of departure. It is in a present that emergent sociality oc- 
curs. And we can now see that such a present is no mere 
moment of time, arbitrarily cut out from an otherwise uni- 
form "passage of nature." A present is a unit of natural 
becoming; it is the period within which something temporally 



INTRODUCTION xxxv 

real can happen. What has been and what may be have 
their focus and actualization in a present standpoint and it 
is from such a standpoint that creative intelligence, trans- 
forming the novelty of emergence and the fatality of mere 
repetition into a measure at least of meaningful development, 
brings to articulate and self-conscious expression the per- 
vasive form of natural process. It is as the scene of such 
process that the present is the locus of reality. 

So original a hypothesis will naturally raise doubts and 
generate formidable problems. This, however, is not the 
place to consider them. The theory must speak first of all 
in its own person. In this introduction I have tried simply 
to "take the role of the other" and, interpreting the theory 
from its own standpoint, to bring together some of its main 
ideas, in such an order and relation as Mr. Mead might 
himself have adopted had he lived to complete the important 
work he had undertaken. 

ARTHUR E. MURPHY. 



PREFATORY REMARKS 

The difficult task of drawing for the reader a map in which 
the main features of George Mead's thought are set before 
us (as is the business of a good map), in their proper rela- 
tions to one another has been performed by Dr. Murphy in 
his Introduction. It would be of little or no assistance to the 
reader were I to go over the ground which he has traversed. 
There is, however, a trait of Mr. Mead's mind which when 
it is recognized will help protect the reader from some of the 
pitfalls into which one is likely to fall in dealing with an 
original thinker. While Mr. Mead was an original thinker, he 
had no sense of being original. Or if he had such a feeling 
he kept it under. Instead of bringing to the front as novel- 
ties the problems which were occupying his own mind (which 
they were even as problems), he chose to link them to ideas 
and movements already current. An excellent instance of 
this trait is found in the pragmatic theory of knowledge to 
which Professor Murphy refers. Mr. Mead does not seem 
to have had any consciousness of the way and the degree in 
which his own conception was a novel contribution; he pre- 
ferred to treat it as if it were a natural outgrowth with at 
most some change of emphasis in statement. 

When I first came to know Mr. Mead, well over forty 
years ago, the dominant problem in his mind concerned the 
nature of consciousness as personal and private. In the 
'eighties and 'nineties, idealism prevailed in Anglo-American 
thought. It had a solution of the problem of consciousness 
ready to offer. Mind as consciousness was at once the very 
stuff of the universe and the structural forms of this stuff; 
human consciousness in its intimate and seemingly ex- 
clusively personal aspect was at most but a variant, faithful 



PREFATORY REMARKS xxxvii 

or errant, of the universal mind. I almost never heard Mr. 
Mead argue directly against this view. I suppose tjiat 
it never seemed real to him in spite of the fact that it was the 
official doctrine of most of his own teachers and was, in 
some form or other, the philosophic conception most gen- 
erally put forward in the philosophical writings of the period. 
When, however, it was urged upon him, instead of combating 
it, he took the ground that it did not touch the problem in 
which he was interested. Even if it were true and were ac- 
cepted as such, it did not explain how states of mind peculiar 
to an individual, like the first hypotheses of a discoverer 
which throw into doubt beliefs previously entertained and 
which deny objectivity to things that have been universally 
accepted as real objects, can function as the sources of objects 
which instead of being private and personal, instead of being 
merely "subjective," belong to the common and objective 
universe. 

As I look back I can see that a great deal of the seeming 
obscurity of Mr. Mead's expression was due to the fact that 
he saw something as a problem which had not presented 
itself at all to the other minds. There was no common 
language because there was no common object of reference. 
His problem did not fall into the categories and classifications 
of either idealism or realism. He was talking about some- 
thing which the rest of us did not see. It lay outside of 
what used to be called "apperceptive masses." I fancy 
that if one had a sufficiently consecutive knowledge of Mr. 
Mead's intellectual biography during the intervening years, 
one could discover how practically all his inquiries and 
problems developed out of his original haunting question. 
His sense of the role of subjective consciousness in the recon- 
struction of objects as experienced and in the production of 
new customs and institutions was surely the thing which 
lead him to his extraordinarily broad and accurate knowl- 



xxxviii PREFATORY REMARKS 

edge of the historical development of the sciences a knowl- 
edge which did not stop with details of discoveries but which 
included changes of underlying attitudes toward nature. 
His interest in the problem of self led in one direction to 
the study of the organism as the biological unit correspond- 
ing to the self. In the other direction it necessitated that 
study of the self in its social relations which carried him into 
social psychology the field in which, I suppose, he had the 
greatest immediate influence through the effect of his teach- 
ing upon his students. The nature of his problem was such, 
as one can readily see, to make him acutely sensitive to the 
doctrines of Whitehead, especially the effort to include mat- 
ters usually relegated to an exclusively subjective realm with- 
in the constitution of nature itself. Since his problem was 
(and that long before the words "emergent evolution" were 
heard), essentially that of the emergence of the new and its 
ultimate incorporation in a recognized and now old world, one 
can appreciate how much more fundamentally he took the 
doctrine of emergence than have most of those who have 
played with the idea. Against this background, his gen- 
eralization of the idea of "sociality" and his interpretation of 
emergence in evolution take on a meaning which they do not 
otherwise have. 

There is a passage to be found in the recently published 
first volume of Peirce's work which explains to me the kind of 
originality which marked Mr. Mead. "It is," Peirce said, 
"extremely difficult to bring our attention to elements of 
experience which are continually present. For we have noth- 
ing in experience with which to contrast them; and without 
contrast, they cannot excite our attention. . . . The result is 
that round-about devices have to be resorted to in order to 
enable us to perceive what stares us in the face with a glare 
that, once noticed, becomes almost oppressive with its insist- 
ency." The power of observing common elements, which are 



PREFATORY REMARKS xxxix 

ignored just because they are common, characterized the 
mind of George Mead. It accounts for the difficulty which he 
had in conveying what he observed to others. Most phil- 
osophical thinking is done by means of following out the 
logical implications of concepts which seem central to a 
particular thinker, the deductions being reinforced by suit- 
able concrete data. Mr. Mead's philosophical thinking often, 
perhaps usually, reverses the process. It springs from his 
own intimate experiences, from things deeply felt, rather 
than from things merely thought out by him, which then seek 
substantiation in accepted facts and current concepts. His 
interest in the concept of emergence is, for example, a reflex 
of that factor of his own intellectual experience by which new 
insights were constantly budding and having then to be 
joined to what he had thought previously, instead of merely 
displacing old ideas. He felt within himself both the 
emergence of the new and the inevitable continuity of the 
new with the old. So too he experienced within himself the 
struggle of ideas, hypotheses, presentiments, at first wholly 
private, a matter of intimate personal selfhood, to find and 
take their place in an objective, shared, public world. His 
sense of "sociality" as simultaneous existence in two differ- 
ent orders seems to me to have something in common with the 
combination of great originality and unusual deference to 
others which marked his own personality. 

In contrast with the kind of originality which marked his 
thinking I realize that much which passes for original think- 
ing is a reworking, in the light of some new perspective, of in- 
tellectual attitudes already pretty well conventionalized; the 
working of a vein of ore previously uncovered but not 
adequately exploited by others. I realize also that in much 
of what seems like clearness of literary expression, the clear- 
ness is but another name for familiarity rather than some- 
thing intrinsic to the thought. The loss which American 



xl PREFATORY REMARKS 

philosophy has suffered by Mr. Mead's untimely death is 
increased by the fact that there is every reason to think that 
he was beginning to get a command of his ideas which made 
communication to others easier and more effective. The 
manuscript of his Carus lectures for whose careful editing 
we owe so much to Dr. Murphy gives hardly more than hur- 
riedly prepared notes of extreme condensation. He was 
planning to expand them to three or four times their present 
length, an expansion which would have clarified the thought 
and not merely swelled the number of words. But in spite 
of all limitations, I believe that a widening public will in- 
creasingly find in his writings what personal students have 
found for many, many years: a seminal mind of the very 
first order. 

JOHN DEWEY 



THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

CHAPTER I 

THE PRESENT AS THE Locus OF REALITY 

The subject of this lecture is found in the proposition 
that reality exists in a present. The present of course im- 
plies a past and a future, and to these both we deny exist- 
ence. Whitehead's suggestion that, as specious presents 
vary in temporal spread, one present can be conceived which 
could take in the whole of temporal reality, would seemingly 
leave to us passage but would eliminate the past and the 
future. Whatever else it would be it would not be a present, 
for that out of which it had passed would not have ceased 
to exist, and that which is to exist would already be in that 
inclusive present. Whether this would still leave the charac- 
ter of passage might be doubted, but in any case the essential 
nature of the present and of existence would have disap- 
peared. For that which marks a present is its becoming 
and its disappearing. While the flash of the meteor is 
passing in our own specious presents it is all there if only 
for a fraction of a minute. To extend this fraction of a 
minute into the whole process of which it is a fragment, 
giving to it the same solidarity of existence which the flash 
possesses in experience, would be to wipe out its nature as 
an event. Such a conspectus of existence would not be an 
eternal present, for it would not be a present at all. Nor 
would it be an existence. For a Parmenidean reality does 
not exist. Existence involves non-existence; it does take 
place. The world is a world of events. 

There is little purpose or profit in setting up antinomies 

1 



2 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

and overthrowing the one by the other, or in relegating 
permanence to a subsistent, timeless world while the event, 
in which there is nothing but passage, is made the substan- 
tial element in existent things. The permanent character 
that we are interested in is one that abides in existence, and 
over against which change exists as well. There is, that is, 
the past which is expressed in irrevocability, though there 
has never been present in experience a past which has not 
changed with the passing generations. The pasts that we 
are involved in are both irrevocable and revocable. It is 
idle, at least for the purposes of experience, to have re- 
course to a "real" past within which we are making constant 
discoveries ; for that past must be set over against a present 
within which the emergent appears, and the past, which 
must then be looked at from the standpoint of the emergent, 
becomes a different past. The emergent when it appears 
is always found to follow from the past, but before it ap- 
pears it does not, by definition, follow from the past. It 
is idle to insist upon universal or eternal characters by which 
past events may be identified irrespective of any emergent, 
for these are either beyond our formulation or they become 
so empty that they serve no purpose in identification. The 
import of the infinite in ancient and modern mathematical 
thought illustrates this impotence. 

The possibility remains of pushing the whole of real 
reality into a world of events in a Minkowski space-time 
that transcends our frames of reference, and the characters 
of events into a world of subsistent entities. How far such 
a conception of reality can be logically thought out I will 
not undertake to discuss. What seems to me of interest 
is the import which such a concept as that of irrevocability 
has in experience. 

I will not spend time or rhetoric in presenting the moving 
picture of the histories that have succeeded each other from 



THE PRESENT 3 

the myths of primitive ages up to Eddington's or Jeans' 
account of "The Universe about Us." It is only of interest 
to note that the rapidity with which these pasts succeed 
each other has steadily increased with the increase in critical 
exactitude in the study of the past. There is an entire 
absence of finality in such presentations. It is of course 
the implication of our research method that the historian 
in any field of science will be able to reconstruct what has 
been, as an authenticated account of the past. Yet we look 
forward with vivid interest to the reconstruction, in the 
world that will be, of the world that has been, for we 
realize that the world that will be cannot differ from the 
world that is without rewriting the past to which we now 
look back. 

And yet the character of irrevocability is never lost. That 
which has happened is gone beyond recall and, whatever 
it was, its slipping into the past seems to take it beyond 
the influence of emergent events in our own conduct or in 
nature. It is the "what it was" that changes, and this 
seemingly empty title of irrevocability attaches to it what- 
ever it may come to be. The importance of its being ir- 
revocable attaches to the "what it was," and the "what it 
was" is what is not irrevocable. There is a finality that 
goes with the passing of every event. To every account 
of that event this finality is added, but the whole import 
of this finality belongs to the same world in experience to 
which this account belongs. 

Now over against this evident incidence of finality to a 
present stands a customary assumption that the past that 
determines us is there. The truth is that the past is there, 
in its certainty or probability, in the same sense that the 
setting of our problems is there. I am proceeding upon the 
assumption that cognition, and thought as a part of the cogni- 
tive process, is reconstructive, because reconstruction is es- 



4 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

sential to the conduct of an intelligent being in the universe. 1 
This is but part of the more general proposition that 
changes are going on in the universe, and that as a con- 
sequence of these changes the universe is becoming a dif- 
ferent universe. Intelligence is but one aspect of this change. 
It is a change that is part of an ongoing living process that 
tends to maintain itself. What is peculiar to intelligence 
is that it is a change that involves a mutual reorganization, 
an adjustment in the organism and a reconstitution of the 
environment; for at its lowest terms any change in the 
organism carries with it a difference of sensitivity and re- 
sponse and a corresponding difference in the environment. 
It is within this process that so-called conscious intelligence 
arises, for consciousness is both the difference which arises 
in the environment because of its relation to the organism 
in its organic process of adjustment, and also the differ- 
ence in the organism because of the change which has taken 
place in the environment. We refer to the first as mean- 
ing, and to the second as ideation. The reflection of the 
organism in the environment and the reflection of environ- 
ment in the organism are essential phases in the maintenance 
of the life process that constitutes conscious intelligence. 

I will consider the import of consciousness in a later lec- 
ture. At present my interest is only to locate that activity 
to which cognition belongs and of which thought is an ex- 
pression. I am distinguishing in particular that existence 
of the world for the individual and social organism which 
answers to the more general usage of the term consciousness 
from that situation which answers to the term "conscious- 
ness of." It is the latter which, to my mind, connotes cogni- 
tion. The distinction between the two falls in with that 



a For a fuller account of this theory of knowledge see "A Pragmatic 
Theory of Truth," University of California Publications in Philosophy, 
Vol. 11, page 65 ff. 



THE PRESENT 5 

which I have suggested between the problem and its setting. 
The setting within which adjustment takes place is essen- 
tial to the adjustment and falls within what belongs to the 
"field of consciousness," as that term is generally used 
especially when we recognize the implications of that which 
is more definitely in the field of consciousness. The term 
"field of awareness" is at times used in the same sense, but 
it is more apt to carry with it the value of "awareness of" 
than is the term "consciousness." In other words, in knowl- 
edge there is always the presupposition of a world that is 
there and that provides the basis for the inferential and 
ideational process of cognition. This of course restricts 
cognition or "consciousness of" to that which has within it 
an inferential strain. 

Now the world which is there in its relationship to the 
organism, and which sets the conditions for the adjustment 
of the organism and the consequent change in and of that 
world, includes its past. We approach every question of a 
historical character with a certain apparatus, which may be 
nicely defined, and this more technically defined material 
of documents, oral testimony, and historical remains sub- 
tends a given past which extends backward from the mem- 
ories of yesterday and today, and which we do not question. 
We use the apparatus to answer hypothetically the historical 
questions which press upon us, and to test our hypotheses 
when they have been elaborated. It is of course understood 
that any part of this apparatus and of the past within which 
it is embedded may itself fall under doubt, but even the 
most heroic skepticism in its very enunciation cannot get 
away from the memory of the words and ideas which formu- 
late the skeptical doctrine. 

Some such given past is involved in questions bearing 
upon the past. And this given past extends the specious 
present. It is true that the ultimate agreement between 



6 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

the meanings of two documents may lie in experience in a 
specious present, but only upon the supposition of the com- 
parison we have previously made of the documents. This 
comparison stretches back of us and remains unquestioned 
until someone points out an error therein and thus brings 
it into question, but then only upon the basis of his and 
others' past. Take the ingenious suggestion, of Gosse's 
father, I believe, that God had created the world with its 
fossils and other evidences of a distant past to try men's 
faith; and bring the suggestion up to a half an hour ago. 
Suppose that the world came into existence, with its exact 
present structure, including the so-called contents of our 
minds, thirty minutes ago, and that we had some ulterior 
evidence analogous to Mr. Gosse's fundamentalist views, 
that this had taken place. We could examine the hypothesis 
only in the light of some past that was there, however 
meager it had become. And this past extends indefinitely, 
there being nothing to stop it, since any moment of it, being 
represented, has its past, and so on. 

What do we mean, now, by the statement that there has 
been some real past with all its events, in independence of 
any present, whose contents we are slowly and imperfectly 
deciphering? We come back of course to the very correc- 
tions which we make in our historical research, and to the 
higher degree of evidence of that which has been discovered 
over that which can be offered for the discarded account. 
Higher degrees of probability and added evidence imply 
that there is or has been some reality there which we are 
bringing to light. There is thus a palpable reference to the 
unquestioned past by means of whose evidence we investigate 
and solve the problems that arise. And the very fact to 
which I have referred, that any accepted account of the 
past, though not now in question, may be conceivably thrown 
into doubt, seems to implv some unquestionable past which 



THE PRESENT 7 

would be the background for the solution of all conceivable 
problems. Let us admit this for the time being, and ask the 
further question whether this past independent of any present 
does enter at all into our investigations I mean as a pre- 
supposition that plays any part in our thinking? If we 
should take away this presupposition would our apparatus 
and the operation of it in historical research be in any way 
affected? Certainly not, if we concern ourselves only with 
the problems with which historians in social or scientific 
history are concerned. Here the reference is always and 
solely to the given past out of which a problem has arisen; 
and the outlines of the problem and the tests to which 
presented hypotheses are subjected, are found in the given 
past. As we have seen, this given past may itself at a later 
date be affected with doubt and brought under discussion. 
And yet the possible dubiety of the given past in no way 
affects the undertaking. This is another way of saying that 
the dubiety of all possible pasts never enters into the his- 
torian's thinking. The only approach to such entrance is 
the demand that all past pasts should be accounted for and 
taken up into the latest statement. And every past past, 
in so far as it is reconstructed, is in so far shown to be in- 
correct. In the implications of our method we seem to ap- 
proach a limiting statement, even if at infinity, which would 
fill out all gaps and correct all errors. But if we are mak- 
ing corrections there must seemingly be some account that 
is correct, and even if we contemplate an indefinite future 
of research science which will be engaged in the undertaking 
we never escape from this implication. 

There is another way of saying this, and that is that our 
research work is that of discovery, and we can only dis- 
cover what is there whether we discover it or not. I think 
however that this last statement is in error, if it is supposed 
to imply that there is or has been a past which is inde- 



8 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

pendent of all presents, for there may be and beyond doubt 
is in any present with its own past a vast deal which we do 
not discover, and yet this which we do or do not discover 
will take on different meaning and be different in its struc- 
ture as an event when viewed from some later standpoint. 
Is there a similar error in the conception of correction of 
the past error and in the suggestion that it implies the 
absolutely correct, even if it never reaches it? I am re- 
ferring to the "in-itself" correctness of an account of events, 
implied in a correction which a later historian makes. I 
think that the absolute correctness which lies back in the 
historian's mind would be found to be the complete presen- 
tation of the given past, if all its implications were worked 
out. If we could know everything implied in our memories, 
our documents and our monuments, and were able to con- 
trol all this knowledge, the historian would assume that 
he had what was absolutely correct. But a historian of the 
time of Aristotle, extending thus his known past, would have 
reached a correct past which would be at utter variance 
with the known world of modern science, and there are only 
degrees of variance between such a comparison and those 
which changes due to research are bringing out in our pasts 
from year to year. If we are referring to any other "in- 
itself" correctness it must be either to that of a reality which 
by definition could never get into our experience, or to that 
of a goal at infinity in which the type of experience in which 
we find ourselves ceases. It is of course possible to assume 
that the experience within which we find ourselves is in- 
cluded in some world or experience that transcends it. My 
only point is that such an assumption plays no part in our 
judgments of the correctness of the past. We may have 
other reasons, theological or metaphysical, for assuming a 
real past that could be given in a presentation independent 
of any present, but that assumption does not enter into the 



THE PRESENT 9 

postulations or technique of any sort of historical research. 

While the conception of an "in-itself" irrevocable past 
is perhaps the common background of thinking, it is interest- 
ing to recur to the statement that I made earlier that the 
research scientist looks forward not only with equanimity 
but also with excited interest to the fundamental changes 
which later research will bring into the most exact deter- 
minations which we can make today. The picture which 
this offers is that of presents sliding into each other, each 
with a past which is referable to itself, each past taking 
up into itself those back of it, and in some degree reconstruct- 
ing them from its own standpoint. The moment that we 
take these earlier presents as existences apart from the 
presentation of them as pasts they cease to have meaning 
to us and lose any value they may have in interpreting our 
own present and determining our futures. They may be 
located in the geometry of Minkowski space-time, but even 
under that assumption they can reach us only through our 
own frames of reference or perspectives; and the same 
would be true under the assumptions of any other meta- 
physics which located the reality of the past in pasts inde- 
pendent of any present. 

It would probably be stated that the irrevocability of 
the past is located in such a metaphysical order, and that 
is the point which I wish to discuss. The historian does not 
doubt that something has happened. He is in doubt as to 
what has happened. He also proceeds upon the assumption 
that if he could have all the facts or data, he could de- 
termine what it was that happened. That is, his idea of 
irrevocability attaches, as I have already stated, to the 
"what' 7 that has happened as well as to the passing of the 
event. But if there is emergence, the reflection of this into 
the past at once takes place. There is a new past, for from 
every new rise the landscape that stretches behind us 



10 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

becomes a different landscape. The analogy is faulty, be- 
cause the heights are there, and the aspects of the land- 
scapes which they reveal are also there and could be recon- 
structed from the present of the wayfarer if he had all the 
implications of his present before him; whereas the 
emergent is not there in advance, and by definition could not 
be brought within even the fullest presentation of the pres- 
ent. The metaphysical reality suggested by Eddington's 
phrase that our experience is an adventuring of the mind 
into the ordered geometry of space-time 2 would, however, 
correspond to a preexistent landscape. 

There is of course the alternative doctrine of Whitehead 
that perspectives exist in nature as intersecting time systems, 
thus yielding not only different presents but also different 
pasts that correspond to them. I cannot, however, see how 
Whitehead with the fixed geometry of space-time which 
he accepts can escape from a fixed order of events, even 
though the "what" of these events depends upon the ingres- 
sion of eternal objects arising through the action of God, 
thus giving rise to emergence. 3 The point at issue is whether 
the necessity with which the scientist deals is one that 
determines the present out of a past which is independent 
of that or any present. An ordered space-time involves such 
a metaphysical necessity. From this standpoint the different 
pasts of experience are subjective reinterpretations, and the 
physicist is not interested in making them a part of the 
whole scheme of events. Whitehead's philosophy is a 
valiant attempt to harmonize this sort of geometric neces- 
sity with emergence and the differences of varying per- 

2 "Space, Time, and Gravitation," page 51. 

8 Mr. Mead's recurrent discussion of Whitehead is based mainly on 
"The Principles of Natural Knowledge" and "The Concept of Nature," 
with some reference also to "Science and the Modern World." He did 
not include "Process and Reality" in his discussion. 



THE PRESENT 11 

spectives. I do not believe that this can be accomplished, 
but I am more interested in the answer to the question, 
whether the necessity which is involved in the relations of 
the present and the past derives from such a metaphysical 
necessity, that is, from one that is independent of any pres- 
ent. 

I revert here to my original proposition that a reality that 
transcends the present must exhibit itself in the present. 
This alternative is that found in the attitude of the re- 
search scientist, whether he confesses it in his doctrine or 
not. It is that there is and always will be a necessary 
relation of the past and the present but that the present 
in which the emergent appears accepts that which is novel 
as an essential part of the universe, and from that stand- 
point rewrites its past. The emergent then ceases to be 
an emergent and follows from the past which has replaced 
the former past. We speak of life and consciousness as 
emergents but our rationalistic natures will never be satis- 
fied until we have conceived a universe within which they 
arise inevitably out of that which preceded them. We 
cannot make the emergent a part of the thought relation 
of past and present, and even when we have seemingly ac- 
cepted it we push biochemistry and behavioristic psychology 
as far as we can in the effort to reduce emergence to a 
disappearing point. But granting the research scientist a 
complete victory a wholly rationalized universe within 
which there is determined order he will still look for- 
ward to the appearance of new problems that will emerge 
in new presents to be rationalized again with another past 
which will take up the old past harmoniously into itself. 

Confessedly, the complete rationality of the universe is 
based upon an induction, and what the induction is based 
upon is a moot point in philosophic doctrine. Granted any 
justifiable reason for believing it, all our correlations greatly 



12 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

strengthen it. But is there such a reason? At this crucial 
point there is the greatest uncertainty. Evidently the 
scientist's procedure ignores this. It is not a moot question 
with him. It is not a question in his procedure at all. He 
is simply occupied in finding rational order and stretch- 
ing this back, that he may previse the future. It is here 
that his given world functions. If he can fit his hypothesis 
into this world and if it anticipates that which occurs, it 
then becomes the account of what has happened. If it breaks 
down, another hypothesis replaces it and another past re- 
places that which the first hypothesis implied. 

The long and short of it is that the past (or the meaning- 
ful structure of the past) is as hypothetical as the future. 
Jeans' account of what has been taking place inside of 
Aldebaran or Sirius Minor during the past millions of years 
is vastly more hypothetical than the astronomer's catalogue 
of what eclipses will take place during the next century and 
where they will be visible. And the metaphysical assump- 
tion that there has been a definite past of events neither 
adds to nor subtracts from the security of any hypothesis 
which illuminates our present. It does indeed offer the 
empty form into which we extend any hypothesis and de- 
velop its implications, but it has not even the fixity which 
Kant found in his forms of intuition. The paradoxes of 
relativity, what Whitehead terms the different meanings of 
time in different time systems, reveal the hypothetical nature 
of the ruled schedules of the past into which we are to 
fit the events which our physical theories unroll behind us. 
We may have recourse to the absolute space-time with its 
coincidences of events and intervals between them, but even 
here it is open to argument whether this interpretation of 
the transformations from one frame of reference to another 
is the final one, whether we have attained the ultimate struc- 
ture of the physical universe or only a more powerful mathe- 



THE PRESENT 13 

matical apparatus for reaching higher exactitude in 
measurements and calculations, whose interpretation will 
vary with the history of mathematical physics. The Min- 
kowski space-time is as much an hypothesis as the de Broglie 
wave-constitution of matter. 

But the irrevocability of the past event remains even if 
we are uncertain what the past event was. Even the re- 
versible character of physical processes which mathematical 
equations seem to disclose does not shake this character 
of time experience. It may be thinkable that viewed from 
some vast distance the order of some of what we call the 
same events might differ in different perspectives, but within 
any perspective what has passed cannot recur. In that per- 
spective what has happened has happened, and any theory 
that is presented must make room for that order in that 
perspective. There is an unalterable temporal direction in 
what is taking place and if we can attach other processes to 
this passage we can give to them as much of certainty as 
the degree of attachment justifies. Given a certain value 
for the velocity of a moving body in a certain frame of 
reference, we can determine where the body will necessarily 
be. Our problem is to determine just what it is that has 
preceded what is taking place so that the direction of tem- 
poral progress may determine what the world is going to be. 
There is a certain temporal process going on in experience. 
What has taken place issues in what is taking place, and in 
this passage what has occurred determines spatio-temporally 
what is passing into the future. So far then as we can 
determine the constants of motion we can follow that de- 
termination, and our analysis seeks to resolve the happen- 
ing in so far as may be into motion. In general, since 
passage is itself given in experience, the direction of changes 
that are going on partly conditions what will take place. 
The event that has taken place and the direction of the proc- 



14 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

ess going on form the basis for the rational determination 
of the future. The irrevocable past and the occurring 
change are the two factors to which we tie up all our 
speculations in regard to the future. Probability is found 
in the character of the process which is going on in ex- 
perience. Yet however eagerly we seek for such spatio- 
temporal structures as carry with them deducible results, 
we none the less recognize relations of things in their proc- 
esses which can not be resolved into quantitative elements, 
and although as far as possible we correlate them with 
measurable characters we in any case recognize them as 
determining conditions of what is taking place. We look for 
their antecedents in the past and judge the future by the 
relation of this past to what is taking place. All of these 
relationships within the ongoing process are determining re- 
lations of what will be, though the specific form of that 
determination constitutes the scientific problem of any par- 
ticular situation. The actuality of determination within 
the passage of direct experience is what Hume by his pre- 
suppositions and type of analysis eliminated from exper- 
ience, and what gives such validity as it has to Kant's 
deduction of the categories. 

It is the task of the philosophy of today to bring into 
congruence with each other this universality of determina- 
tion which is the text of modern science, and the emergence 
of the novel which belongs not only to the experience of 
human social organisms, but is found also in a nature which 
science and the philosophy that has followed it have sepa- 
rated from human nature. The difficulty that immediately 
presents itself is that the emergent has no sooner appeared 
than we set about rationalizing it, that is, we undertake to 
show that it, or at least the conditions that determine its 
appearance, can be found in the past that lay behind it. 
Thus the earlier pasts out of which it emerged as something 



THE PRESENT IS 

which did not involve it are taken up into a more compre- 
hensive past that does lead up to it. Now what this amounts 
to is that whatever does happen, even the emergent, happens 
under determining conditions especially, from the stand- 
point of the exact sciences, under spatio-temporal conditions 
which lead to deducible conclusions as to what will happen 
within certain limits, but also under determining conditions 
of a qualitative sort whose assurances lie within probability 
only but that these conditions never determine completely 
the "what it is" that will happen. Water as distinct from 
combinations of oxygen and hydrogen may happen. Life 
and so-called consciousness may happen. And quanta may 
happen, though it may be argued that such happening 
stands on a different "level" from that of life and conscious- 
ness. When these emer gents have appeared they become 
part of the determining conditions that occur in real pres- 
ents, and we are particularly interested in presenting the 
past which in the situation before us conditioned the ap- 
pearance of the emergent, and especially in so presenting it 
that we can lead up to new appearances of this object. We 
orient ourselves not with reference to the past which was 
a present within which the emergent appeared, but in such 
a restatement of the past as conditioning the future that we 
may control its reappearance. When life has appeared we 
can breed life, and given consciousness, we can control its 
appearance and its manifestations. Even the statement of 
the past within which the emergent appeared is inevitably 
made from the standpoint of a world within which the 
emergent is itself a conditioning as well as a conditioned 
factor. 

We could not bring back these past presents simply as 
they occurred if we are justified in using the expression 
except as presents. An exhaustive presentation of them 
would amount only to reliving them. That is, one present 



16 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

slipping into another does not connote what is meant by a 
past. But even this statement implies that there were such 
presents slipping into each other, and whether we regard 
them from that standpoint or not we seem to imply their 
reality as such, as the structure within which the sort of 
past in which we are interested must lie, if it is an aspect 
of the real past. Passing by the ambiguities which such a 
statement carries within it, what I want to emphasize is 
that the irrevocability of the past does not issue from this 
conception of the past. For in our use of the term 
irrevocability we are pointing toward what must have been, 
and it is a structure and process in the present which is the 
source of this necessity. We certainly cannot go back to 
such a past and test our conjectures by actually inspecting 
its events in their happening. We test our conjectures about 
the past by the conditioning directions of the present and 
by later happenings in the future which must be of a certain 
sort if the past we have conceived was there. The force of 
irrevocability then is found in the extension of the necessity 
with which what has just happened conditions what is emerg- 
ing in the future. What is more than this belongs to a 
metaphysical picture that takes no interest in the pasts 
which arise behind us. 

In the analysis which I have undertaken we come then, 
first, to passage within which what is taking place condi- 
tions that which is arising. Everything that is taking place 
takes place under necessary conditions. Second, these con- 
ditions while necessary do not determine in its full reality 
that which emerges. We are getting interesting reflections 
of this situation from the scientist's criticism of his own 
methods of reaching exact determination of position and 
velocity and from the implications of quanta. What ap- 
pears in this criticism is that while the scientist never aban- 
dons the conditioning of that which takes place by that which 



THE PRESENT 17 

has gone on, expressed in probability, he finds himself quite 
able to think as emergent even those events which are sub- 
ject to the most exact determination. I am not attempting 
to previse what later interpretation will be put upon the 
speculations of de Broglie, Schroeder, and Planck. I am 
simply indicating that even within the field of mathematical 
physics rigorous thinking does not necessarily imply that 
conditioning of the present by the past carries with it the 
complete determination of the present by the past. 

Third, in passage the conditioning of that which is taking 
place by that which has taken place, of the present by 
the past, is there. The past in that sense is in the present; 
and, in what we call conscious experience, its presence is 
exhibited in memory, and in the historical apparatus which 
extends memory, as that part of the conditioning nature of 
passage which reflects itself into the experience of the 
organic individual. If all objects in a present are con- 
ditioned by the same characters in passage, their pasts are 
implicitly the same, but if, to follow out a suggestion taken 
from the speculations about quanta, one electron out of 
two thousand sets energy free, when there are no determin- 
ing conditions for the selection of this electron over against 
the other nineteen hundred and ninety nine, it is evident 
that the past as exhibited in the conduct of this electron will 
be of a sort that will not even implicitly be the same as that 
of the others in that group, though its jump will be condi- 
tioned by all that has gone before. If of two thousand 
individuals under disintegrating social conditions one com- 
mits suicide where, so far as can be seen, one was as likely 
to succumb as another, his past has a peculiarly poignant 
nature which is absent from that of the others, though his 
committing of suicide is an expression of the past. The past 
is there conditioning the present and its passage into the 
future, but in the organization of tendencies embodied in 



18 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

one individual there may be an emergent which gives to 
these tendencies a structure which belongs only to the situa- 
tion of that individual. The tendencies coming from past 
passage, and from the conditioning that is inherent in pas- 
sage, become different influences when they have taken on 
this organized structure of tendencies. This would be as 
true of the balance of processes of disruption and of agglom- 
eration in a star as in the adjustment to each other of a 
living form and its environment. The structural relation- 
ship in their reciprocal balance or adjustment arranges those 
passing processes which reflect backward and lead us to an 
account of the history of the star. As Dewey has main- 
tained, events appear as histories which have a denouement, 
and when an historical process is taking place the organiza- 
tion of the conditioning phases of the process is the novel 
element which is not predictable from the separate phases 
themselves, and which at once sets the scene for a past that 
leads to this outcome. 4 The organization of any individ- 
ual thing carries with it the relation of this thing to 
processes that occurred before this organization set in. In 
this sense the past of that thing is "given" in the passing 
present of the thing, and our histories of things are elabora- 
tions of what is implicit in this situation. This "given" in 
passage is there and is the starting point for a cognitive 
structure of a past. 

Fourth, this emergent character, being responsible for a 
relationship of passing processes, sets up a given past that 
is, so to speak, a perspective of the object within which 
this character appears. We can conceive of an object such 
as, say, some atom of hydrogen, which has remained what 
it is through immeasurable periods in complete adjustment 
to its surroundings, which has remained real in the slipping 



4 Cf. "Experience and Nature," chapters 3 and 7. 



THE PRESENT 19 

of one present into another, or, better, in one unbroken, un- 
eventful passage. For such an object there would have been 
unbroken existence but no past, unless we should revert to 
the occasion on which it emerged as an atom of hydrogen. 
This amounts to saying that where being is existence but 
not becoming there is no past, and that the determination 
involved in passage is a condition of a past but not its 
realization. The relationship of passage involves distin- 
guishable natures in events before past, present and future 
can arise, as extension is a relationship which involves dis- 
tinguishable physical things before structurable space can 
arise. What renders one event distinguishable from an- 
other is a becoming which affects the inner nature of the 
event. It seems to me that the extreme mathematization 
of recent science in which the reality of motion is reduced to 
equations in which change disappears in an identity, and 
in which space and time disappear in a four dimensional 
continuum of indistinguishable events which is neither space 
nor time is a reflection of the treatment of time as pas- 
sage without becoming. 

What then is a present? Whitehead's definition would 
come back to the temporal spread of the passage of the 
events that make up a thing, a spread which is extended 
enough to make it possible for the thing to be what it is. 5 
That of an atom of iron would not need to be longer 
than the period within which the revolution of each of its 
electrons around the nucleus is completed. The universe 
during this period would constitute a duration from the 
point of view of the atom. The specious present of a human 
individual would presumably be a period within which he 
could be himself. From the standpoint which I have sug- 
gested it would involve a becoming. There must be at least 



5 Cf. "The Principles of Natural Knowledge," 2nd ed., page 22 ff. 



?0 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

something that happens to and in the thing which affects the 
nature of the thing in order that one moment may be dis- 
tinguishable from another, in order that there may be 
time. But there is in such a statement a conflict of prin- 
ciples of definition. From one standpoint we are seeking 
for what is essential to a present; from the other we are 
seeking for the lower limit in a process of division. I will 
refer to the latter first, for it involves the question of the 
relation of time to passage to that within which time 
seems to lie and in terms of whose extension we place time 
and compare times. The thousandth part of a second has a 
real significance, and we can conceive of the universe as 
foundering in a sea of entropy within which all becoming 
has ceased. We are dealing here with an abstraction of 
the extension of mere passage from the time within which 
events happen because they become. In Whitehead's treat- 
ment this is called "extensive abstraction," and leads up to 
an event-particle as mathematical analysis leads up to the 
differential. And an event-particle should have the same 
relationship to something that becomes that the differential 
of a change such as an accelerating velocity has to the whole 
process. In so far, extensive abstraction is a method of 
analysis and integration and asks for no other justification 
than its success. But Whitehead uses it as a method of 
metaphysical abstraction and finds in the mere happening 
the event, the substance of that which becomes. He trans- 
fers the content of what becomes to a world of "eternal 
objects" having ingression into events under the control of 
a principle lying outside of their occurrence. While, then, 
the existence of what occurs is found in the present, the 
"what it is" that occurs does not arise out of happening, it 
happens to the event through the metaphysical process of 
ingression. This seems to me to be an improper use of 
abstraction, since it leads to a metaphysical separation of 



THE PRESENT 21 

what is abstracted from the concrete reality from which the 
abstraction is made, instead of leaving it as a tool in the 
intellectual control of that reality. Bergson refers, I think, 
to the same improper use of abstraction, in another con- 
text, as the spatialization of time, contrasting the exclusive 
nature of such temporal moments with the interpenetration 
of the contents of "real" duration. 

If, on the contrary, we recognize what becomes as the 
event which in its relation to other events gives structure 
to time, then the abstraction of passage from what is taking 
place is purely methodological. We carry our analysis as 
far as the control of subject matter requires, but always 
with the recognition that what is analysed out has its reality 
in the integration of what is taking place. That this is the 
result of defining the event as that which becomes, is evi- 
dent, I think, in the application and testing of our most 
abstruse hypotheses. To be of value and to be accredited 
these must present new events springing out of old, such as 
the expansion or contraction of the universe in Einstein's 
and WeyPs speculations on the seeming recessions at enor- 
mous velocities of distant nebulae, or the stripping of elec- 
trons from atomic nuclei in the center of stellar bodies in 
Jeans' speculations upon the transformation of matter into 
radiation. And these happenings should so fit into our 
experimental findings that they may find their reality in 
the concretion of what is taking place in an actual present. 
The pasts which they spread back of us are as hypothetical 
as the future which they assist us in prevising. They 
become valid in interpreting nature in so far as they present 
a history of becomings in nature leading up to that which 
is becoming today, in so far as they bring out what fits into 
the pattern that is emerging from the roaring loom of time, 
not in so far as they erect metaphysical entities which are 
the tenuous obverse of mathematical apparatus. 



22 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

If, in Bergson's phrase, "real duration" becomes time 
through the appearance of unique events which are distin- 
guishable from each other through their qualitative nature, 
a something that is emergent in each event, then bare pas- 
sage is a manner of arranging these events. But what is 
essential to this arrangement is that ip each interval which 
is isolated it must be possible that something should be- 
come, that something unique should arise. We are sub- 
ject to a psychological illusion if we assume that the rhythm 
of counting and the order which arises out of counting 
answer to a structure of passage itself, apart from the proc- 
esses which fall into orders through the emergence of events. 
We never reach the interval itself between events, except in 
correlations between them and other situations within which 
we find congruence and replacement, something that can 
never take place in passage as such. We reach what may 
be called a functional equality of represented intervals within 
processes involving balance and rhythm, but on this basis 
to set up time as a quantity having an essential nature that 
allows of its being divided into equal portions of itself is 
an unwarranted use of abstraction. We can hypothetically 
reconstruct the past processes that are involved in what is 
going on as a basis for the cognitive construction of the 
future which is arising. What we are assured of by the ex- 
perimental data is that we comprehend that which is going 
on sufficiently to predict what will take place, not that we 
have attained a correct picture of the past independent of 
any present, for we expect this picture to change as new 
events emerge. In this attitude we are relating in our 
anticipation presents thai slip into others, and their pasts 
belong to them. They have to be reconstructed as they are 
taken up into a new present and as such they belong to that 
present, and no longer to the present out of which we have 
passed into the present present. 



THE PRESENT 23 

A present then, as contrasted with the abstraction of mere 
passage, is not a piece cut out anywhere from the temporal 
dimension of uniformly passing reality. Its chief reference 
is to the emergent event, that is, to the occurrence of some- 
thing which is more than the processes that have led up 
to it and which by its change, continuance, or disappearance, 
adds to later passages a content they would not otherwise 
have possessed. The mark of passage without emergent 
events is its formulation in equations in which the so-called 
instances disappear in an identity, as Meyerson has pointed 
out. 6 

Given an emergent event, its relations to antecedent 
processes become conditions or causes. Such a situation is 
a present. It marks out and in a sense selects what has 
made its peculiarity possible. It creates with its unique- 
ness a past and a future. As soon as we view it, it becomes 
a history and a prophecy. Its own temporal diameter varies 
with the extent of the event. There may be a history of 
the physical universe as an appearance of a galaxy of gal- 
axies. There is a history of every object that is unique. But 
there would be no such history of the physical universe 
until the galaxy appeared, and it would continue only so 
long as the galaxy maintained itself against disruptive and 
cohesive forces. If we ask what may be the temporal spread 
of the uniqueness which is responsible for a present the 
answer must be, in Whitehead's terms, that it is a period 
long enough to enable the object to be what it is. But the 
question is ambiguous for the term temporal spread" im- 
plies a measure of time. The past as it appears with the 
present and future, is the relation of the emergent event to 
the situation out of which it arose, and it is the event that 
defines that situation. The continuance or disappearance 



6 "Identity and Reality" passim. 



24 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

of that which arises is the present passing into the future. 
Past, present and future belong to a passage which attains 
temporal structure through the event, and they may be con- 
sidered long or short as they are compared with other such 
passages. But as existing in nature, so far as such a state- 
ment has significance, the past and the future are the bound- 
aries of what we term the present, and are determined by the 
conditioning relationships of the event to its situation. 

The pasts and futures to which we refer extend beyond 
these contiguous relations in passage. We extend them out 
in memory and history, in anticipation and forecast. They 
are preeminently the field of ideation, and find their locus 
in what is called mind. While they are in the present, they 
refer to that which is not in that present, as is indicated by 
their relation to past and future. They refer beyond them- 
selves and out of this reference arises their representational 
nature. They evidently belong to organisms, that is to 
emergent events whose nature involves the tendency to main- 
tain themselves. In other words their situation involves 
adjustment looking toward a past, and selective sensitivity 
looking toward a future. What may be called the stuff out 
of which ideas arise are the attitudes of these organisms, 
habits when we look toward the past, and early adjust- 
ments within the act to the results of their responses when 
we look toward the future. So far these belong to what 
may be termed the immediate past and future. 

This relation of the event to its situation, of the organism 
to its environment, with their mutual dependence, brings us 
to relativity, and to the perspectives in which this appears 
in experience. The nature of environment answers to the 
habits and selective attitudes of organisms, and the quali- 
ties that belong to the objects of the environment can only 
be expressed in terms of sensitivities of these organisms. 
And the same is true of ideas. The organism, through its 



THE PRESENT 25 

habits and anticipatory attitudes, finds itself related to what 
extends beyond its immediate present. Those characters 
of things which in the activity of the organism refer to what 
lies beyond the present take on the value of that to which 
they refer. The field of mind, then, is the larger environ- 
ment which the activity of the organism calls for but which 
transcends the present. What is present in the organism, 
however, is its own nascent activity, and that in itself and 
in the environment which sustains it, and there is present 
also its movement from the past and beyond the present. 
It belongs to the so-called conscious organism to complete 
this larger temporal environment by the use of characters 
found in the present. The mechanism by which the social 
mind accomplishes this I will discuss later; what I wish to 
bring out now is that the field of mind is the temporal ex- 
tension of the environment of the organism, and that an idea 
resides in the organism because the organism is using that 
in itself which moves beyond its present to take the place 
of that toward which its own activity is tending. That in 
the organism which provides the occasion for mind is the 
activity which reaches beyond the present within which the 
organism exists. 

But in such an account as this I have been implicitly 
setting up this larger period within which, say, an organism 
begins and completes its history as there seemingly in in- 
dependence of any present, and it is my purpose to insist 
upon the opposite proposition that these larger periods can 
have no reality except as they exist in presents and that all 
their implications and values are there located. Of course 
this comes back, first, to the evident fact that all the appara- 
tus of the past, memory images, historical monuments, fossil 
remains and the like are in some present, and, second, to 
that portion of the past which is there in passage in ex- 
perience as determined by the emergent event. It comes 



26 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

back, third, to the necessary test of the formulation of the 
past in the rjsing events in experience. The past we are 
talking about lies with all its characters within that present. 

There is, however, the assumed implication that this 
present refers to entities which have a reality independent 
of this and any other present, whose full detail, though of 
course beyond recall, is inevitably presumed. Now there 
is a confusion between such a metaphysical assumption and 
the evident fact that we are unable to reveal all that is in- 
volved in any present. Here we stand with Newton before 
a boundless sea and are only gathering the pebbles upon 
its shore. There is nothing transcendent about this power- 
lessness of our minds to exhaust any situation. Any advance 
which makes toward greater knowledge simply extends the 
horizon of experience, but all remains within conceivable 
experience. A greater mind than Newton's or Einstein's 
would reveal in experience, in the world that is there, struc- 
tures and processes that we cannot find nor even adumbrate. 
Or take Bergson's conception of all our memories, or all 
occurrences in the form of images, crowding in upon us, 
and held back by a central nervous system. All of this is 
conceivable in a present whose whole richness should be 
at the disposal of that very present. This does not mean 
that the aeons revealed in those structures and processes, 
or the histories which those images connote would unroll 
themselves in a present as temporally extended as their 
formulation implies. It means, in so far as such an un- 
bridled conception or imagination can have meaning, that 
we should have an inconceivable richness offered to our 
analysis in the approach to any problem arising in experience. 

The past in passage is irrecoverable as well as irrevocable. 
It is producing all the reality that there is. The meaning 
of that which is, is illuminated and expanded in the face 
of the emergent in experience, like (a+b) to the 25th power 



THE PRESENT 27 

by the binomial theorem, by the expansion of the passage 
which is going on. To say that the Declaration of Inde- 
pendence was signed on the 4th of July 1776 means that in 
the time system which we carry around with us and with 
the formulation of our political habits, this date comes out 
in our celebrations. Being what we are in the social and 
physical world that we inhabit we account for what takes 
place on this time schedule, but like railway time-tables it 
is always subject to change without notice. Christ was born 
four years before A.D. 

Our reference is always to the structure of the present, 
and our test of the formulation we make is always that of 
successfully carrying out our calculations and observations 
in a rising future. If we say that something happened at 
such a date, whether we can ever specify it or not, we must 
mean that if in imagination we put ourselves back at the 
supposed date we should have had such an experience, but 
this is not what we are concerned with when we work out 
the history of the past. It is the import of what is going 
on in action or appreciation which requires illumination and 
direction, because of the constant appearance of the novel 
from whose standpoint our experience calls for a reconstruc- 
tion which includes the past. 

The best approach to this import is found in the world 
within which our problems arise. Its things are enduring 
things that are what they are because of the conditioning 
character of passage. Their past is in what they are. Such 
a past is not eventual. When we elaborate the history of a 
tree whose wood is found in the chairs in which we sit, all 
the way from the diatom to the oak but lately felled, this 
history revolves about the constant re-interpretation of facts 
that are continually arising; nor are these novel facts to be 
found simply in the impact of changing human experiences 
upon a world that is there. For, in the first place, human 



30 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

them by their agreement with the accepted record; but this 
accepted past lies in a present and is subject, itself, to 
possible reconstruction. 

Now it is possible to accept all this, with a full admission 
that no item in the accepted past is final, and yet to maintain 
that there remains a reference in our formulation of the 
past event to a something that happened which we can never 
expect to resuscitate in the content of reality, something that 
belonged to the event in the present within which it occurred. 
This amounts to saying that there is behind us a scroll of 
elapsed presents, to which our constructions of the past 
refer, though without the possibility of ever reaching it, and 
without the anticipation that our continual reconstructions 
will approach it with increasing exactness. And this brings 
me to the point at issue. Such a scroll, if attained, is not the 
account that our pasts desiderate. If we could bring back 
the present that has elapsed in the reality which belonged to 
it, it would not serve us. It would be that present and would 
lack just that character which we demand in the past, that 
is, that construction of the conditioning nature of now pres- 
ent passage which enables us to interpret what is arising in 
the future that belongs to this present. When one recalls 
his boyhood days he cannot get into them as he then was, 
without their relationship to what he has become; and if he 
could, that is if he could reproduce the experience as it 
then took place, he could not use it, for this would involve his 
not being in the present within which that use must take 
place. A string of presents conceivably existing as presents 
would never constitute a past. If then there is such a 
reference it is not to an entity which could fit into any past, 
and I cannot believe that the reference, in the past as experi- 
enced, is to a something which would not have the function 
or value that in our experience belongs to a past. We are 
not referring to a real past event which would not be the 
past event we are seeking. Another way of saying this is 



THE PRESENT 31 

that our pasts are always mental in the same manner in which 
the futures that lie in our imaginations ahead of us are 
mental. They differ, apart from their successive positions, 
in that the determining conditions of interpretation and 
conduct are embodied in the past as that is found in the 
present, but they are subject to the same test of validity 
to which our hypothetical futures are subject. And the 
novelty of every future demands a novel past. 

This, however, overlooks one important character of any 
past, and that is that no past which we can construct can 
be as adequate as the situation demands. There is always 
a reference to a past which cannot be reached, and one that 
is still consonant with the function and import of a past. 
It is always conceivable that the implications of the present 
should be carried further than we do actually carry them, 
and further than we can possibly carry them. There is al- 
ways more knowledge which would be desirable for the solu- 
tion of any problem confronting us but which we cannot 
attain. With the conceivable attainment of this knowledge 
we should undoubtedly construct a past truer to the present 
within which the implications of this past lie. And it is 
to this past that there is always a reference within every 
past which imperfectly presents itself to our investigation. 
If we had every possible document and every possible monu- 
ment from the period of Julius Caesar we should unquestion- 
ably have a truer picture of the man and of what occurred in 
his life-time, but it would be a truth which belongs to this 
present, and a later present would reconstruct it from the 
standpoint of its own emergent nature. We can then con- 
ceive of a past which in any one present would be irrefra- 
gable. So far as that present was concerned it would be a 
final past, and if we consider the matter, I think that it is 
this past to which the reference lies in that which goes beyond 
the statement which the historian can give, and which we 
are apt to assume to be a past independent of the present. 



30 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

them by their agreement with the accepted record; but this 
accepted past lies in a present and is subject, itself, to 
possible reconstruction. 

Now it is possible to accept all this, with a full admission 
that no item in the accepted past is final, and yet to maintain 
that there remains a reference in our formulation of the 
past event to a something that happened which we can never 
expect to resuscitate in the content of reality, something that 
belonged to the event in the present within which it occurred. 
This amounts to saying that there is behind us a scroll of 
elapsed presents, to which our constructions of the past 
refer, though without the possibility of ever reaching it, and 
without the anticipation that our continual reconstructions 
will approach it with increasing exactness. And this brings 
me to the point at issue. Such a scroll, if attained, is not the 
account that our pasts desiderate. If we could bring back 
the present that has elapsed in the reality which belonged to 
it, it would not serve us. It would be that present and would 
lack just that character which we demand in the past, that 
is, that construction of the conditioning nature of now pres- 
ent passage which enables us to interpret what is arising in 
the future that belongs to this present. When one recalls 
his boyhood days he cannot get into them as he then was, 
without their relationship to what he has become; and if he 
could, that is if he could reproduce the experience as it 
then took place, he could not use it, for this would involve his 
not being in the present within which that use must take 
place. A string of presents conceivably existing as presents 
would never constitute a past. If then there is such a 
reference it is not to an entity which could fit into any past, 
and I cannot believe that the reference, in the past as experi- 
enced, is to a something which would not have the function 
or value that in our experience belongs to a past. We are 
not referring to a real past event which would not be the 
past event we are seeking. Another way of saying this is 



THE PRESENT 31 

that our pasts are always mental in the same manner in which 
the futures that lie in our imaginations ahead of us are 
mental. They differ, apart from their successive positions, 
in that the determining conditions of interpretation and 
conduct are embodied in the past as that is found in the 
present, but they are subject to the same test of validity 
to which our hypothetical futures are subject. And the 
novelty of every future demands a novel past. 

This, however, overlooks one important character of any 
past, and that is that no past which we can construct can 
be as adequate as the situation demands. There is always 
a reference to a past which cannot be reached, and one that 
is still consonant with the function and import of a past. 
It is always conceivable that the implications of the present 
should be carried further than we do actually carry them, 
and further than we can possibly carry them. There is al- 
ways more knowledge which would be desirable for the solu- 
tion of any problem confronting us but which we cannot 
attain. With the conceivable attainment of this knowledge 
we should undoubtedly construct a past truer to the present 
within which the implications of this past lie. And it is 
to this past that there is always a reference within every 
past which imperfectly presents itself to our investigation. 
If we had every possible document and every possible monu- 
ment from the period of Julius Caesar we should unquestion- 
ably have a truer picture of the man and of what occurred in 
his life-time, but it would be a truth which belongs to this 
present, and a later present would reconstruct it from the 
standpoint of its own emergent nature. We can then con- 
ceive of a past which in any one present would be irrefra- 
gable. So far as that present was concerned it would be a 
final past, and if we consider the matter, I think that it is 
this past to which the reference lies in that which goes beyond 
the statement which the historian can give, and which we 
are apt to assume to be a past independent of the present. 



CHAPTER II 

EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 

I have spoken of the present as the seat of reality be- 
cause its character of a present sheds light upon the nature 
of reality. The past and the future that appear in the present 
may be regarded as merely the thresholds of a minute bit of 
an unbounded extension whose metaphysical reality reduces 
the present to a negligible element that approaches the world 
at an instant. This view of reality as an infinite scroll un- 
rolling in snatches before our intermittent vision receives 
another variant in the picture of reality as a four-dimensional 
continuum of space-time, of events and intervals, forever 
determined by its own geometry, and into which we venture 
with our own subjective frames of reference, receiving mo- 
mentary impressions whose present character is a function 
of our minds and not of any section of the ordered events 
in the universe. I have suggested that such an approach 
to reality does not answer to the scientific technique and 
method by which we seek for disclosures of the universe. 
Scientific procedure fastens upon that necessary conditioning 
of what takes place by what has taken place which follows 
from passage itself. In space-time relations, that is, in 
motion, this conditioning may reach the certainty of deduc- 
tion, though even here we stand before the possibility that 
our conclusions may often rest upon statistical results which 
negate the final determination which we seek. There is 
evidence that the very effort to refine the technique to ab- 
solute precision defeats itself. Then there is the other branch 
of this determination of passage which we refer to under the 
caption of probability. Whatever our doctrine of probability, 

32 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 33 

we assume that the happening of earlier events carries with 
it a probability as to the nature of later events, even if this 
probability can be reckoned only on a theory of chances. 
The basis of this determination of the future by the past is 
found in the fact that something is taking place which has 
a temporal spread that reality cannot be reduced to in- 
stants and that earlier stages must be conditions of later 
phases. It is the undertaking of science to find out what it 
is that is going on. 

Furthermore the study of passage involves the discovery 
of events. These cannot be simply parts of passage. These 
events have always characters of uniqueness. Time can 
only arise through the ordering of passage by these unique 
events. The scientist finds such events in his observations 
and experiments. The relation of any event to the conditions 
under which it occurs is what we term causation. The rela- 
tion of the event to its preceding conditions at once sets up 
a history, and the uniqueness of the event makes that history 
relative to that event. The conditioning passage and the 
appearance of the unique event then give rise to past and 
future as they appear in a present. All of the past is in 
the present as the conditioning nature of passage, and all 
the future arises out of the present as the unique events that 
transpire. To unravel this existent past in the present and 
on the basis of it to previse the future is the task of science. 
The method is that of ideation. 

I have indicated that we find in the living form an in- 
dividual thing that maintains itself through the mutual 
determination of the form and its environment. The sur- 
rounding world is so related to the animal or plant by their 
sensitivity and response that the life process continues. Over 
against the animal the world is one of food, shelter, pro- 
tection or their opposites. Over against the inanimate thing 
the surroundings do not exhibit characters that answer to the 



34 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

action of the thing in being what it is. A boulder is a defi- 
nite thing with its own mass and form, but its relations to 
things about it do not give rise to qualities in them which 
through the contacts, weight, or momentum of the boulder 
conserve the boulder. The boulder has no environment in 
the sense in which the animal has an environment. The back- 
ground of the inanimate object is that of conservation in 
our present day formulation, of the conservation of energy. 
No transformation affects the reality of the physical system. 
We have reduced matter and mass, in terms of which this 
presupposition was earlier formulated, to energy, but the 
essential feature of the doctrine has been that reality does 
not lie in the form for there may be endless transforma- 
tion but in the matter, mass or energy. While, then, there 
has been a history of a stellar body, which may be traced in 
a causal series, science grasps the reality of the star only 
as it conceives of it as energy, which is unaffected whether 
the form of the body becomes a binary or a planetary 
system. The particular form of an inanimate body is ir- 
relevant to "what it is." For such bodies the environment is 
as unessential as the object. 

Plants and animals, however, present to science objects 
whose essential characters are found not in that which under- 
goes transformation but in the process itself and in the forms 
which the object assumes within that process. Since the 
process involves the interaction of animal or plant with 
surrounding objects, it is evident that the process of life as 
really confers characters upon the environment as it does 
upon the plant or the animal. However, plants and animals 
are physical objects as well as living objects. As physical 
objects their reality can be reduced to the whatever it is that 
is undergoing transformation, and their forms become un- 
essential. As such they must be brought within the sweep 
of the physicist's and the chemist's doctrine. The life process 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 35 

is bound to disappear in the reduction of these processes to 
expressions of energy. The introduction of a vital force 
would help matters not at all; if it could be found it would 
inevitably be subject to the same reduction. 

The difference between the physicist and the biologist 
evidently lies in the goals which their sciences contemplate, 
in the realities they are seeking. And their procedure an- 
swers to their goals. That of the physical scientist is reduc- 
tion and that of the biologist is production. The biologist 
cannot investigate until he has got a life process going. He 
must, however, have physical means for this process and must 
therefore be a physicist as well as a biologist. If he reduces 
the reality of the life process to the means he is using he 
becomes a mechanist. If the life process appears to him a 
reality that has emerged out of the physical world, and his 
study is of the conditions under which it maintains itself, 
he is a teleologist. These two attitudes come into conflict 
with each other only if on the one hand he denies reality to 
the process because he can reduce to energy the objects that 
enter into it, and therefore refuses to recognize that the 
process that he is investigating is a reality that has arisen; 
or if, on the other hand, he states the physical and chemical 
things that enter into the process solely in terms of the 
process, and thus makes them Aristotelian qualities or ad- 
jectives. If he thus takes the position that all constituents 
of things are really potentialities of the thing which imply its 
pre-existence, then the biologist becomes an Aristotelian or, 
in a modern atmosphere, a "type" idealist; and, if he is 
consistent, surrenders the field of scientific research, and 
denies the possibility of emergence as well. 

What I have wished to emphasize in this reference to the 
emergence of life is that it confers upon the world characters 
quite as genuine as those it confers upon living beings. This 
fact is recognized in the term environment. We are apt 



36 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to use the term in a phenomenalistic fashion, to lodge the 
reality of the environment in its physical reduction to mass 
or energy, and to allow a real significance to the relation of 
the animal to his surroundings only in so far as these can be 
stated in physical and chemical terms. The reality of food, 
for example, is then found in the atoms or electrons and pro- 
tons of which it is composed, and its nutritive character is a 
mere concession to our interest in an isolated group of hap- 
penings going on about us. As I have indicated, we cannot 
preserve this attitude without denying a fundamental reality 
to life. If life is a reality, its operation within form and 
environment must confer its characters within its whole field 
of operation. If an animal digests, there must exist a food 
which the animal digests. Another fashion in which to pre- 
sent the situation is in terms of the contrast between the 
conditions of that which takes place, and the conditioned 
occurrence. It has back of it also the distinction between 
things and events. The passing event solidifies into the 
thing as it becomes in the present the fixed conditions of later 
occurrences. Good digestion, health, and life itself are con- 
ditions for the varied activities which the future holds, and 
as such they are things that constitute some of our most 
precious possessions. They are, in especial, those contents 
to which varying characters or accidents are attached. In 
other words, they tend to become substances, being con- 
creted by the fact that, having transpired, their conditioning 
nature, whatever it may be, is fixed. Thus the future is con- 
tinually qualifying the past in the present. 

The distinction which I indicated above between reduction 
and production falls in with that between our attitudes to- 
ward past and future respectively. The past we reduce to 
dependable conditions, and all the rich context of the future 
as it takes place, if it is to be comprehensible and serviceable, 
must be woven into this dependable web. Thus new things 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 37 

continually arise, the novelty of whose occurrence is worn 
down into the reliability of that which becomes familiar. 
But the thing is preeminently the physical thing of contact 
experience. We find here the fundamental relation between 
the future and the past in the present. The distance experi- 
ence is the promise of contact experience. The something we 
can get hold of is the substance to which the qualities of 
sound, color, taste and odor belong. In the immediate per- 
ceptual world what we can handle is the reality to which 
what is seen and heard must be brought to the test, if 
we are to escape illusion and hallucination. The develop- 
ment of the distance receptors with their inner apparatus, the 
encephalon, has endowed the higher animals with a future 
which could become effective only in proportion as it was 
stretched out behind into the past in which the contact ex- 
periences that were promised or threatened by sight or sound 
were made specific by the finer adjustments of the hand in 
manipulation. 

It was the peculiar advantage of Newtonian mechanics 
that its fundamental concept of mass was so closely corre- 
lated with the weight and volume of contact experience. It 
has always been easy for us to imagine the subdivision of 
perceptual objects into mass particles, and to translate inertia, 
force and momentum into the effort which contact experiences 
call out. In this mechanical doctrine the reliable conditions 
to which science has reduced the past have been made in- 
herent in the mass particle, and the mass particle could be 
regarded as a refinement of the physical thing of the per- 
ceptual world. It is this peculiar agreement of the physical 
thing in science with the thing of perception that has given 
the so-called materialism of the doctrine its vogue. It is 
in no small degree to this correlation that we must attribute 
our instinctive tendency to ascribe the reality of life to the 
physical and chemical changes of inanimate things. The 



38 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

Aristotelian found no difficulty in recognizing life as a nature 
that could belong to things, for he had no scientifically 
schooled imagination that could exhibit to him subperceptual 
physical things accomplishing living processes. Democritus 
offered this latter hypothesis, though without its experimental 
verification. I wish, however, to insist that the essential 
fallacy in this materialism, lies not in its assumption of a 
massive character for ultimate physical things for mass has 
already disappeared in energy but in the assumption that 
it is possible to give an exhaustive account of any event that 
takes place in terms of the conditions of its occurrence. I 
will not say that we cannot conceive of a passage within 
which nothing happens, but I do make bold to say that every 
event by which it becomes possible to differentiate passage 
must have a unique character which cannot be resolved into 
the conditions under which the event happens. The attempt 
so to resolve it leads not so much to materialism as to 
identical equations and a changeless Parmenidean block of 
reality. If this is true there is, of course, nothing peculiar 
in the emergence of life or of consciousness so-called. They 
may have had more import than other unique occurrences but 
other events have been as genuinely unique as they and have 
been as genuinely involved in the process of reality. 

The striking feature in the appearance of life is that the 
process that constitutes the reality of a living being is one 
that extends beyond the form itself and involves for its 
expression the world within which this form lives. The 
reality of the process thus belongs to the world in its rela- 
tion to the living being. This is referred to in the terms, 
form and environment. It is an expression of relativity in 
terms of life. The world is evidently a different affair for 
the plant and for the animal, and differs for different species 
of plants and animals. They have different environments. 
That we may reduce all of these to the physical world of 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 39 

the conditions under which life can go on, which is the field 
within which so-called purely physical processes take place, 
does not wipe out these various environments as aspects of 
reality. 

The doctrine of relativity at present connotes a similar 
relation between any moving object or group of objects mov- 
ing with the same velocity and in the same sense, and the 
rest of the world within which this consentient set 1 
is moving. The spatial, temporal and energic characters 
of objects vary with the velocity of their motion in relation 
to the world that is at rest in respect to this moving consen- 
tient set. But, unlike the living form and its environment, 
the consentient set which is moving may be regarded as at 
rest, while its environment will then be regarded as moving 
with like velocity and in an opposite sense. The effect of 
relativity is then to carry what I have termed the reduction 
of physical science still farther; for if the same reality may 
appear indifferently as the motion of one set with reference 
to another at rest or as the motion of the second set with 
reference to the first, which is now at rest, it is evident 
that the temporal character of the objects at rest, their 
endurance or passage, must in some way be equated with 
the temporal character of the same objects in motion. The 
point-track of the first situation becomes equal to the 
translation in the second situation. We pass inevitably 
into a continuum in which time becomes a dimension. What 
was motion has become the interval between events in 
space-time, which, regarded from different standpoints, may 
be either rest or motion. A simpler if cruder way of saying 
this is that the reality of motion does not lie in the change 
but in the relative positions of things, regarded as events, 
with reference to each other. 



1 This term, with much of the exposition that follows, is borrowed 
from Whitehead, "Principles of Natural Knowledge," 2nd ed., chapter 3. 



40 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

In the Newtonian world a boxlike space, conceivably 
filled with a stagnant ether, whose structure was irrelevant 
to time, was the absolute environment of all change, i. e., for 
the physical sciences, of all motion. The new absolute 
space-time is not the environment of anything for there is 
nothing going on there. There are only the events at inter- 
vals from each other. There is an ordered geometry of this 
continuum, and matter may be translated into this geometry 
in terms of curvature. 

Something more has happened here than the disappear- 
ance of absolute space and time. These had already dis- 
appeared with the advent of a relational theory of space 
and time. It is no more possible to get evidence of an 
absolute motion from the standpoint of a relational theory 
than it is from the standpoint of relativity. What the 
Michelson-Morley experiment undertook to show was not 
the absolute motion of the earth through space, but its mo- 
tion through the stagnant ether that was the accepted 
medium of light. But a new problem arose when Einstein 
proved that, by any system of measurement which could be 
instituted, the measurement of distances and times in a 
moving system from the standpoint of a system at rest 
would give a different result from that reached if the meas- 
urement took place within the moving system. The yard- 
stick in the moving system would be shorter and the time 
measured would be longer. And this fell in with the trans- 
formations that Lorentz found necessary if Maxwell's 
electro-magnetic equations were to be rendered invariant. 
There was the same variation in the values of space, time 
and energy; and there appeared the constant value of light, 
which Einstein assumed for his measurement by signals. 
And this concurrent speculation by physicist and mathema- 
tician exactly accounted for the negative result of the 
Michelson-Morley experiment. On this new hypothesis, 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 41 

not only was it shown that evidence of an absolute motion 
was meaningless, but the process of measurement itself was 
shown, when it involved moving objects, to be highly com- 
plex, and to call for more complex mathematics and the 
genius of Einstein, who showed that the accepted results of 
Newtonian mathematics were but first approximations to 
more exact formulations. Thus the reduction of the con- 
ditions under which the measurements of exact science are 
made has been carried back of the structure of the space 
and time that had hitherto been presupposed. And the same 
is true of matter. The two attitudes with reference to 
matter which lie back of our perception and our thought are 
indicated in the two definitions which Newton gave of 
mass as quantity of matter, and as the measure of inertia. 
The first is not capable of scientific use, since it presupposes 
determination of density; but it indicates a prevalent at- 
titude of mind, the assumption of something that has a nature 
within itself, that can be grasped in independence of the 
relations into which it enters with other objects. Inertia 
can be grasped only through the relations of a body to other 
bodies. The attempt to define mass in terms of inertia 
leads to a circle mass is defined in terms of force and force 
defined in terms of mass. It is necessary to presuppose a 
system in order to define the objects that make up the 
system. But the conception of a physical thing simply as 
that which occupies a certain volume, even if it did not pro- 
vide a determinable quantity of matter, at least appeared 
to offer to the mind the objects out of which the system 
was to be built up. We meet the same conception in the 
hypothetical body Alpha which was suggested as located 
beyond the gravitational field, and as providing a fixed 
physical entity from the standpoint of which the physical 
universe could be oriented. If now we state the "what 
it is" of a body in terms of energy, we are implying a sys- 



42 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

tern as there in advance of the objects that make up the 
system. We have pushed our statement of the conditions 
which determine the nature of objects back of the percep- 
tual object, and back of the subperceptual object of the 
Newtonian doctrine which merged so easily with perceptual 
experience. And we have lost the conception of an environ- 
ment, such as that of the Newtonian space and Newtonian 
mass particles, within which the affairs of the physical uni- 
verse can go on. For a space-time continuum does not 
provide such an environment. It is a metaphysical world 
of things in themselves, to which there may be a reference 
in the mathematical apparatus which we are obliged to use, 
but which does not provide us with an environment. It 
lacks the characters that are conferred upon an environment 
by an organism through its relationship to it, and has a 
nature out of which both organism and environment have 
arisen, and which may therefore be regarded as independent 
of them. The world of the physical and chemical sciences 
provides the conditions for life and the surroundings within 
which life may be lived. Evidently a world that lies beyond 
possible experience cannot be the environment of experience. 
Nor can we regard two consentient sets moving with refer- 
ence to each other as standing in the relation of form and 
environment, though the movement of one set confers upon 
the other a certain structure due to that movement. The 
fact that either set may be regarded as in motion, at least 
in so far as this change in structure is concerned, would 
make the conception of form and environment inappropriate. 
What we seek in the environment is a statement of the 
world out of which the emergent has arisen, and conse- 
quently the conditions under which the emergent must 
exist, even though this emergence has made a different world 
through its appearance. Newtonian matter in Newtonian 
space provided an original environment within which all 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 43 

changes took place, and Alexander presented space and 
time as such an environment out of which emerged matter, 
qualities, life, mind and deity. His philosophy was that of 
an emergent evolution, as the biologist Morgan presented 
it. 2 It had the historical sense which belonged to the period 
of evolution. Relativity does not belong to that period. 
Its more profound reductions of the exact conditions of 
existence open no doors toward the past. The early attempt 
to give it a metaphysical formulation eliminates change. It 
reduces time to a dimension on a parity with those of space, 
and substitutes geometry for history. Whitehead has in- 
deed undertaken to preserve motion and change within a 
relativistic universe. He would keep the different time 
systems as perspectives in nature, but that he has avoided 
the rigidity of the geometry of the space-time continuum 
I cannot see, nor can I see how the ingression of eternal 
objects into events so determined can open the door to the 
contingent. 

But it is not in these early metaphysical precipitates that 
I am interested. What does stand out from relativistic phys- 
ical theory is that the reduction of the conditions of change, 
or in this case motion, has been carried so far back that 
change or motion itself disappears. Nor do we reach a 
situation out of which the change arises except in so far 
as we set up a metaphysical realm which cannot be an en- 
vironment within which the change takes place. On the 
contrary, space-time becomes a reality of which change is a 
subjective reflection. The same is true if we undertake to 
push back a theory of energy as the "what it is" of the 
physical object to the situations within which arise the ob- 
jects which, as such, constitute the systems within which 
energy may be measured. Ostwald suggested such a doc- 

2 Cf. Alexander, "Space, Time, and Deity," Book III and Lloyd Mor- 
gan, "Emergent Evolution," chapter 1. 



44 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

trine as this that is, he set up energy as a metaphysical 
entity which does not as such come within the range of 
physical stuff, an entity that can constitute an object in 
advance of the systems into which it can enter. Mass as 
quantity of matter offered such a conception, though it was 
not subject to exact definition. Still, it could be held in 
thought as the occupied volume, which exhibited itself in 
the resistance of inertia, and hence could be held in thought 
as a presupposition of the system of things. But an energy 
that can take various forms and still remain the same loses 
this empirical value. It can be presented in an object only 
in so far as a system of that type is already there. There 
must be an electro-magnetic system on hand to present an 
electron. To present a body whose content is so much 
energy in advance of the system is to posit a metaphysical 
realm which does not come within the range within which 
the scientist's hypotheses operate. This offers no difficulty 
as long as the hypotheses are occupied with the situations 
in which systems are already there. The "what it is" 
of the object can be defined in terms of the system. But 
the conception of energy as the nature of the physical thing 
does not provide us with an environment within which we 
can build up the system. Both the conceptions of relativity 
and of energy as the nature of the physical thing indicate 
that we have pushed our technique of exact measurement 
and our analysis beyond the point of historicity, i.e., we 
cannot go back to such a logical beginning as Alexander 
presented in his sweeping philosophy of emergence or evo- 
lution, or if we do we must reach it in some metaphysical 
realm which transcends scientific thought. 

The striking fact is that these two phases of what I have 
called the reduction of the conditioning of passage the 
conditions of measurement of that which is moving from 
the standpoint of that which is at rest and the implica- 



EMERGENCE AND IDENTITY 45 

tions of accepting energy as the "what it is" of the physical 
object I refer to the Larmor and Lorentz transformations 
as the conditions of the invariance of the Maxwell equa- 
tions should have come to the same conclusion at almost 
the same moment. The effect was to remove from the 
background of scientific thought an independent space and 
time within which a physical universe could be built up, and 
a matter which could be thought of in logical independence 
of the systems of things which were built up out of it. This 
background of historicity disappeared with relativity and 
the electro-magnetic theory of matter. For Newton space 
was the garment of God, and mass atoms were the pre- 
existent building stones out of which the world was con- 
structed. The influence of such conceptions as an absolute 
space and mass particles led to the search for reality in 
causal series running back to ultimate entities that were the 
exactly measurable conditions of present reality. It was not 
at all necessary that such an implied absolute beginning 
should have been presupposed in determinate thought, but 
the concepts carried with them a set of mind that found 
reality in the conditions which, spread out, constitute the 
absolute past. The disappearance of an absolute space and 
the relegation of mass to a more general conception of 
energy emphasize present scientific findings as the test and 
seat of reality. Does the hypothesis of the preceding causal 
conditions fit into the data of observation and the laboratory? 
As long as it accomplishes this function its consonance with 
an ordered picture of a mechanical process is of no impor- 
tance. Any hypothesis such as a wave theory of matter is 
welcome. Its test lies in its functioning. The set of the 
scientific mind toward its reality is away from the past and 
toward a present which carries within it the test of actual 
findings. 
Yet we cannot desist from setting up histories; indeed 



46 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

they become more fascinating. Compare for instance the 
excitement of Eddington's or Jeans' histories of stellar bodies 
with the monotony of a Newtonian mechanical structure 
or the Kantian or Laplacean hypotheses. But they carry 
with them no finality. We expect them to change with 
new problems and with new findings, and we should be 
greatly disappointed if they did not change. Nor do we 
expect them to become internally more consistent as in 
the case of the deciphering of an obscure manuscript. In 
scientific procedure there is no longer anything that con- 
flicts with new pasts arising with emergent events. 



CHAPTER III 

THE SOCIAL NATURE OF THE PRESENT 

The social nature of the present arises out of its emergence. 
I am referring to the process of readjustment that emergence 
involves. Nature takes on new characters, for example with 
the appearance of life, or the stellar system takes on new 
characters with the loss of mass by the collapse of atoms 
through the processes that go on within a star. There is an 
adjustment to this new situation. The new objects enter 
into relationship with the old. The determining conditions 
of passage set the conditions under which they survive, and 
the old objects enter into new relations with what has arisen. 
I am here using the term "social" with reference not to the 
new system, but to the process of readjustment. An out- 
standing illustration is found in ecology. There is an answer 
in the community in the meadow or the forest to the entrance 
of any new form, if that form can survive. When the new 
form has established its citizenship the botanist can exhibit 
the mutual adjustments that have taken place. The world 
has become a different world because of the advent, but to 
identify sociality with this result is to identify it with system 
merely. It is rather the stage betwixt and between the old 
system and the new that I am referring to. If emergence is 
a feature of reality this phase of adjustment, which comes be- 
tween the ordered universe before the emergent has arisen 
and that after it has come to terms with the newcomer, must 
be a feature also of reality. It can be illustrated in the ap- 
pearance of a planet upon the hypothetical approach of the 
stellar visitor that occasioned the origin of our planetary 
system. There was a period at which the substance of our 

47 



48 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

own earth was part of the sun's revolving outer sheath. Now 
it is a body separated from the stellar mass, still revolving, 
but in its own orbit. The fact that the planet is exhibiting 
the same momentum in its distant orbit as that which carried 
it about the star before its advent as a planet, does not do 
away with the fact that there is now a planetary system 
where here was formerly only a single stellar body, nor with 
that stage in which the substance of the planet to be was in 
both systems. Now what we are accustomed to call social 
is only a so-called consciousness of such a process, but the 
process is not identical with the consciousness of it, for that 
is an awareness of the situation. The social situation must 
be there if there is to be consciousness of it. 

Now it is clear that such a social character can belong 
only to the moment at which emergence takes place, that is 
to a present. We may in ideation recall the process, but 
such a past is not a reintegration of the affair as it went on, 
for it is undertaken from the standpoint of the present 
emergence, and is frankly hypothetical. It is the past that 
our present calls for, and it is tested by its fitting into that 
situation. If, per impossible, we were to reach that past 
event as it took place we should have to be in that event, and 
then compare it with what we now present as its history. 
This is not only a contradiction in terms, but it also belies 
the function of the past in experience. This function is a 
continual reconstruction as a chronicle to serve the purposes 
of present interpretation. We seem to approach this com- 
plete recall, if I may use this expression, in identifying the 
fundamental laws of nature, such as thpse of motion, which 
we say must have been and must always be what they are 
now; and it is here that relativity is most illuminating. It 
frankly reduces the sort of reality that could be the identical 
content of past, present and future to an ordered arrange- 
ment of events in a space-time that, by definition, could be 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 49 

as little in any past of scientific imagination as it could be 
found in our perceptual world. The geometry of space-time 
denies emergence unless it is brought in by way of White- 
head's metaphysics; and if I am not mistaken such a view 
must surrender the ordered geometry of space-time that 
Whitehead retains. Without emergence there are no dis- 
tinguishable events thanks to which time emerges. The 
events and intervals to which the relativist refers are the con- 
stants that shake out of the elaborate mathematics which the 
realization of the social character of the universe has shown 
to be necessary. 

The social character of the universe we find in the situa- 
tion in which the novel event is in both the old order and 
the new which its advent heralds. Sociality is the capacity 
of being several things at once. The animal traverses the 
ground in pursuit of his prey, and is at once a part of the 
system of distribution of energies which makes his locomo- 
tion possible and a part of the jungle system which is a 
part of the life system on the surface of the inanimate globe. 
Now we recognize that if we are to estimate the energy of 
locomotion that he is going to expend we must take into 
account his ferocity, his state of hunger and the attraction 
or fear that his prey excites within him, and equally we recog- 
nize that if we are to estimate these characteristics of the 
form we must be able to measure the energy-expressions in 
his organism and in the environment. There is as genuine a 
sociality in his relation to his environment as in his rela- 
tion to the prey or to his mate or to his pack, and the 
mark of it is that we habitually estimate characteristics 
that belong to the object as a member of one system by those 
which belong to it in another. So we measure motion by the 
distances covered in the consentient set at rest, or the di- 
mensions of that set by the motions involved in measure- 
ment. The relativist discovered that this mutual estimation 



SO THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

involved a change in the units of measurement, and that a 
transformation must be made if ideal exactness is to be at- 
tained. We seem to be in the same situation in biology. 
Accurately to estimate the living process in energy- 
distributions we should be able to transform inorganic 
physico-chemical process into organic process, which un- 
fortunately we have not been able to do. 

If we examine the bases of this estimation from one system 
to another we find two characteristics, one is the emergence 
of the event from the conditions under which it has ap- 
peared that which, as we have seen, gives rise to its history 
and may be brought under the general term of evolution. 
The second is the carrying on of identical conditions from 
the past into the present. The appearances of the planets, 
when related to the laws of mass and motion, fall into an 
ordered series, and from this standpoint the object is looked 
at as arising out of the old. From the standpoint of its 
emergence it is considered as in both systems, but only in so 
far common laws obtain in each. The substance of the aris- 
ing planet is a piece of the sun, moving with the momentum 
which belongs to it in that capacity, and it is also an object 
in a system within which the sun has a definite mass that 
follows from the mass and motion of the planet with refer- 
ence to the sun. In a similar fashion in Galilean dynamics 
accelerations and decelerations were emergents in a field of 
motion of masses in an absolute space. 

It remained for relativity to set up motion itself as an 
entity which arises under certain conditions those of frames 
of reference out of logically antecedent conditions of events 
at intervals from each other within space-time. But these 
conditions no longer lie within the range of possible experi- 
ence. It remains true however that what is motion from 
one standpoint within experience is rest from another. The 
relativity of motion had long been recognized. With the sur- 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 51 

render of absolute space and the successful development of 
Einstein's general relativity, the emergence of motion and 
rest out of the more abstract situation that expresses what 
is common to both frames of reference or perspectives and 
appears in one as motion and in the other as rest, seems 
to be logically demanded. And yet, as I have just indicated, 
such a formulation takes us outside the scheme of de- 
velopment I have sketched above. It involves the relation 
of appearance and reality, of the subjective and the ob- 
jectively real, not the relation of an emergent object arising 
out of the past to that which conditions it. We appear to 
have left an evolutionary philosophy of science and to be 
passing into a rationalistic phase in which reality is offered to 
us only in patterns of logic and mathematics. I suspect how- 
ever that we are much too close to the great changes which 
have taken place within the last fifty years to be able to 
get them into their proper perspective. 

I wish to suggest that the social character of the present 
offers another standpoint from which to regard this situa- 
tion. I have spoken of the social implications of the emergent 
present as offered in the occupation by the new object of the 
old system and the new, sociality as given in immediate rela- 
tion of the past and present. There is another aspect of 
sociality, that which is exhibited in the systematic character 
of the passing present. As we have seen, in the passage from 
the past into the future the present object is both the old 
and the new, and this holds for its relations to all other mem- 
bers of the system to which it belongs. Before the approach 
to our sun of the stellar visitor, the portion of the sun which 
became the earth was determined in its character by its 
relationships to those portions of the sun's substance which 
became the other planets. As it is drawn out into its plan- 
etary position it retains this character which arises from 
the former configuration and assumes the new character 



52 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

which is expressed in the perturbations of its orbit through 
the influences of its neighbors. The point is that a body 
belonging to a system, and having its nature determined by 
its relations to members of that system, when it passes into 
a new systematic order will carry over into its process of 
readjustment in the new system something of the nature of 
all members of the old. So in the history of a community, 
the members carry over from an old order their characters 
as determined by social relations into the readjustments of 
social change. The old system is found in each member and 
in a revolution becomes the structure upon which the new 
order is established. So Rousseau had to find both sovereign 
and subject in the citizen, and Kant had to find both the 
giver of the moral law and subject of the law in the rational 
being. To revert to the evolution of the planetary system, 
the earth's orbit still maps out the central sun of which it 
was a part, and its relative motions with reference to other 
members of the planetary system reflect their positions in 
the sun before the stellar visitor arrived. 

I have referred to the increase in mass of a moving object 
as an extreme example of sociality. That is, if we keep 
this increase in mass within the field of possible experience, 
we have to treat the moving body as in two different systems, 
for the moving object has its own time and space and mass 
due to its motion, which time, space and mass are different 
from those of the system relative to which it is moving. The 
paradoxes arising out of this occupation of a different 
system on the part of a moving body are familiar. What 
I wish to point out is that we reach here the extreme limit 
of this sociality, for every body, thanks to its velocity, has a 
certain space-time and energy system. This velocity is, how- 
ever, relative to the system within which the body is moving, 
and the body would have another velocity relative to an- 
other system moving with reference to the first. The body 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 53 

would then have an indefinite number of measurements of 
mass in the indefinite number of systems with reference to 
which it can be conceived of as moving. It is occupying all 
these different systems. 

Now we may set up a metaphysical space-time, with its 
coincidences of events and its intervals, as the reality to 
which these frames of reference refer, or we may keep within 
the field of experience and use the transformation formulae 
which have been shown to be necessary for exact measure- 
ment. The question arises as to just what is involved in the 
use of the transformation formulae. In the immediate situa- 
tions within which the relativity of motion is present in 
experience, such as the possibility of one's own train being 
in motion while the neighboring train is at rest, no transform- 
ation is required. In such cases we cover up the difference in 
time systems by saying that the differences in spatial and 
temporal dimensions are so impossibly small that they can- 
not be brought into application, that it is only when we reach 
velocities which approach that of light that appreciable differ- 
ences arise and call for recognition. This is covering up a 
matter of fundamental importance. When a train is passing 
us it is in our own world of space and time. If we should 
take the relativistic standpoint and regard the train as at rest 
and the earth as rushing by it, we should indeed be passing 
from one perspective to another, but then the train would not 
be moving, and in the present case the train is moving. 
When we calculate the change in spatial, temporal and mass 
characters of an alpha particle which is shot out of an atom, 
we are treating it, of course, as in another space-time than 
our own, for we are giving to it the dimensions that belong 
to its space-time including the change in mass character. 
Now from the standpoint of Newtonian relativity two space- 
time systems are alternatives, they cannot both be applied 
to the same situation, except alternatively. But when we 



54 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

use the Lorentz transformation formula, we are giving the 
body the characteristics which belong to another space-time 
system and using the result in our own. This is confessed 
when the statement is simply made that a body increases its 
mass with its velocity, and we fail to add that the units of 
spatial and temporal measurement change also, that is, that 
we are in another frame of reference which is alternative to 
our own and cannot be simultaneously applied. We are told, 
however, that if an aeroplane were passing us at 161,000 
miles a second we should see the foreshortening and the slow- 
ing down of the temporal extension of processes, that is, we 
should see in our own space-time system the effects of being 
in the other space-time system. 1 That is, the two frames 
of reference cease to be alternatives. In the case of the Fitz- 
gerald foreshortening, there was no such assumption of being 
in both systems at once, but in this case there was no refer- 
ence to difference in simultaneities. 

Now Einstein undertakes to give the procedure by means 
of which we can be thus in one space-time system and record 
in it the effects of the differences due to the alternative space- 
time system. This procedure assumes first of all the uniform 
velocity of light as a fact in nature. In the second place on 
the basis of this uniform velocity of light a signal system is 
set up by which we can establish in our system that the 
same events are not simultaneous in the system that is mov- 
ing with reference to ours as are simultaneous in our own. 
Furthermore, the effect of this difference can be made evi- 
dent, as in the case of the passing aeroplane, through vision, 
that is, through light. What this amounts to is that as spatial 
perspectives arise for us in our static landscape, so there are 
discovered to be temporal perspectives over against moving 

1 Eddington, "Space, Time, and Gravitation," page 22 ff. For a more 
balanced account of the relativist theory the reader may consult A. 
Metz, "Temps, Espace, Relativit6." 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 55 

objects in the landscape. This perspective character of a 
temporal sort is discoverable only over against motions of 
very great velocities, but the principle of them is as definitely 
given as in the case of the spatial perspectives. That prin- 
ciple is that dimensions as revealed by measurement must 
be foreshortened in the direction of the motion, provided this 
takes place in a visual field. If the velocity of light were 
infinite there would be no foreshortening, for then the light 
wave that left one end of an object would reach us at the 
same moment as the light wave from the other end, no 
matter how rapid the motion. It is then only when velocities 
approach that of light that such a perspective enters into 
experience, and then only indirectly as in the calculation 
of the change in mass of the particle shot out of the atom. 
But if we could see what is found in Eddington's supposi- 
tions airplane we should get the visual temporal perspective 
directly, for of course time slows down in proportion as 
spatial dimensions are foreshortened. The natural assump- 
tion would be that these temporal perspectives are to be 
regarded in the same light as are spatial perspectives. The 
real dimensions and the real temporal passage are what the 
passengers in the airplane find them to be, just as their dis- 
torted view of us is to be corrected by what we find to be 
about us and what we find to be going on about us. 

It is at this point that the Larmor-Lorentz transforma- 
tions and the negative results of the Michelson-Morley ex- 
periment enter. These transformations were worked out to 
indicate the mathematically stated conditions under which 
the Maxwell equations for electro-magnetism would be in- 
variant. The Newtonian equations are invariant within the 
field of Newtonian mechanics. That is, they hold whatever 
center of origin is taken as the center of reference and, in 
the case of the relative motion of systems with uniform 
velocity, whichever system is regarded as moving. It was 



56 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

found that to obtain invariance for the Maxwell equations 
it was necessary to affect the symbols referring to space, 
time and energy, including mass, with a coefficient 1/c in 
which c is the uniform velocity in a vacuum of the electro- 
magnetic wave, of which light is one form. The changes 
in spatial and temporal dimensions which this formula of 
transformation demands are those which the temporal per- 
spectives, to which I have referred above, call for, and 
there is the same assumption of an absolute value for the 
velocity of light. Furthermore this transformation formula 
gives just the foreshortening of the earth's diameter in the 
direction of its motion in its orbit that accounts for the nega- 
tive result of the Michelson-Morley experiment. 

Apart from the striking coincidence in the results reached 
by means of the transformation formulae, Einstein's theory 
of relativity, and the result of the Michelson-Morley experi- 
ment, the outstanding fact is the common assumption of a 
constant velocity of light. In the case of the transformation 
formulae it is not surprising that the constant should be 
sought in so fundamental a character as the velocity of the 
electro-magnetic wave. In the case of relativity the possi- 
bility of measurement by light-signals in different time-space 
systems presupposes the uniformity of the velocity of light, 
and this is the explanation of the negative result in the 
Michelson-Morley experiment. "It means," I quote from 
Whitehead, "that waves or other influences advancing with 
velocity c as referred to the space of any consentient set 
of the Newtonian group will also advance with the same 
velocity c as referred to the space of any other such set." 2 

There should be added to the account of this conjunction 
the sweep of the atom out of the realm of mass mechanics 
into that of electro-magnetism, and the expression of energy- 



2 "Principles of Natural Knowledge,' 1 2nd ed., page 43. 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 57 

distribution in terms of fields. The importance of these 
changes lies in the change of reference of reality as between 
distance and contact experience. Formerly, there was a 
close correlation between mass mechanics and perceptual 
reality. The reality of what we saw was to be found in what 
we could get under our hands, and what we got under our 
hands accorded in imagination with mass as the quantity 
of matter. But the still more important point was that we 
felt the reality to lie in the volume itself in abstraction from 
its relations, that the reality of the thing could be there in 
advance of the system into which it entered. All the varieties 
of what I have called spatial perspectives of the same objects 
refer to identical objects found in the field of contact ex- 
perience of what we feel and see simultaneously and this 
holds not only for our own perspectives but also for those of 
others. It finds its exact expression in congruence. What 
I have termed temporal perspectives do not occur in ex- 
perience, except in such highly imaginative presentations as 
Eddington's airplane. But in perspectives which involve 
differences in simultaneities we seem to pass beyond the 
range of their perceptual resolution in the field of contact 
experience. We are compelled to bring them into accord by 
transformations. And this is just the situation which ob- 
tains in respect of the invariance of the Maxwell equations. 
The world from the standpoints of different space-time 
systems, with different values for the common units of space, 
time and energy, can only be assimilated by transformations. 
There is as close a parallelism between an electro-magnetic 
universe and the world of distance experience, that of vi- 
sions, as between the world of mass mechanics and our 
contact experience. 

However, there is a break in this complete correlation. 
As I have already indicated, the increase in mass of a mov- 
ing body takes place in the space-time system within which 



58 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

it is moving, but the calculation of that increase in mass 
takes place by means of spatial and temporal units which 
belong to another space-time system, while the increase in 
mass is measured in the space-time system within which the 
motion is taking place. We actually find in measurement of 
our own pointer readings, with our own simultaneities, that 
the mass of the alpha particle has increased. We could dis- 
cover that increase in mass without any use of the apparatus 
of relativity, but we account for it by a theory which implies 
that a clock on the alpha particle will be running slower 
than our clock, and it is by a calculation that involves the 
time of the alpha particle that we reach the change in mass 
which we discover in our own time system. In other words, 
the correlation breaks down at the point at which it is 
brought to the test of an experimental finding, which must 
have a reality of its own or it could not test the hypothesis. 
We must be able to state the facts involved in our own 
apparatus, clocks, electrometers in terms which are inde- 
pendent of the Lorentz transformations and the Einsteinian 
relativity. And in this world of final adjudication of the 
apparatus, the building that contains it and the ground on 
which it stands and its surroundings, the ultimate reality is 
not what belongs to distance experience, but to what can 
be presented in the contact experience which this distance 
experience promises or threatens. If we are not to go back 
of the field of experience into a metaphysical world of Min- 
kowski space-time, with its events and intervals, we must 
come back to the perceptual world of scientific findings. 

Let me state the situation again. The changes that take 
place in the field of electro-magnetism cannot be stated in 
a set of equations that are invariant for space and time. It 
is necessary to assume a different spatio-temporal structure 
in the field in which the change is going on. The clocks are 
going slower and diameters of things in the direction of the 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 59 

motion are decreased, while the mass is increased. These 
are changes which theoretically are all registered in the field 
which is at rest and within which the motion is taking 
place. But the calculation of them implies a spatio-temporal 
ordering which does not belong to that field. It implies 
another center of reference. The perceptual reality to which 
these changes in the field of distance experience refer differs 
according as they are taken from the standpoint of one 
field of reference or from another. This brings out the other 
striking character of the situation, that things whose sub- 
stance belongs to the field of electro-magnetism cannot be 
defined in terms that allow of their being isolated as percep- 
tual findings. For such definition it is necessary that a 
reality can be recognized in the thing that can be given 
in the spatio-temporal features of the perception in pointer 
readings for example. This is the characteristic of mass, as 
I have insisted. Though we can define mass only in terms 
of a system of bodies in motion with reference to each other, 
we can think of the substance of the massive thing as found 
within the volume which we see or imagine, and can then 
put it actually or in imagination into relation with other 
things. Electricity as the substance of an electron can only 
be thought of in terms of its field and of the relations of that 
field with the fields of other electrons. Faraday's tubes 
of force and ether as a stuff have been used for the purpose 
of providing such an independent content, and have dis- 
appeared within our fingers. The fact is that science has 
come back to a structure of things that can be stated only 
in terms of distant experience so far as perception is con- 
cerned. This offers no difficulty in the structure of our 
theories. We know the amount of energy in a system and 
we can allocate it to the different members of that system, 
which can be located in space and time; but we cannot, so 
to speak, take a separate element in our fingers and say 



60 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

of it that this has a certain amount of energy within it 
which constitutes the "what it is" of the object, and then 
relate it to other things with like contents. Energy is con- 
ceivable only in terms of a system that is already there for 
the thought that deals with the thing. For the purposes of 
scientific method, the importance of contact experience does 
not lie in the greater reality of tactual or resistance experience 
over that of color or of sound, but in the fact that observation 
and experiment do come back to distance experience which 
must be itself directly or indirectly referred to what we can 
actually or conceivably get our hands upon. This remains 
the test of the reality of the perception, and is therefore the 
test of the scientist's finding in observation and experiment, 
and it is the condition of holding on to the fact as real in 
itself in independence of the varied hypotheses that are set 
up to account for it. 

It has been customary to find the reality of the perception 
in the experience of the individual, and there have arisen all 
the multiform difficulties in placing this individual experience 
in the reality of the world to which he belongs, especially 
when such experience is used to criticize theories about that 
world. The scientist has been satisfied to find the same 
spatial and temporal structure in the individual's experience 
that he finds in the world, and thus to locate the individual's 
observations within the surrounding world, with all the 
exactness which spatio-temporal measurement makes pos- 
sible. Now relativity, with the electro-magnetic theory out 
of which it has so largely arisen, has not only vastly compli- 
cated the spatio-temporal theory of measurement, but it 
has also reversed what I may call the reality-reference. In- 
stead of saying that the reality of the perspectives of our 
distance experience is to be found in that contact experience 
which is firmly bedded in the geometry of a Euclidean space 
and the even flow of a uniform time, we must say that it is 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 61 

only as we can read over this seemingly Euclidean space 
of our contact world into perspectives dependent upon the 
motion of distance objects and discover transformation 
formulae between these that we can reach the reality of 
what we perceive. Furthermore we cannot proceed as we 
prefer to proceed, with perceptual models, and build up, say, 
a Bohr atom out of a number of protons and electrons welded 
into a nucleus around which we can set other electrons in 
planetary revolutions. The positive and negative electricity 
which we use as the stuff of these ultimate particles does not 
submit to such imaginative perceptual analysis. We may 
talk about the diameter of an electron or seek to locate its 
electrical charge, but the substantial character of electricity 
cannot be thus isolated, and the Bohr atom has broken down. 
In recent speculation it has been found convenient to deal 
with matter as a form of vibration, but there is no meaning 
in seeking for that which vibrates. 

And yet the dependence of scientific theory upon per- 
ceptual findings was never more pronounced, and it is to 
this dependence that I would direct attention. As I have 
indicated the alternative seems to be a reference to a meta- 
physical world that can only be assumed, together with the 
assumption that the logical patterns which we find in our 
own world have correlates in this metaphysical world. In 
the meantime our experience becomes subjective except in 
so far as our thought relations may be guessed to transcend 
our frames of reference. In the prerelativity days the 
spatial and temporal structure of the observed fact was 
that of the universe. However relative to the observer the 
sense qualities of the observed object might be, its perceptual 
definition in space and time gave it fixed contour and loca- 
tion within the relational structure which for the scientist 
at least was the absolute structure of the world, and in mass 
mechanics the substantial content of any volume could be 



62 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

thought of as residing within that defined volume. Percep- 
tion gave both the logical structure of reality and the de- 
fined habitat of substance. The earlier theory of gases and 
of heat as a form of motion is outstanding illustration of 
the simplicity of this situation. Now neither the relational 
structure of reality nor the locus of its substance is to be 
found in the perceptual situation. But since the scientist can 
never reach the metaphysical space-time with its events and 
intervals except by an assumption, and since he can never 
grasp the entire field of any energy content, he is obliged to 
test his hypotheses by placing himself both in his own per- 
ceptual situation of, say, a system at rest and also in that 
of the system which moves with reference to his own, and to 
compare the spatio-temporal structures of the two systems. 
He proceeds by transformations, but they are transforma- 
tions which are possible only as the observer grasps that 
in his own situation which involves his placing himself in 
the situation of that which he observes. Although this is 
more complicated, it comes back in its findings to perceptual 
occasions. Now this is only possible if that sociality of 
thought in which we occupy the attitude of the other by 
taking our own divergent attitude is also a characteristic 
of nature. Newtonian relativity permitted the observer to 
transfer himself from one system to the other and to note 
that the relative positions of bodies in the two systems re- 
mained the same whichever system he occupied, and that the 
laws of mechanics were satisfied in either case. But electro- 
magnetic relativity exhibits results within our system which 
compel us to have recourse to the other system with its space- 
time structure in order to account for them. Under New- 
tonian relativity sociality was confined to thought. Given 
the two systems moving with reference to each other, the 
conditions of either will forever remain the same, unin- 
fluenced by the motion or rest of the other. Under electro- 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 63 

magnetic relativity the mass of the moving object increases 
in the system at rest, and this involves the different spatial 
and temporal coefficients of the other system. It is this 
break in what I have called the correlations between differ- 
ences of space and time in different systems which reveals 
in the perceptual world that sociality in nature which has 
been generally confined to thought. The increased mass in 
the system at rest must also coincidentally be moving ac- 
cording to its own clock and in a space measured by its own 
yardstick, in order that there may be an increase in its mass 
within the other system. We have already seen that there 
is sociality in nature in so far as the emergence of novelty 
requires that objects be at once both in the old system and 
in that which arises with the new. Relativity reveals a situ- 
ation within which the object must be contemporaneously in 
different systems to be what it is in either. The experimental 
proofs of relativity all come back to such situations. 

I have pointed out that this is no novelty in science, 
though it has always implied an unsolved problem. We 
find it in teleology in biology and in consciousness in psy- 
chology. The animal species is in the mechanical system 
determined both by past conditions and also by tendencies 
to maintain itself in the future. The conduct of the con- 
scious organism is determined both by a physiological sys- 
tem from behind and also by a consciousness which reaches 
into the future. This can of course take place only in a 
present in which both the conditioning past and the emergent 
future are to be found; but, as these problems indicate, what 
is further called for is the recognition that in the present 
the location of the object in one system places it in the 
others as well. It is this which I have called the sociality of 
the present. If we examine the situation from the standpoint 
of relativity, we see that the very motion that is taking place 
within the system at rest carries with it a different spatio- 



64 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

temporal structure, which is responsible for an increase of 
mass within the system at rest. If we translate this into the 
other two situations, we see a biochemical process arising 
which we call life, but which so changes the conditions under 
which it goes on that there arises in nature its environment; 
and we see living forms selecting those past conditions which 
lead to future maintenance of life and thus introducing values 
and later meanings into nature. 

If we ask for the past that conditions the emergence of 
the present we can find no other formulation for it than this, 
that whatever emerges must be subject to the conditioning 
character of the present, and that it must be possible to state 
the emergent in terms of the conditioning past. In New- 
tonian relativity, in the case of unaccelerated motion of two 
systems with reference to each other, the conditioning past 
was summed up in the dictum of the same relative position 
of the bodies of the two systems and the same mechanical 
situation whichever system was regarded as in motion. In 
this situation there is no emergence. If into this Newtonian 
relativity we now introduce the Special Principle of rela- 
tivity we have the emergence of new characters of the mov- 
ing body in the system within which it moves, because of 
its motion. And if we describe the body under the old con- 
ditions we must reduce it to rest, which only can occur with- 
out loss of the reality which the emergent motion brings 
with it if we set in motion the other system with the emer- 
gent changes appearing in that system. In the case of 
General Relativity, Einstein undertook the task of formulat- 
ing the universal conditions under which the changes in the 
spatio-temporal structure of the universe seem to take place 
those changes which are due to motion, accelerated as 
well as unaccelerated. He has shown that these are also 
conditions for changes in mass, and is at work upon the task 
of showing that the same is true for electromagnetism. 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 65 

Now the principle of sociality that I am attempting to 
enunciate is that in the present within which emergent 
change takes place the emergent object belongs to different 
systems in its passage from the old to the new because of 
its systematic relationship with other structures, and pos- 
sesses the characters it has because of its membership in 
these different systems. While this principle has been evi- 
denced most clearly in the doctrine of relativity as applied 
to physical theory, it is here least evident for our experience 
because the changes in mass, for example, due to the veloc- 
ities with which we are familiar are so minute that the 
changes in Newton's law lie in the field of distant deci- 
mals. On the other hand electro-magnetic relativity has 
succeeded in presenting the torm of the emergent with great 
exactness. We know the type of changes that will take 
place if any velocity appears within a certain system. Here 
we deal simply with the relation of the structures of space 
and time to motion. If we turn to the other two examples 
of sociality I have adduced that of life and that of con- 
sciousness we find ourselves in highly complex situations 
that are but dimly comprehended. We find that what 
understanding we have of life involves a reference to the 
future in the maintenance of the form and of the species. 
We know the life process is a physico-chemical process, but 
what the exact character of the process is we do not know 
as we know the character of a velocity. We do know, how- 
ever, that the life processes are not confined to the organism, 
but taken as wholes include interactions between the organ- 
ism and its surroundings, and we call that surrounding world, 
in so far as it is involved in these processes, the environ- 
ment of the form and its species. That is, we recognize 
that emergent life changes the character of the world just 
as emergent velocities change the character of masses. And 
we know that what we call conscious processes are physiolog- 



66 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

ical processes, and that those processes which we generally 
call behavior utilize their organized adjustments in order 
to select the objects to which they respond, and that as a 
result of this behavior things within the environment of 
these living conscious forms take on values and meanings. 
We know that conscious processes are dependent upon a high 
development of an encephalon which is the outgrowth of 
the nervous mechanism of distance stimulation and of the 
delayed responses which distant stimuli make possible. The 
whole of such a nervous system provides both the field and 
the mechanism for selection with reference to distant futures, 
and this selection endows surrounding objects with the 
values and meanings which this future subtends. But what 
the physiological process is which puts at the disposal of 
the individual organism its highly organized responses for 
the purposes of discrimination and selection no one knows. 
There is, however, a great contrast between application of 
the principle of sociality in these different fields. In the 
field of physical relativity we know the process of motion 
with great exactness, but there are but three or four recon- 
dite experiments in which we can bring into our experience 
the effects which velocities have in changing the characters 
of things. On the other hand, the effects that result from 
living and conscious processes are evident on every side, 
while the nature of the processes has hitherto been shrouded 
in impenetrable obscurity. But in all three of these fields 
the principle of sociality nevertheless obtains. In all three 
there is emergence, and the character of this emergence is 
due to the presence in different systems of the same object 
or group of objects. Thus we find that in one system with 
certain space, time and energy characters, an object moving 
with a high velocity has an increased mass because it is 
characterized by different space, time and energy coefficients, 
and the whole physical system is thereby affected. In like 



THE PRESENT AS SOCIAL 67 

manner, it is because an animal is both alive and a part of 
a physico-chemical world that life is an emergent and ex- 
tends its influence to the environment about it. It is because 
the conscious individual is both an animal and is also able 
to look before and after that consciousness emerges with the 
meanings and values with which it informs the world. 



CHAPTER IV 

THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 

I have indicated the position which I assume over against 
the so-called epistemological problem, namely, that know- 
ing is an undertaking that always takes place within a 
situation that is not itself involved in the ignorance or un- 
certainty that knowledge seeks to dissipate. Knowledge is 
not then to be identified with the presence of content in 
experience. There is no conscious attitude that is as such 
cognitive. Knowledge is a process in conduct that so or- 
ganizes the field of action that delayed and inhibited re- 
sponses may take place. The test of the success of the process 
of knowledge, that is, the test of truth, is found in the dis- 
covery or construction of such objects as will mediate our 
conflicting and checked activities and allow conduct to pro- 
ceed. Knowledge is inferential and always implies that a 
datum is involved in the inference. Reflection is the opera- 
tion of inference in the field of ideation, i.e., the functioning 
as symbols of contents and characters of things, by means 
of which constructions of objects sought can be carried 
out. 

Evidently ideation arises within what we term conscious- 
ness, and consciousness therefore calls for consideration. 
The lowest form of consciousness that we ascribe to living 
things is feeling. In general we do not judge that living 
forms without central nervous systems possess feeling, though 
there is difference of opinion on this. What nai've judgment 
comes back to is the evidence that response is called forth 
by what is good or bad for the animal. We assume accept- 
ance and rejection, and ascribe pleasure and displeasure 

68 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 69 

respectively to these two attitudes. There is evidence of 
acceptance and rejection even in the behavior of some unicel- 
lular forms, and we accordingly find biologists and psycholo- 
gists ascribing consciousness in this lowest form even to 
these organisms. Pleasures and displeasures come under 
what we call organic experiences, at least in the situa- 
tions to which I am referring, and our instinctive tendency 
to couple them with acceptance and rejection indicates an 
assumption that states of an animal's own organism enter 
into its experience. At this lowest limit of what we may 
call the emergence of consciousness we assume that the 
organism reacts to conditions in its own life process. So 
general a statement as this doubtless brings many of the 
reactions of plants within its sweep. What keeps plants 
out of our customary generalization, however, is the fact 
that plants do not react as a whole in their acceptances and 
rejections. 

Thus the first condition of consciousness is life, a process 
in which the individual by its action tends to maintain this 
process both in itself and in later generations, and one which 
extends beyond what goes on in the organism out into the 
surrounding world and defines so much of the world as is 
found within the sweep of these activities as the environment 
of the individual. The second condition is that the living 
form in its teleological process can react, as a whole, pur- 
posively, to conditions of its own organism. However, I 
have defined emergence as the presence of things in two or 
more different systems, in such a fashion that its presence 
in a later system changes its character in the earlier system 
or systems to which it belongs. Hence, when we say that 
the lowest form of consciousness is feeling, what is implied 
is that when living forms enter such a systematic process that 
they react purposively and as wholes to their own conditions, 
consciousness as feeling arises within life. I have assumed 



70 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

that a certain systematic physico-chemical process arises 
which so selects what it reacts upon as to maintain the proc- 
ess, and that this process, appearing within the physical 
world, emerges as life. Into this situation there now comes 
a form that not only lives but makes its own organic condi- 
tions, favorable or unfavorable to life, part of the field to 
which it reacts or within which it lives. A conscious form 
is one that can make phases of its own life-process parts of 
its environment. An animal that selects certain of its own 
living states, as the rootlets of a plant select water when the 
plant needs water, not only lives, as does the plant, but is 
also thirsty. Feeling is the term we use for this added ele- 
ment in life, when the animal enters in some degree into its 
own environment. 

Now the biological mechanism by which this seems to take 
place is the nervous system, for this not only enables the 
animal to select appropriate stimuli, but also makes the 
functioning of such surfaces of its own body as come into 
contact with the selected food a part of the object to which 
the animal responds. He not only ingests food, he also 
tastes it. I have also called emergence an expression of 
sociality. The animal is a part not only of the inanimate 
but also of the animate world: the conscious animal not 
only selects objects, but senses them as well. Thus, he is 
on the way to becoming part of the world within which he 
lives. The earlier form of consciousness lies in the field of 
contact experience. Here the animal responds to the ob- 
ject and in so doing responds to himself not as a whole, 
but only to the functioning of the contact surfaces. Later 
distance-stimuli come to be involved in his responses to his 
organic conditions and enter into the conscious field. The 
animal thus becomes more and more intimately a part of 
the world of objects about him. But the great advance 
comes with the development of the encephalon. This is pri- 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 71 

marily the nerve center of the important distance senses. 
As these become more powerful and refined in their discrimi- 
nations, the contact experiences to which they respond are 
delayed, and possibilities of adjustment and of choice in 
response are thus increased. In the innervations of the 
attitudes that distant objects call out the animal feels 
the invitation or the threat they carry with them. He ex- 
periences his own repressed responses in his response to 
the distant stimulation. His responses to his own tendencies 
to act provide the control that organizes all his responses 
into a coordinated act, so that these inner feelings wax in 
importance in the development of the mechanism. Of 
equal importance is the separation, involved in the distance 
stimulation, between the content of the experience and the 
immediate response. It is here that we first meet the stuff 
of ideation. Of course in itself the distance stimulation is 
just that and nothing more. It is only as the organism gets 
itself into this distance stimulation that it comes into the 
field of so-called consciousness. It is from the awakening 
of delayed and mutually conflicting responses that the stuff 
for ideation is derived. 

Let me state again the situation within which conscious- 
ness appears. Primarily living forms react to external 
stimulation in such fashion as to preserve the living process. 
The peculiar method that distinguishes their reactions from 
the motions of inanimate objects is that of selection. This 
selection is due to the sensitivity of the living form. Among 
inanimate processes the nearest approach to selection is 
catalysis. One may say that a living form is continually 
catalysing itself. Its own condition determines the objects 
and influences to which it will respond. The conscious 
animal carries selection into the field of its own response. 
It responds to the influence or effect the outer world has 
upon it. The immediate effect of food upon the animal is 



72 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

ingestion, and the peculiar character of life is exhausted in 
the animal's selection, through sensitization of the organism, 
of that substance to which it will respond in other words, 
of its food. We can by mechanical devices sensitize a photo- 
graphic plate. The structure of such a plate is maintained 
by mechanical forces. If a plate through the operation of 
these forces were to sensitize itself to light, it would be a 
living form. The operation of light upon an animal or plant 
is a photo-chemical process as mechanical as upon a kodak 
film. In the same manner the reaction of the form to the 
food-substance brought into contact with it is mechanical. 
As a living form it has selected what it will ingest, and 
mechanics takes care of the process of ingestion. But if 
in the process of ingestion the animal finds a stimulation 
to direct, to enhance or to inhibit this process, an activity 
of its own has become the object of its selection in main- 
taining the life process, that is in eating. In this case the 
animal has become conscious. The primary difficulty in 
dealing with these matters lies in our tendency to cut off 
life and consciousness at the boundaries of the organism. 
Selection undoubtedly lies in the living form, but such a 
form can only live in a physical environment of a definite 
sort. Living processes include active relationships with 
objects in an environment, and conscious living processes 
also include such objects. The response of the organism 
to its own response to food undoubtedly lies within the or- 
ganism, but only as a part of a whole process of eating 
that includes also the food. To confine consciousness to the 
response of the organism to its food is not only to take it 
out of its setting but also to fail to recognize that it is only 
one phase of the eating. Conscious eating is tasting food, 
and to translate the tasting of food into other responses of 
the organism to its responses toward things not only in- 
volves a hopeless snarl but deprives such responses of all 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 73 

meaning. Life becomes conscious at those points at which 
the organism's own responses enter as part of the objective 
field to which it reacts. 

This brings us to the sensory characters of things. The 
animal's conscious pleasure in the flavor of food is the state 
by which his organism responds to his eating of a food with 
certain characters. The selection of those characters of 
the food is part of the life process, and may be quite peculiar 
to a particular individual de gustibus non est disputandwn. 
Is the flavor his in the same sense in which the pleasure is 
his? The animal senses the flavor as really as he senses 
his own pleasure. The conscious phase of this sensory proc- 
ess lies in his use of selective discrimination in sniffing the 
food, but while the smelling is his, evidently the smell is not. 
But so far as his own responses get into the odorous object, 
that is, so far as this object is something to be seized or 
rejected, it is evidently an affair of consciousness. If we go 
farther than this and ask whether the color, or odor, or 
warmth, or smoothness of the object, apart from any re- 
sponse of the organism in the way of sensing it, belongs to 
the animal, we are probably asking two questions. The one 
question whether the odor belongs to the organism as the 
pleasure does we have already answered in the negative. 
The status of the pleasure would come nearest to what we 
mean by the phrase, "state of consciousness." The other 
whether the so-called sensory quality apart from the sensing 
of it is a state of consciousness, as we have defined con- 
sciousness is already answered; but the further implication 
that the sensory character would not be there if the animal 
were not there, takes us into the relation of the form to 
its environment. As parallel lines meeting at the horizon 
would not exist apart from some sort of optical apparatus 
leading to the convergence of the lines, so we may say that 
color would not exist apart from the apparatus of a retina 



74 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

and the mechanism behind it. The comparison is unfor- 
tunate because we can construct an optical apparatus with 
reference to which parallel lines do converge, while we can- 
not construct a retina with reference to which the world 
takes on colors. But what really lies back in our minds 
is the idea that the real surface is made up of vibrating mole- 
cules, so that the color cannot be on the object, and must be 
put into consciousness for lack of any other habitat. That 
vibrating molecules are not yellow surfaces is true. But 
that vibrating molecules may not exist as colored surfaces 
for animals with certain retinal apparatuses is not rendered 
impossible by that fact. There may be what we may call 
sensory perspectives as well as spatial and temporal per- 
spectives. In any case, it means nothing to call color a state 
of consciousness, in the sense in which I have used con- 
sciousness. 

And yet perceptual objects, with their sensuous qualities, 
belong to the realm of consciousness; for distance-experience 
exists as the promise or threat of contact-experience, and 
the way in which this future gets into the object is through 
the response of the organism to its own responses. In the 
perceptual world the future that is already there in the 
moving present is built out through the purposive responses 
of conscious organisms. The distant object thus comes to 
be what we can do to it or with it or by way of it or what 
it can do to us. To say that it exists instantaneously as we 
perceive it is but to demand confirmation of what is given in 
the perception. These purposive responses are there in the 
organism both as tendencies and as the results of past re- 
sponses, and the organism responds to them in its perception. 
We frequently call this latter response imagery. Certainly 
much of what we perceive is made up of such imagery. In 
so far as it is distinguishable imagery, it is evidently of the 
same sort as the sensuous material of things, and so is marked 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 75 

as belonging to the present, and is spoken of as in the mind 
and as put into things. In dreams and hallucinations it is 
the largest part of our objects. Its relation to the nervous 
system is very obscure. Its appearance is presumably de- 
pendent upon conditions in the central nervous system due to 
past experiences, but it can no more be placed within the 
brain than can percepts; and if we may refer to the "stuff" 
of images, it is of the same sort as that of percepts. Imagery 
belongs to the perspective of the individual. He alone has 
access to it, and, finally, it is always stuff that has appeared 
in earlier perception. It constitutes a most important part 
of the environment of the human individual. It is however 
generally so merged with the objects and attitudes with 
which it functions, and, especially in speech, with incipient 
muscular reactions, that it is difficult to define and isolate it 
in our actual experience. It functions largely in the building 
out of the past and the future. 

Ideas are closely related to images. They also have been 
regarded as sure evidence of a substantial mind postulated in 
order to provide them with a habitat. Since the symbols with 
which we think are largely recognized as word images, ideas 
and images have a very close consanguinity. The relation- 
ship is of course the same as that between a spoken or writ- 
ten word and its meaning; but, since the auditory or visual 
image of a word seems to be in the mind where the idea is 
placed, it is not uncommon, when we desire to distinguish 
between the words we use in speech and the meanings which 
they connote, to identify the meaning with the inner words 
with which we carry on our thinking. In any case one part 
of the idea as it appears in experience is some perceptual 
symbol, whether it is of the type of so-called imagery or 
of something seen or heard. The other part of the idea 
the logician's and metaphysician's universal comes back 
to what I have referred to as attitudes or organized re- 



76 THE PHILOSOPHY OF, THE PRESENT 

sponses selecting characters of things when they can be 
detached from the situations within which they take place. 
Particularly do our habitual responses to familiar objects 
constitute for us the ideas of these objects. The definitions 
we give of them are the sure signs by which we can arouse 
identical or like attitudes in others. I am not interested 
in the logical or metaphysical problems they have called out, 
but in the fact that as organized responses of the organism 
they do enter into the experience we call conscious. That 
is, the organism responds to these organized attitudes in their 
relations to objects as it does to other parts of its world. 
And thus these become objects for the individual. 

Now it is by these ideational processes that we get hold 
of the conditions of future conduct as these are found in the 
organized responses which we have formed, and so construct 
our pasts in anticipation of that future. The individual who 
can thus get hold of them can further organize them through 
the selection of the stimulations which call them out and can 
thus build up his plan of action. It is my contention that the 
past is always constructed in this fashion and therefore al- 
ways with reference to the situation which calls out this 
deliberative attitude. I have been merely detailing the con- 
ditions in an emergent evolution which have made such 
deliberative situations possible. 

In dealing with sociality I have laid stress upon the passage 
in emergence from the old system to the new, emphasizing 
the fact that in this passage the emergent lies in both, and 
is what it is because it carries the characters of both at once. 
Thus a moving body has an increase in mass over against 
the system within which it is moving, a living organism has a 
selective power in maintenance of the life process in the 
midst of inanimate things, and a conscious individual reacts 
to his own responses. He thus gains a new type of control 
in the maintenance of the living organism, and invests with 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 77 

values the objects of his environment. The other dimension 
of sociality, where this term expresses the determination of 
the nature of an object by the natures of other objects be- 
longing to the same system, is evident in the conception of 
energy systems, in the development of multicellular forms in 
which the life of the whole system is the integrated life of the 
differentiated cells that make it up, in the social systems 
involved in the propagation of the species and in the integra- 
tion of societies, from those in which at first balance is 
reached between reproduction and the consumption of one 
form by another, up to those in which a social process is 
mediated by differentiation of individuals. In all these the 
nature of the individual is in varying degrees the expression 
of the natures of other members of the system or society. 

The difference between these two dimensions of sociality 
is temporal. A system can conceivably be taken at an 
instant, and the social character of the individual member 
would in that instant be what it is because of the mutual 
relationships of all members. On the other hand, an object 
can be a member of two divergent systems only in passage, 
in which its nature in one system leads to the transformation 
which its passing into another system carries with it. In 
the passage itself it can be in both. I have sufficiently il- 
lustrated this in the case of change of mass with increase 
in velocity. In the case of living forms we are as a rule 
presented with a fait accompli. The situation in which there 
exists a cell living its own life and finding itself commencing 
to live the life of a multicellular form must have arisen in 
the evolution of these forms, but the origin of such a situa- 
tion we can only dimly trace in embryonic development 
where the higher rate of nutrition of certain cells in com- 
parison with that of others appears to lead to differentiation. 
As a further example we may consider the instant at which 
the material we now know as the sun first took on its 



78 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

planetary nature, or that at which, under tidal and other in- 
fluences, a double star appears. 

The striking fact in relativity is that changes in spatio- 
temporal and energy dimensions are not starting-points of 
new structures. There must be some change in those systems 
in which a body increases in mass, but these are not incident 
to new orders. The differences, so to speak, are cancelled 
by corresponding changes in other systems. It is this situa- 
tion that so strongly favors the assumption of a reality lying 
behind the different perspectives, to which the reality of 
experiences under different frames of reference belongs a 
Minkowski space-time with its events and intervals. There 
is, however, another possibility in the case of relativity with 
its different perspectives, viz., that of occupying in experience 
alternative systems. Whitehead for example refers to a 
double consciousness of cogredience, in which the observer 
identifies himself both with the space-time of a train and 
with that of the landscape through which the train is moving. 
Evidently relativity as a doctrine would have been impos- 
sible but for this type of consciousness. Einstein's doctrine 
has been called one of signals. It involves the realization of 
different meanings of the spatio-temporal order of events in 
different systems at the same time. Now I have presented 
consciousness as the response of an organism to its own 
responses, with the corresponding change which the environ- 
ment undergoes in its meanings. The world is a different 
world to one man from what it is to another, as is illustrated 
by the fact that a dollar means one thing to one man and 
a different thing to another. The man who can take both 
points of view is able to order and price his goods success- 
fully. Out of this capacity there arises an abstract value 
for the dollar as a means of exchange a value which it has 
in the worlds of all three. The Minkowski world should be 
such a meaning attaching to actual experiences of persons in 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 79 

different systems moving with reference to each other, but 
it does not so appear. It appears rather as a system of 
transformations and the constants that shake out of them, 
where these are made into symbols of entities that cannot 
enter into experience. In older views of relativity, differ- 
ences in perspectives due to motion could be translated from 
one system to another with the same relative change in the 
position of the objects. There was no change in the char- 
acter of the object in one because of its motion in the other. 
Usually there was a preferred system to which all others 
were transformed for common comprehension. So we could 
take the coordinates of the fixed stars as a basis for under- 
standing the motions of the stars with reference to our sys- 
tem. What was common to all systems was the identical 
relative positions of the objects. Electro-magnetic relativity, 
on the other hand, has shown a difference in the spatio- 
temporal and energy dimensions of things in motion with 
reference to the system within which they move, so that we 
cannot simply translate from one to the other, and especially 
we cannot set up any common structure of the things in 
whatever system they may be. The mathematical apparatus 
for transformation becomes very complicated. 

The metaphysical question is, can a thing with changing 
spatio-temporal and energy dimensions be the same thing 
with different dimensions, when we have seemingly only these 
dimensions by which to define the thing? It has seemed 
simpler to say that the real thing lies behind these experiences 
which are subjective and phenomenal. But let us instead 
accept passage as the character of reality, and recognize 
that in passage there is change in the structure of things, and 
that because of passage objects can occupy different systems. 
If we then recognize that there is a form of sociality within 
which we can go from the one to the other by means of a 
system of transformations, and so occupy both systems, 



80 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

identifying the same objects in each, it becomes possible for 
passage to take place between alternative systems that are 
simultaneously mutually exclusive. The set of transforma- 
tions and the mathematical structure built upon it are as 
much parts of nature as anything else. They are attitudes 
answering to meanings of things brought under our control 
by symbols. Passage from a system in motion to the same 
system at rest, while the rest of world passes from rest to 
motion, means passage from the one to the other in what we 
call a mind. These two aspects exist in nature, and the mind 
is also in nature. The mind passes from one to the other 
in its so-called consciousness, and the world is a different 
world from the standpoint of one attitude from what it is 
from another. We say the world cannot occupy both mean- 
ings, if they are mutually exclusive; but passage in a mind 
enables it to do so by means of transformations. All that we 
need to recognize is that the world had the one aspect from 
one point of view and that it now has the other aspect 
from another point of view, and that there has been the 
same passage in nature from the one to the other as has 
taken place in the mind, just as there is a passage from one 
price to another in stocks on the market because of the 
changing attitudes in men's minds. 

The question at issue here is, what is there in nature that 
answers to the transformation in the mathematician's mind? 
If we accept mind as existing in nature and recognize that 
mind, by means of the temporal dimension in sociality, passes 
from one system to another, so that the objects to which the 
mathematician refers in one system appear in the other in 
different spatio-temporal and energy dimensions, by means 
of transformation formulae; and recognize also that the 
minded organism has the other dimension of sociality as 
well, so that what appears now as in one system and now 
within another, lies, since it has an identical character to 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 81 

the organism, in a system in the world answering to this char- 
acter of the minded organism; then we can assume that the 
reference of the constants in these different perspectives is 
not to entities outside possible experience but to this organ- 
ized character of the world that appears in what we call mind. 
To state the matter less cumbrously, the relativist is able to 
hold on to two or more mutually exclusive systems within 
which the same object appears, by passing from one to the 
other. I have already referred to the experiential form of 
this passage in which the man in a train passes from the 
system of the movement of his train to that of the movemer t 
of a neighboring train. His train cannot be both moving 
and at rest, but the mind of the passenger can occupy in 
passage both systems, and hold the two attitudes in a com- 
prehensible relationship to each other as representing the 
same occurrence from two different standpoints which, hav- 
ing a mind or being a mind, he can occupy. If he accepts 
the two mutually exclusive situations as both legitimate, 
it is because as a minded organism he can be in both. 

It is to such an organization of perspectives that the con- 
stants in the mathematics of relativity may refer. We state 
this summarily, and with avoidance of philosophical compli- 
cations, by saying that these mathematics give us a more 
accurate method of formulating and measuring the physical 
world; but this still leaves the seeming contradiction of an 
object possessing at the same time differing spatio-temporal 
and energy dimensions, when it is only by these that the 
object can be defined. There would be no difficulty if we 
could set up one definition as the correct one and refer others 
to illusory factors we should then simply regard our own 
train as moving. We do the same sort of a thing when we 
say that the two systems are simply the structure which the 
objects have under different frames of reference. Both are 
then illusory. But in this case we must relegate the reality 



82 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to a Minkowski world. My contention is that they are both 
real for a mind that can occupy in passage both systems. 
The other illustration which I have given is that of price in 
the economic world; but I have indicated the difference that 
both individuals in the different perspectives here come 
back to a common entity of price in terms of exchange, which, 
in the form of money, is an identical affair for each, while the 
two individuals in the systems moving with reference to each 
other cannot find such common realities in their experience. 
They get instead a set of transformation-formulae. What 
they come back to is what Russell refers to as a common 
logical pattern, and what I am maintaining is that two in- 
dividuals in the systems which Einstein presents, connected 
with each other by light signals so that each individual places 
himself in the system of the other as well as in his own, are 
living in a common world, and that a reference to a Min- 
kowski world is unnecessary. Individuals living together in 
such systems would soon carry with them constantly these 
two definitions of everything, just as we carry two systems of 
time when travelling. What would be impossible would be 
the reduction of this common world to an instant. The 
temporal dimension of sociality is essential to its existence. 
One cannot be in Chicago and Berkeley at the same instant 
even in thought; but even if we did not have the same earth 
under us, which can be the same at an instant, we could hold 
in our passing present in thought a common life. I have 
clung to this illustration because it presents an extreme ex- 
ample of the organization of perspectives which sociality 
accomplishes in both of its dimensions when they can appear 
in minded organisms. 

The self by its reflexive form announces itself as a con- 
scious organism which is what it is only so far as it can pass 
from its own system into those of others, and can thus, in 
passing, occupy both its own system and that into which it is 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 83 

passing. That this should take place is evidently not the 
affair of a single organism. Shut up within his own world 
that which answers to his stimulations and responses he 
would have no entrance into possibilities other than those 
which his own organized act involved. It is only as his 
activity is a part of a larger organized process that such a 
possibility can open. Nor is this the only prerequisite. The 
social organization of a multicellular form is one in which 
each cell in living its own life lives the life of the whole; 
but its differentiation restricts its expressions to the single 
function to which it has become adapted. Only in a process 
in which one organism can in some sense substitute for an- 
other could an individual find itself taking the attitude of 
another while still occupying its own. Its own differentiation 
must never be so complete as to restrict it to fulfilling a 
single function only. It is the high degree of physiological 
differentiation among insects that presumably precludes 
their highly organized communities from reaching self- 
consciousness. 

There remains the mechanism by which the individual 
living his own life in that of the group is placed in the 
attitude of taking the role of another. That mechanism is, 
of course, that of communication. There may be a type of 
communication in which the condition of one organ stimu- 
lates others to their appropriate responses. There is in the 
physiological system such a system of communication car- 
ried out by the hormones. But this is only an elaboration 
of the interrelation of highly differentiated organs function- 
ing in a common life-process. Communication as I shall use 
it always implies the conveyance of meaning; and this in- 
volves the arousal in one individual of the attitude of the 
other, and his response to these responses. The result is that 
the individual may be stimulated to play various parts in 
the common process in which all are engaged, and can there- 



84 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

fore face the various futures which these different roles carry 
with them, in reaching finally the form that his own will 
take. Thus the life of the community to which he belongs 
becomes a part of his experience in a higher sense than would 
be possible for a differentiated organ within an organic 
whole. The final step in the development of communication 
is reached when the individual that has been aroused to take 
the roles of others addresses himself in their roles, and so 
acquires the mechanism of thinking, that of inward con- 
versation. The genesis of mind in human society I will not 
here discuss. What I wish to bring out in the first place is 
that it is a natural development within the world of living 
organisms and their environment. Its first characteristic is 
consciousness, that emergent which arises when the animal 
passes from the system in which it formerly existed to an 
environment that arises through the selectiveness of its own 
sensitivity, and thus to a new system within which parts of 
its own organism and its reactions to these parts become parts 
of its environment. The next step is reached with the 
dominance of the distance senses and the delayed responses 
to these. The selection and organization of these responses, 
together with the characters of the objects which they have 
selected, now become objects within the environment of the 
organism. The animal comes to respond to an environment 
consisting largely of possible futures of its own delayed re- 
actions, and this inevitably emphasizes its own past re- 
sponses in the form of acquired habits. These pass into 
the environment as the conditions of his acts. These char- 
acters of the environment constitute the stuff out of which 
values and meanings later arise, when these characters can 
be isolated through gestures in communication. The systems 
to which I have referred are in all cases interrelations be- 
tween the organism and the world that reveals itself as en- 
vironment, determined by its relationship to the organism. 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 85 

Any essential change in the organism brings with it a cor- 
responding change in the environment. 

The passage, then, from one system into another is the 
occasion for an emergence both in the form and in the en- 
vironment. The development in animal life has been steadily 
toward bringing more and more of the activity of the animal 
within the environment to which it responds, by the growth 
of a nervous system through which it could respond both to 
its sense processes and also to its responses to these, in its 
whole life activity. But the animal could never reach the 
goal of becoming an object to itself as a whole until it could 
enter into a larger system within which it could play various 
roles, so that in taking one role it could stimulate itself to 
play the other role which this first role called for. It is this 
development that a society whose life process is mediated by 
communication has made possible. It is here that mental 
life arises with this continual passing from one system to 
another, with the occupation of both in passage and with 
the systematic structures that each involves. It is the realm 
of continual emergence. 

I have wished to present mind as an evolution in nature, 
in which culminates that sociality which is the principle and 
the form of emergence. The emergence in nature of sen- 
suous qualities is due to the fact that an organ can respond 
to nature in differing systematic attitudes and yet occupy 
both attitudes. The organism responds to itself as affected 
by the tree and at the same time to the tree as the field 
of its possible future reactions. The possibility of the or- 
ganism being at once in three different systems, that of 
physical relation, of vital relation and of sensuous relation, 
is responsible for the appearance of the colored rough shaft 
and foliage of the tree emerging in the interrelation between 
the object and the organism. But mind in its highest sense 
involves the passage from one attitude to another with the 



86 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

consequent occupation of both. This also takes place in 
nature. It is the phase of change in which both states are 
found in the process. An acceleration in velocity is the out- 
standing illustration of this situation, and the whole de- 
velopment of our modern physical science has been de- 
pendent upon our isolation of this entity in change. But 
while this concurrent occupation of different situations at 
once occurs in nature, it has remained for mind to present 
a field within which the organism not only passes from one 
attitude to another and so occupies both, but also holds on 
to this common phase. One can pass from the situation 
within which a dog appears, to that in which a toad appears, 
and so on to an elephant, and be in all attitudes at once in 
so far as they all include the common attitude toward "an 
animal." Now this is the highest expression of sociality, 
because the organism not only so passes from one attitude 
to another, by means of a phase which is a part of all these 
attitudes, but also comes back on itself in the process and 
responds to this phase. It must get out of itself in the pas- 
sage and react to this factor in the passage. 

I have indicated the mechanism by which this is ac- 
complished. It is that of a society of organisms which be- 
come selves, first of all taking the attitudes of others to 
themselves, and then using the gestures by which they have 
conversed with others to indicate to themselves what is of 
interest in their own attitudes. I will not spend time in dis- 
cussing this fascinating field of mental development. 1 I 
wish to emphasize the fact that the appearance of mind is 
only the culmination of that sociality which is found through- 
out the universe, its culmination lying in the fact that the 
organism, by occupying the attitudes of others, can occupy 
its own attitude in the role of the other. A society is a 



*Cf. pages 200 ff. 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 87 

systematic order of individuals in which each has a more 
or less differentiated activity. The structure is really there 
in nature, whether we find it in the society of bees or that 
of human beings. And it is in varying degrees reflected in 
each individual. But, as I have already stated, it can get 
into the separate individual only in so far as he can take 
the parts of others while he is taking his own part. It is 
due to the structural organization of society that the in- 
dividual, in successively taking the roles of others in some 
organized activity, finds himself selecting what is common 
in their interrelated acts, and so assumes what I have called 
the role of the generalized other. This is the organization 
of those common attitudes which all assume in their varied 
responses. It may be that of a mere human being, that of 
the citizen of a definite community, that of the members 
of a club, or that of a logician in his "universe of discourse." 
A human organism does not become a rational being until 
he has achieved such an organized other in his field of social 
response. He then carries on that conversation with him- 
self which we call thought, and thought, as distinct from 
perception and imagination, is occupied with indicating what 
is common in the passage from one attitude to another. 
Thus thought reaches what we call universals, and these, 
with the symbols by which they are indicated, constitute 
ideas. 

Now this is possible only in the continual passage from 
attitude to attitude; but the fact that we do not remain 
simply in this passage is due to our coming back upon it 
in the role of the self and organizing the characters which 
we pick out into the patterns this social structure of the 
self puts at our disposal. The stretch of the present within 
which this self-consciousness finds itself is delimited by the 
particular social act in which we are engaged. But since 
this usually stretches beyond the immediate perceptual hori- 



88 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

zon we fill it out with memories and imagination. In the 
whole undertaking these serve in place of perceptual stimula- 
tions to call out the appropriate responses. If one is going 
to meet an appointment, he indicates to himself the streets 
he must traverse by means of their memory images or the 
auditory images of their names. And this involves both 
the past and the future. In a sense his present takes in 
the whole undertaking, but it can accomplish this only by 
using symbolic imagery, and since the undertaking is a whole 
that stretches beyond the immediate specious presents, these 
slip into each other without any edges. A loud noise be- 
hind one's back picks out such a specious present. Its 
lack of relevance to what is going on leaves it nothing but 
the moment in which the sound vibrated within our ears. 
But our functional presents are always wider than the 
specious present, and may take in long stretches of an un- 
dertaking which absorbs unbroken concentrated attention. 
They have ideational margins of varying depth, and within 
these we are continually occupied in the testing and organiz- 
ing process of thought. The functional boundaries of the 
present are those of its undertaking of what we are doing. 
The pasts and futures indicated by such activity belong to 
the present. They arise out of it and are criticized and 
tested by it. The undertakings belong, however, with vary- 
ing degrees of intimacy, within larger activities, so that we 
seldom have the sense of a set of isolated presents. 

I wish to make as emphatic as possible the reference of 
pasts and futures to the activity that is central to the present. 
Ideation extends spatially and temporally the field within 
which activity takes place. The presents, then, within which 
we live are provided with margins, and fitting them into a 
larger independent chronicle is again a matter of some more 
extended present which calls for a wider horizon. But the 
widest horizon belongs to some undertaking, whose past and 



THE IMPLICATIONS OF THE SELF 89 

future refer back to it. For instance, the present history 
of the sun is relevant to the undertaking of unravelling the 
atom and, given another analysis of the atom, the sun will 
have another history and the universe will be launched into 
a new future. The pasts and the futures are implications 
of what is being undertaken and carried out in our labora- 
tories. 

It is interesting to note the lack of historic significance 
in Aristotle's account of the universe. At most there were 
the pulses of reproduction or of the succession of the seasons. 
Its past had no other function than that of repetition. Even 
Plato's Day of Judgment was a recurrent affair. In the 
highest reality thought thinking itself past and future 
fade out entirely, as they do in the contemplation of time- 
less reality in a Platonic heaven. St. Paul and Augustine 
ushered in the history of the world, which gave a defined 
cosmical horizon to the undertaking of every soul in its 
search for salvation from the wrath to come, or for the 
beatific vision. The Bible and the monuments of the church 
became the chronicle of Christendom, for in them men found 
the means of salvation. It was not until scientific research 
became an independent undertaking that it was possible 
to substitute another chronicle. But the import of the 
biblical history was found not only in the salvation of men's 
souls. The Church was the structure of Western society 
and the undertaking to conserve the values of this society 
found its essential past and future in the plan of salvation. 
It is this larger undertaking to which as social beings we 
are committed that provides to-day the horizons of our 
pasts and future. But this undertaking includes among its 
values the work of research science and the implications of 
that rational process which has freed us from the isolation 
of individual organisms and made us not only members of 
the Blessed Community but also citizens of the republic 



90 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

of all rational beings. But even in the sweep of these most 
universal undertakings, their pasts and their futures are still 
relative to the interests involved in the undertakings them- 
selves. We determine what the world has been by the 
anxious search for the means of making it better, and we 
are substituting the goal of a society aware of its own values 
and minded intelligently to pursue them, for the city not 
built with hands eternal in the heavens. 

This view then frees us from bondage either to past or 
future. We are neither creatures of the necessity of an 
irrevocable past, nor of any vision given in the Mount. Our 
history and our prognostications will be sympathetic with 
the undertakings within which we live and move and have 
our being. Our values lie in the present, and past and 
future give us only the schedule of the means, and the plans 
of campaign, for their realization. 

We live always in a present whose past and whose future 
are the extension of the field within which its undertakings 
may be carried out. This present is the scene of that emer- 
gence which gives always new heavens and a new earth, and 
its sociality is the very structure of our minds. Since society 
has endowed us with self-consciousness, we can enter per- 
sonally into the largest undertakings which the intercourse 
of rational selves extends before us. And because we can 
live with ourselves as well as with others, we can criticize 
ourselves, and make our own the values in which we are 
involved through those undertakings in which the community 
of all rational beings is engaged. 



SUPPLEMENTARY ESSAYS 



SUPPLEMENTARY ESSAYS 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 

There are two points of incidence of any act of knowl- 
edge: the deduction of what must occur in experience if 
the idea we entertain is true, and the reconstruction of the 
world which the acceptance of the idea involves. Thus, in 
the theory of relativity, the calculation of the apparent posi- 
tions of stars close to the rim of the eclipsed sun and the 
agreement of the calculations of the theory with the revolu- 
tion of the orbit of Mercury are illustrations of the first. 
Einstein's theory of a curved space-time or Whitehead's 
doctrine of intersecting time-systems is an illustration of the 
second. Barring errors of observation, the so-called experi- 
mental proofs remain as data under any alternative theory, 
while the reconstructed world that arises out of the theory 
is never in its own right definitive. A new theory will re- 
construct this as it has reconstructed its predecessor. 

It is interesting to note that this difference in the definitive 
value of data and of theories under which data are organized 
and from which they gain new meanings is not due to a 
higher degree of competence in reaching them. The more 
competently data are isolated and observed the more likely 
they are to remain as secure elements in the formulation 
and solution of later problems; but the logical perfection of 
a theory and its wide applicability have no bearing upon the 
likelihood of its survival in the presence of new problems. 
This is clearly evidenced in the attitude of present-day 
physicists toward Newtonian mechanics. In fact the very 
perfection and comprehensiveness of an hypothesis lessen its 

93 



94 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

survival value in the face of fundamental problems. Scien- 
tists find themselves in possession of a constantly increasing 
body of reliable data, while the very character of their 
research-undertakings calls for a constant reinterpretation of 
the world within which their research goes on. 

What bearing has this upon the scientist's realism, upon 
his assurance that there is an intelligible world there over 
against his investigation? Such a phenomenalist as Mach 
finds his reality in the data, and is or should be ready to 
recognize new uniformities among them without feeling that 
his field of reality has changed. He can regard things and 
the world made of things as mere convenient and subjective 
orderings of data which can be rearranged without affecting 
the only reality with which science is concerned. But our 
constructive scientists are not phenomenalists. Einstein 
condemns phenomenalism 1 and among theorists such as 
Eddington, Weyl, Minkowski, or Whitehead we find no 
phenomenalist. Technicians such as Rutherford, Bohr, 
Sommerfeld, Planck, or Schroeder, can state their findings 
only in terms of things and a world of things, however far 
removed from perceptual experience. 

Data are isolated elements in a world of things. Their 
isolation is overcome in the new world of the scientist's 
hypothesis, and it is in this world that the reality lies which 
he is seeking. He cannot stop with the data in his cogni- 
tive advance. They belong to a stage in the investigation 
which comes before the attainment of knowledge. However 
uncertain he may be of the achievement, his impulse is not 
satisfied until the data have taken on the form of things 
in some sort of an ordered whole. These things may be 
removed from our perceptual experience and lie in a mathe- 
matical or logical intuition belonging to the expert only; 



1 Cf. Meyerson, "La Deduction Relativiste," pages 61-62. 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 95 

but it is a world made up of objects, not of data, to which 
his hypothesis gives at least a provisional reality not attach- 
ing to them as mere data. 

A further trait of the scientist's reality is its independence 
of the observer. This is strikingly illustrated, in the doc- 
trine of relativity, by the geometry of space-time. An ab- 
solute independent of the frames of reference of all observers 
was an inevitable goal of the most fundamental criticism of 
commonsense spatial and temporal experience. However 
ready the scientist has been to recognize the perspectivity 
of all perception, he has never been infected by those scep- 
ticisms that have arisen from such recognition in philosophic 
doctrine. He has recognized far more adequately than the 
layman the insurmountable obstacles that defend the cog- 
nizable world from any complete comprehension by his 
science; but he has never relegated the object of his knowl- 
edge to the creations of his own perceptions and thought. 
He has always assumed the existence of something inde- 
pendent of his perception, and of the thought with which 
his research is occupied. It is this independence which un- 
derwrites his experiment. But this reality independent of 
the perception and thought of the observer is not presented 
in the data of science, apart from the world to which such 
data belong. These data are perceptual experiences, isolated 
by the problem within which they appear, and occurring 
under such exacting conditions that they can be counted 
upon to be repeated not only in the scientist's own experience 
but also, under similar conditions, in that of others. In no 
case would the independent reality be identified with the 
refined measurement of points on a photographic plate, or 
with the observations of an astronomer, in so far as these 
are in contradiction to current doctrine. It is these latter 
which constitute the data of science. Independent reality 
belongs either to the world in so far as not affected by the 



96 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

problem, or to a reconstituted world. The observations are 
indications of the necessity of reconstitution, and evidences 
of the legitimacy of an hypothesis by which such reconsti- 
tution is undertaken; but in the form of data they cannot 
belong to a reconstituted world. Such a world is a system 
of intelligible things whose meanings have wiped out the 
isolation of the data, and perhaps have removed their im- 
port from the perceptual experience within which they oc- 
curred. 

We are thus brought back to the intelligible reality that 
is the fundamental assumption of the scientist's undertak- 
ing. I have already referred to the meaning of the intel- 
ligibility of reality in the scientist's quest for knowledge. It 
is found in the possibility of deducing, from determining 
conditions of events as given in experience, what the nature 
of those events must be. There are, then, two assumptions 
involved in such intelligibility: (1) that events in their pas- 
sage are determined, although the degree of this determina- 
tion is not fixed by the assumption; and (2) that in so far 
as the determining conditions are given, the character of 
later events is also given. There is, however, a difference 
between the givenness of the determining conditions and the 
givenness of the later events. The former is that of the 
temporal dimension of experience. But while there is in all 
passage determination in abstract phraseology the carry- 
ing on of relations there is also the indeterminateness of 
what occurs. There is always qualitative difference in pas- 
sage, as well as identity of relation extending through pas- 
sage. The "what" that is occurring is given in this relational 
aspect only. In this lies the rationality of all experience, 
and the source of symbolism. It is here also that we find 
the fundamental distinction between the objective and sub- 
jective phases of experience. The carrying on of relations 
is objective. The anticipated qualitative "what" that will 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 97 

occur is subjective. Its locus is mind. Here we find the 
second sort of givenness that which belongs to later events. 
In so far as the relations in the passage are there in ex- 
perience they pass in their identity into further events, but 
the "what" that will occur is only symbolically present. And 
the indeterminate "what" involves always a possibly new 
situation with a new complex of relationships. The given- 
ness of later events is then the extension of the structure 
of relations found in experience, in which the event can be 
defined only in its relational import, though we imaginatively 
anticipate with varying degrees of probability its qualitative 
character. The intelligibility of the world is found in this 
structure of relations which are there in experience, and in 
the possibility of following them on beyond the specious 
present into a future in so far as this future is determined. 
The data are such emergent events as fail to fit into the 
accepted structure of relations, and become nodal points 
from which a new structure of relations arises. They thus 
are isolated, though they lie within a world which has not 
been entirely disrupted. It is in their isolation that they 
are interesting; and while they are defined in terms of objec- 
tive relations which are not affected, it is in their opposition 
to previously accepted meanings that they must be presented. 
A relatum that hangs in the air without as yet the structure 
of relations to which it belongs is given in a type of ex- 
perience which can embody both its inherence in a world 
that is there and its contradiction of certain characters of 
that world. 2 The Michelson-Morley findings are an illustra- 
tion of this type of experience. The interference rings were 
unchanged, whether the light waves travelled with the mo- 
tion of the earth or at right angles to it. Motions were simply 

2 For a much more extended discussion see Mr. Mead's essay on 
"Scientific Method and the Individual Thinker" in "Creative In- 
telligence," page 176 ff. 



98 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

there in a world of exact measurement which was the condi- 
tion of any experiment. But they were in flagrant opposi- 
tion to the assumption that these waves travelled in an ether 
unaffected by that motion, occupying the Newtonian space 
of current physical doctrine. The unquestioned thereness 
of these rings in their unexpected conflict with the character 
of the spatial world to which they had belonged expresses 
the data's independence of certain characters of that ex- 
perience in so far as they are in conflict with these findings. 
There is an old quarrel between rationalism and empiri- 
cism which can never be healed as long as either sets out 
to tell the whole story of reality. Nor is it possible to 
divide the narrative between them. When rationalism tells 
the tale, the goal is a Parmenidean identity; when empiricism 
tells it, reality disappears in phenomenalistic sands. But 
in fact contingency presupposes a universal necessary order 
that has been transgressed, and we achieve universal law 
only when we have triumphed over exceptions. Empiricism 
presents the ever-recurrent problem with its hard recalcitrant 
fact; rationalism, the verified theory in which it disappears. 
For example, the interpretation of things as events causes 
"things" to disappear in the geometry of a space-time which 
is the modern edition of the rationalism of Descartes. 
Neither the Minkowski space-time, nor Whitehead's inter- 
sections of an infinite number of time-systems with the in- 
gression of eternal objects, opens the door to any reality in 
the perceptual findings of research science. For research 
science, perceptual findings are part of a world whose un- 
questioned security is the basis for the reality of the ex- 
ceptional instance from which the problem springs, and for 
the reliability of the experimental verification of the later 
hypothesis; yet they have lost the meaning which had be- 
longed to that world but which the exceptional instance has 
now annulled. The world was implicitly rational up to the 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 99 

advent of the problem. It is again rational once the problem 
is solved. The hard facts of the exceptional instance in 
observation and experiment have a reality independent of 
that rationality. To say that their reality is found in the 
faith that the world nevertheless is rational, is to substitute 
an emotional state for the immediate datum which asserts 
itself against a rational order and conceivably might main- 
tain itself even in an irrational universe. It is essential to 
the scientist's method and attitude that he accept his findings 
just in their contravening of what had been their meaning, 
and as real in independence of whatever theory is advanced 
to explain them. Otherwise they would have no probative 
power. Such instances, with the problems they involve, 
constitute the contingency of the scientist's world. They 
are in the nature of the case unpredictable, and they are in 
the nature of the case real in spite of their non-rationality. 
It is also true that every consistent hypothesis rules out all 
later exceptions to its uniformity, or rather that it will be 
demolished by any exceptional instance. It is therefore no 
argument against the geometry of space-time that it opens 
no door to the contingent. No formally rational doctrine can 
include within itself the repugnant fact. But it is another 
matter to give such an account of reality as has within it 
no place for the authority of new scientific findings. The 
scientist who welcomes facts that fail to accord with his 
theory must have a place in his doctrine for the experience 
within which those facts can appear. Nor can we account 
for the repugnant fact, for the emergent, by relegating it 
to an experience that is simply that of a mind that has made 
a mistake or been in error and now corrects it with a true 
or at least a truer account of reality. The repugnant fact 
is without doubt an emergent; it has, however, been cus- 
tomary to place its essential novelty in a mental experience, 
and to deny it to the world that the mind is experiencing. 



100 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

Thus radiation from black bodies presented facts repugnant 
to the formulation of light in terms of a wave process. Pre- 
sumably an hypothesis will be found in which this repug- 
nancy will disappear. Meantime, we do not question the 
facts, once they have been tested by approved technique. 
This comes back to pointer-readings; but we are apt to over- 
look the fact that pointer-readings involve very complex and 
extensive apparatus together with the physical housing of 
this apparatus the whole perceptual world that is not in- 
volved in the doctrine of radiation and that the facts are 
but parts of that perceptual world. In that world the pointer 
readings are emergents. From the scientist's standpoint 
this world is not mental. Is the emergence of the quanta 
mental? The Einsteinian must answer yes to this question. 
There can be no novelty in the geometry of an extensioij in 
which time is simply one dimension. In our different frames 
of reference we happen upon events and all the freshness of 
novelty is in the adventurer. Whitehead does locate the per- 
spective of the organism within the world with which the 
scientist deals, and undertakes to open the door to contin- 
gency by way of alternative patterns of eternal objects which 
may have ingression into the perspective, or particular inter- 
sections of time systems dependent upon the percipient event. 
But this logical separation of the event the occurrence 
from the characters of the event the "what it is" that takes 
place finds no reflection in the scientist's object. The 
"what the object is" reflects its characters in its occurrence. 
If there is contingency in the selection of eternal objects, 
that contingency surely appears in the happening. Not only 
etymologically but logically contingency attaches itself to 
occurrence. Yet from the standpoint of Whitehead's doc- 
trine the event is as unalterably located in a space-time as 
in the Einsteinian doctrine. 
The scientist's emergent appears in his observation of the 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 101 

repugnant fact. Unquestionably in his experience something 
novel has occurred, and his experience lies within the world. 
He is then interested in establishing as a fact that what is 
novel in his experience is also firmly imbedded in an unques- 
tioned perceptual world. In so far as it is novel e.g., in 
so far as the radiation of the black body does not conform 
to the wave theory of radiation the new fact exists only 
as his experimental finding, as his perceptual experience, and 
he must make sure that any other person under like cir- 
cumstances will have the same perceptual experience. The 
reality of this experience of his, and of others carrying out 
the like experiment, in its opposition to current meanings, 
is the cornerstone of experimental science. The novel fact 
is no mere sensation of the scientist, nor any mental state, 
but something that is happening to things that are real. In 
its repugnancy to a certain structural character of that world 
it arises only in the experience of this, that and the other 
individual; but these experiences must nevertheless belong 
to an unquestioned objective world. It is important to recog- 
nize that this world is not made up out of these individual 
experiences. They lie within this world. If it were made up 
of such individual experiences it would lose all its reality; 
whereas in fact it is a court of final appeal there is no 
scientific theory that does not seek its decision, and there 
is no theory that may not be brought before it. It is en- 
tirely conceivable that facts repugnant to the current doc- 
trine of relativity may appear, and it is the anticipation of 
research science that such will be the case. 

It is customary to interpret the independence of data as 
a metaphysical affirmation of a real world independent of 
all observation and speculation. There is no necessary im- 
plication of this in the scientist's methodology. For the 
metaphysical affirmation is of a reality that is final, while 
the scientist's procedure and method contemplate no such 



102 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

finality. On the contrary, they contemplate continued re- 
construction in the face of events emerging in ceaseless 
novelty. The scientist's method and technique are those of 
research. Unless his metaphysical predisposition leads him 
to identify the unquestioned thereness of the data with the 
finality of a world metaphysically independent of all ex- 
perience, he cannot discover this finality in the data; for 
their very form moves toward a doctrine that will relieve 
them of the character of data and merge them in things. 
It is only in the identity of the relation in passage that he 
can find a character which could belong to such a final world. 
But, as Meyerson has pointed out, 3 such a reflection of 
reality in the identities that scientific method seeks leads 
only to a Parmenidean solid. 

It is of course possible to approach the problem from 
the standpoint of this relational structure. Modern mathe- 
matics and relational logic are outstanding illustrations of 
this approach. The first step was taken in the Renaissance, 
in the freeing of the numerical relations of geometrical ele- 
ments from the forms of perceptual intuition. Descartes' 
Analytic Geometry not only opened the door to the powerful 
instrument of analysis, but also freed the qualitative content 
of the object of observation from the common-sense struc- 
ture of things. Scientific analysis was then free to attack 
the problems of physics and chemistry with the instruments 
of molecules and atoms, which could be defined in terms of 
the equations of mechanics. Justification for the hypothet- 
ical constructions this made possible could be found in the 
logical deductions of the theory when these were put to 
the test of experiment. It was mathematical analysis that 
freed the modern mind from Aristotelian metaphysics, by 
giving men new objects that could be exactly defined in 



8 "Identity and Reality," page 231. 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 103 

terms of relational structures and then bringing these struc- 
tures to the test of observation, through the deduction of 
their consequences. The profound distinction between the 
atomic elements of ancient and those of modern thought 
lies in the exact definition which modern science gives to 
its ultimate elements in terms of the mathematical account 
of the proportions they must submit to and of the changes 
they must undergo. An Aristotelian science could give no 
definition of the elements of things except the nature of the 
things as they lay in experience. There was no method 
open to the thinker except that of the metaphysics of poten- 
tiality and realization. Elements could be thought of only 
in terms of what they were to become. In the atom of 
Democritus, weight was an ultimate quality which was con- 
ceived as a cause of motion and of changes in motion; but 
the cause had nothing in common with the effect. It was 
not possible to utilize the analysis of motion into velocities, 
accelerations and decelerations and then define the weight 
the dominant character of the atom in terms of these de- 
terminable elements of motion. Weight was one character 
and the changes it brought about were other characters. The 
one could not be defined in terms of the other. 

But when mass could be defined in terms of inertia and 
this in terms of the tendency of a body to remain in a state 
of rest or motion and in terms of the character of the mo- 
tion in which it is found, it became possible to use the 
mathematical account of motion to define both the body and 
any part of it that this analysis rendered accessible to 
thought and experiment. It is not simply that there arose 
a new set of concepts for defining things, but that the situa- 
tions arising from the mathematical analysis involved rela- 
tional formulations of the objects. Both the inadequacy of 
the Cartesian mechanical doctrine and the striking success 
of Newtonian mechanics emphasized the importance of the 



104 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

new physical objects that had arisen out of a mathematical 
dynamics. Their indifference to the teleological natures of 
things in human experience rendered them peculiarly service- 
able for fashioning means for new human ends. Newtonian 
mechanics gave man a control over nature from a source of 
which Bacon had not dreamed. 

Of equal if not of greater importance was the experimental 
proof which the exact deduction of consequences from the 
mathematically formulated hypothesis offered to the scientist. 
Here was a mathesis which instead of withdrawing into a 
Platonic world of forms came back to a perceptual world 
that could be submitted to exact measurement, and found 
here final support. And again and again the development 
of mathematical theory has provided the structure within 
which new objects could be defined. Einstein's speculation 
upon the relations of motion to measurement and its units 
antedates his realization that the Michelson-Morley findings 
and the Lorentz transformations presented the data for the 
doctrine of relativity. Quanta, on the other hand, present 
perceptual findings defined in terms of current theory, yet 
contradicting it. The approach to the problem may be from 
either side: from that of the particular experience that con- 
troverts the theory, or from that of the developed relational 
theory that offers new objects to scientific investigation. 

If we ask, then, what is the logical or cognitive value of 
the scientist's realism, we receive two different answers. The 
one breaks out of his attitude in seeking the solution of the 
problems with which his research is occupied. The other 
appears in his metaphysical interpretation of this attitude. 
In the first we find that the scientist's assumption of the 
independence of the world in which are found the data of 
science and the objects a tested theory reveals over against 
the observation and speculation of the scientist, refers al- 
ways to the world in so far as it is not involved in the 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 105 

problem upon which he is engaged, and in so far as that 
world is revealed in scientifically competent, undisputed and 
tested observation and hypothesis. His acceptance of a real 
world independent of his processes of knowledge is not based 
upon the finality of the findings of science, either in its data, 
or in its logically consistent and experimentally tested 
theories. Although the data of science, when rigorously 
ascertained, have a much longer life in the history of science 
than its theories, they are always possibly subject to re- 
vision. This conceivable lack of finality does not, however, 
affect the data's independence of observation and thought 
within the field of research. The world to which the data 
belong is independent of the perception and thought which 
had failed to recognize them, and any conceivable revision 
of these data will simply find itself in another world of 
scientific findings. The scientist has no way of presenting 
the impermanence of his data except in terms of improved 
technique, and the same is true of the objects into which 
the data disappear when a theory has been tested and ac- 
cepted. They are independent only of the perception and 
thought of a world whose eyes were as yet closed to them. 
The elaborate and highly abstruse relativistic theories 
carry with them the logical finality of any consistent deduc- 
tion; but their finality in the history of science depends, 
first, upon their competent formulation of the independent 
reality, and, second, upon their success in anticipating later 
events. And the scientist himself expects this doctrine to 
be reconstructed just as other scientific doctrines have been 
reconstructed. He is confident that any later theory will 
assimilate into its relational structure the data of present- 
day science in so far as these stand the test of repetition 
and improved technique and the logical structure of present 
day theories, as relativity has assimilated the logical struc- 
ture of classical mechanics; but neither his attitude as a 



106 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

research scientist nor his method anticipates the finality of 
the doctrine. What calls for emphasis is that the inde- 
pendent reality carries with it no implication of finality. 

We have seen that this independent reality, which is an 
essential part of the scientist's apparatus, breaks out at two 
points. First, in the scientific datum it is an accredited 
experience which runs counter to interpretations and mean- 
ings that have hitherto had their place in the world within 
which we have been living: for example, the reflections of 
radiations of dark bodies in the quantum problem. Or it 
is a new object, relationally defined, a so-called "conceptual" 
object, in so far as experimental evidence can be given for 
its existence: for example, the electron, as evidenced in Mil- 
likan's oil-drop experiment, or the alpha-particle in Ruther- 
ford's photographs. Here is a reality actually there, standing 
on its own feet in spite of accepted meanings and doctrines 
that contravene it. Or, in the second place, it is the reality 
of a new theory justified by unquestioned logical implica- 
tions and supported by observations and experiments that 
fulfill its own prophecies. The spear-point of independence 
is thus always directed against objects or ideas belonging 
to the very experience within which the scientific datum, or 
the new theory, has appeared. 

In the perspectives of every-day perceptual experience 
we give directly or inferentially to the distant object 
predominantly a visual object the dimensions it assumes 
or will assume in a field of common distance and contact 
experience. The "reality" of a visual object is what one 
can see himself handling. The visual structure is dominant 
and even the contact values are ordered in a visual space; 
but the visual space of immediate proximity to the individ- 
ual, within which perceptual perspectives have disappeared, 
lies within a uniform spatial structure coinciding with the 
grosser structure of contact experience. Contact experience 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 107 

is the "matter" of common-sense, for it is the goal of that 
mediate experience within which lie all physical objects, 
which are in advance of the consummations within the 
physiological act, and which serve, in organisms that are 
capable of manipulation, as implements for final consum- 
mations. But the spatial structure remains visual because 
of the superior fineness and exactitude of vision. All dis- 
tant visual experience is symbolic, in Berkeley's sense; but 
it is symbolic not of pure contact dimensions, but of those 
exact dimensions which are ordered in the visual space of 
our radius of manipulation. Final perceptual reality, how- 
ever, always presupposes actual or possible manipulatory 
contact, i.e., it presupposes matter. 

The conduct of the individual organism does not neces- 
sarily involve more than successful organization of distant 
stimuli into manipulatory responses under the control of 
the visual field. That is, appropriate conduct with reference 
to a distant object may take place without the appearance 
of physical objects in the experience of the organism. For 
a physical object in experience is not only a spatially dis- 
tant stimulus to which we respond. It is a thing which 
acts or may act upon us. This experience of interaction 
we undoubtedly have primarily in the pressures located in 
things which we feel and manipulate. The condition for the 
experience may be found in the pressure of the hands or 
of other different parts of the body against each other; but 
the action upon us of the thing from its inside is a funda- 
mental character that cannot be thus accounted for. 

What has just been said has two different possible set- 
tings; that of the epistemological problem, and that of the 
development of the infant's immature experience into that 
of the community to which he belongs. The epistemologist 
has assumed that all perceptual experience involves aware- 
ness, that is, that all of it carries a cognitive reference to 



108 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

a something that is not itself, and his problem is found in 
the attempted identification of this cognitive reference to a 
world that lies outside of the experience of the individual 
with the cognition of the individual that attains its goal 
within experience. The epistemologist starts, therefore, with 
the immediate experience of the individual and attempts by 
way of this cognitive reference to reach a world outside of 
the individual's experience. The biologist and genetic 
psychologist, on the other hand, start with the world which 
the individual enters, and undertake to show how this world 
fashions the experience of the individual, and how he re- 
fashions it. The scientist, of course, is working within the 
setting of the biologist and the psychologist. In his research 
he must start with a problem that lies within an unques- 
tioned world of observation and experiment. His problem 
has thrown into doubt certain features of this world but 
the scientific data are established in what is not shaken. 
In so far as the perceptual experience of the individual is 
inadequate falls short of objectivity it must be pos- 
sible to analyse out of it what is not questioned and can 
be tested by competent observation and experiment. This 
observation and experiment imply a perceptual world not 
lying within the problematic area. For the scientist the 
problem of knowledge does not arise until the exception 
appears, or until the logical development of the structure 
of the world brings with it new objects that call for re- 
construction. 

But while the scientist must observe, measure and experi- 
ment within a perceptual world, the hypotheses of recent 
years, supported and confirmed by experimental tests, have 
led to the construction of scientific objects which have in- 
vaded the field of the perceptual object, and seem to have 
made of those objects upon and among which his most ac- 
curate measurements are carried out, a problem which his 
scientific doctrine cannot ignore. 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 109 

Under the doctrine of the classical mechanics, the per- 
ceptual experiences of weight and effort were directly cor- 
related with mass and force. And they were continua 
which actually or in imagination could be subdivided in- 
definitely. From the visual-tactual space of what I have 
termed the manipulatory area, the here and the there, the 
right and left, and the up and down of perceptual space could 
be abstracted and there still was left a continuous medium, 
whose systems of coordinates were subject to arbitrary 
change of position without affecting the validity of mechani- 
cal laws when applied to systems of bodies related to differ- 
ent coordinates. Newtonian absolute space carried with it 
no incongruity when the physicist made his observations and 
carried out his experiments in his perceptual world. His 
own system of coordinates was replaceable by any other 
without affecting the value of his deductions. Imagination, 
therefore, carried on indefinitely what the microscope ac- 
complished within its limited range. It presented as per- 
ceptual what lay beyond the range of perception, without 
implying that that which it presented was other than a 
fractional part of that which was perceptual. Physicists 
could construct models of their hypotheses that were but 
the finer anatomy of the perceptual world. 

But with the theories of electro-magnetism came an 
analysis which led to elements which could no longer be 
fractional parts of perceptual things. Lord Kelvin sought 
to hold on to them, and stated that he could not understand 
an hypothesis which he could not present in the form of a 
model. But the lack of invariance in the Maxwell equa- 
tions, the transformations of Larmor and Lorentz by which 
this difficulty was conquered, and Einstein's interpretation 
of the Lorentz transformations got behind the very structure 
of the percept. The perceptual thing separates space and 
time. It is what it is maugri time. And if it is subject 



110 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to time's decay, it is the function of science to get back to 
those permanent elements which persist. The imperishable 
atoms of Newton possessed contents of mass which were 
irrelevant to time. In the perceptual world physical things 
are the preconditions of events. In the electro-magnetic 
world the ultimate elements of physical things are events, 
for time has become an essential characteristic of their con- 
tents. Velocities determine mass and dimensions. The 
outcome, as we have already seen, is a space-time within 
which events are geometrically plotted, and which should 
in its geometrical configurations swallow up not only iner- 
tial and gravitational energy but also that of electro- 
magnetism, if the program which Einstein has presented, 
after his initial success in dealing with gravitation, is car- 
ried through to its completion. 

The scientist finds himself, then, in a perceptual world 
within which he can make carefully devised observations 
and refined measurements, the reality of which he does not 
question in the face of the problem that engages his atten- 
tion. What he does question are the objects of that world 
within which contradictions or discrepancies have broken 
out. Abstraction from these questionable characteristics 
leaves him still with perceptual objects constituting his 
scientific data, which moreover will be made the test of any 
hypothesis that he may advance as a solution of his problem. 
It is the scientific datum in the world to which it belongs 
which constitutes for him the independent reality, that 
reality that is independent of any hypothesis. In so far 
as he recognizes that a problem may break out anywhere 
in experience, such data may be said to be independent of 
any object or structure of objects; but such a problem must 
arise in a world which will present its own unquestioned 
scientific data. That is, the scientist never approaches the 
world as a whole. He must cease to be a research scientist 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 111 

and become a philosopher before the so-called epistemologi- 
cal problem can be his problem. 

In the field of classical mechanics his own abstracted 
space and time could be imaginatively conceived of as in- 
definitely divisible. They were continua whose fractional 
parts made up the wholes of this abstracted perceptual space 
and time. Furthermore there appeared in perceptual ex- 
perience not only volumes that were continua capable of 
such divisions, but also contents of pressure and resistance 
that were also continua capable of like subdivision, and were 
correlated with the physical concept of mass, both as 
quantity of matter and as inertia. These contact experiences 
occupy a critical position in perception, since they present 
within the manipulatory area what is symbolized in the 
distance experience. They constitute the "matter" of the 
physical object promised by our distance experiences. The 
objects the scientist observes, and the apparatus he handles 
and with which he makes his most refined measurements, 
are subject to this test of perceptual reality. The con- 
tact experience must answer to the visual experience if the 
objects and their world are there. The close correlation 
of mass and motion with the matter of perceptual experience, 
and that of the continua of the space and time of physical 
science with those abstracted from perceptual experience, 
made it possible without friction or incongruity to present 
the scientific objects of classical mechanics in the perceptual 
field of the scientist's own scientific data. 

I have already referred to the profound revolution in the 
conception of the physical object which the theories of 
electro-magnetism and relativity have brought about. The 
perceptual object must be there in order that it may endure. 
The perceptual object cannot be an event. Events in the 
perceptual world presuppose physical things that have loca- 
tions, and material contents that are irrelevant to time. In 



112 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

the structure of the perceptual world space and time are 
inevitably separated. A world of space-time occupied by 
events is no longer congruous with the perceptual world, 
and the only correlation between the two is that of logical 
patterns. The world of the scientist's experimental find- 
ings cannot belong to the world to which they refer. 

And there is another revolutionary phase in this most 
modern physical theory. While all of our distance experi- 
ence predominantly the world of vision points to a reality 
of contact, though this is placed and ordered in a structure 
in which eye and hand mutually control each other; the 
universe of relativity is entirely visual, fashioned by the 
mechanism of light signals. These signals, immediately 
directed toward physical things, are reflected from one con- 
sentient set to another, so that their reality is never found 
in any moving or resting thing but rather in transformation- 
formulae by which one distance structure may be translated 
into another; while the ultimate space-time to which they 
are referred is a texture that is so caught in its own curva- 
ture that these distance symbols can only symbolize the 
logic of symbolization. It is as though the possibility of 
formulating any set of meanings in terms of any other set 
of meanings were used to reduce all meanings to the mech- 
anism of translation. Matter transferred to distance ex- 
perience becomes only a curvature of space-time. 

I have already touched upon that character of the physical 
thing which exhibits itself in its acting upon us and other 
physical things from within itself, from its inside. This 
character does not appear in the scientist's account of physi- 
cal things. His statement of inertia as the tendency of a 
body to remain in the state of rest or motion in which it is 
found, and of force as that which is the cause of such a 
state, is always in terms of velocities, accelerations, decelera- 
tions, and their ratios to each other. It never deals with 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 113 

the inside of a body but only with the outside which the 
analysis of the body reveals. 

It is a matter of course that the things involved in the 
observation of the scientist, and the apparatus of his labora- 
tory and experiment are not part of the uncertain field of 
his problem, and that they have a reality independent of 
the solution of the problem. Otherwise the problem could 
never be solved. For example, the actual observations of 
the position of the stars about the eclipsed sun upon the 
negatives and the apparatus by which these positions were 
measured to high degrees of accuracy, unquestionably had 
a reality to the scientist upon which he depended for his 
judgment of Einstein's hypothesis. His ultimate reality 
is found in these carefully devised observations and experi- 
ments, and the things there present do not fall under doubt 
at least until a new problem arises which may involve these 
very things and the scientist's experience of them. Then, 
however, he approaches the new problem with a set of 
equally carefully devised observations and experiments and 
the unquestioned things which these involve. 

It is also true that at the other end of his undertaking 
when he has assured himself of the viability of his hy- 
pothesis, and has perhaps stated it with the finality of the 
geometry of a Minkowski space-time, this finality in form 
has no place in his scientific attitude. He is as ready to 
find a problem within this system as elsewhere in the uni- 
verse. His finality of statement is logical, that is, it is an 
affirmation that the hypothesis has been brought into con- 
sistent relation to all other pertinent findings in the world 
as it exists for us. For the moment it meets the demands 
of what we call the facts, as for example the Newtonian 
mechanics did for two centuries. Both the factual setting 
of his problem and the successful denouement of his in- 
vestigation have in the scientist's world a reality that belongs 



114 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to the present, without the slightest prejudgment as to their 
reality in a later present. It is only when he philosophizes 
that the relation of these presents to each other becomes a 
problem. It is not and cannot be a scientific problem, for 
it could neither be stated nor solved by an experimental 
method. 

If we recur to the reality of the data in the scientist's 
procedure, we recognize, as I have already noted, that the 
data have in one sense a longer period than the objects in 
terms of which they are stated. In the case of photographs 
of the positions of the stars about the rim of the eclipsed 
sun, these positions are stated in terms of the changes in 
chemical structures on the plate. The nature of these 
chemical structures, and what takes place under exposure 
to light, will probably change with the development of physi- 
cal science; but the relative positions of these spots on the 
plate will remain unaffected by the different nature of the 
plate as an object. In the same fashion relative positions 
of the stars and planets can be traced in reports of the 
observations of Mesopotamian astrologers, in the catalogues 
of Grecian astronomers, in the recorded observations of 
Tycho Brahe, and in those of Copernican astronomers. The 
objects these various watchers of the sky saw were pro- 
foundly different, but it is possible to identify in all these 
records the same relative positions. It would, however, be 
a mistake to assume that the scientist could observe simply 
relative positions, or that in the world of reality by which 
he tests hypotheses such abstractions can have an inde- 
pendent existence. They are abstractions from things and 
have reality only in the concretion of these things. The 
scientist may or may not be uncertain of the nature of the 
stars, but if his uncertainty were resolved, the stars would be 
objects in his perceptual world whose positions he would be 
recording, though the stars will presumably have another 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 115 

nature for later astronomers. Furthermore even in his un- 
certainty he must be observing unquestioned perceptual ob- 
jects distant spots of light and photographic plates. A 
world cannot be constructed from scientific data that have 
been abstracted from the world within which the problem 
arises. It is also true that in testing the logical consistency 
of his theory the scientist carries his problem back, at least 
presumptively, into the structure of those perceptual objects 
that his problem does not affect, but if such objects lie out- 
side the problem, any inconsistency militates against the 
theory, not against the reality of the objects. 

Now the import of this character of the scientist's method 
is, as Professor Dewey has long since insisted, that the 
knowledge-process lies inside of experience, and that the 
so-called percepts that have not fallen under the doubt 
knowledge seeks to resolve are simply there, and are affected 
with no cognitive character. We are not aware of objects 
about us, except as we seek to reassure ourselves of their 
existence, their qualities and their meanings; though any 
object may fall under suspicion and so become an assured 
object of knowledge. We must be able, for logical and 
methodological purposes, to state things which are simply 
there in terms of what we do find in our cognitive adven- 
tures. 

I will not argue at length Professor Dewey's analysis of 
cognition, since I am not likely to better his account of it, 
nor make it more convincing to those whom he has not 
convinced. I should, however, like to emphasize one fea- 
ture of this experience which is called perception even when 
it is applied to what is simply there apart from any attitude 
of awareness on the part of the so-called percipients. This 
feature is that of the distance-character of all our perceptual 
objects. As I have already indicated, this experience is one 
which is dominated by the head and its neural inheritance. 



116 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

The physical thing has arisen in experience through the di- 
rect control of our conduct toward it in so far as it is related 
to our organisms by the distance senses lodged in the head, 
when this relation through the distance-senses calls out 
in advance and controls manipulatory reactions toward the 
distant object we are seeking or avoiding, The perceptual 
object answers to a collapsed act, and if we are in doubt 
as to the reality of what we see or hear, we must carry the act 
out to the point of actual contact. The doubting Thomas 
can be convinced only by his hand. Even tactual illusion 
can only be dissipated by other contacts. The world that 
stretches away from our manipulatory area, especially in 
its perspective characters, is most readily thrown into the 
cognitive field, though this never concerns more than cer- 
tain features of the world. There is always a world of 
perceptual reality there which is the basis for our investiga- 
tion. It is easy therefore for the psychologist and the epi- 
stemologist with his penny to generalize this attitude and 
attach awareness to all perceptual experience. The answer 
to him is to be found in the location of his doubt and the 
fashion in which he dispels it. 

We cannot, of course, go back of the immediate experi- 
ence of handling or seeing an object. But we can state the 
conditions under which the object of our manipulation and 
sight is there. These conditions include not only the struc- 
ture of the physical world in which the objects are found, 
but also the organism which is related to it and to them. 
In this sense we can follow out the reflected light as it 
travels to the retina and the passage of the nervous excita- 
tion as it travels along the optic nerve to the central tracts; 
and in the same fashion we can follow out the excitation of 
the nerves which pass from the skin, muscles and joints in 
our handling of the object. 

But it is evident that this analysis takes place within a 



EMPIRICAL REALISM 117 

world of things not thus analysed; for the objects about us 
are unitary objects, not simple sums of the parts into which 
analysis would resolve them. And they are what they are 
in relation to organisms whose environment they constitute. 
When we reduce a thing to parts we have destroyed the 
thing that was there. It is no longer a table or a tree or an 
animal. And even if by some process these parts should 
coalesce and become the things that they were, it still re- 
mains the case that they would not be things they were in 
this environment of this organism, if they ceased to be parts 
of this environment. We refer to these differences as the 
meanings these things have in their relationship to the or- 
ganisms. Still, these meanings belong to the things, and are 
as objective as are those characters of the things that belong 
to them in the environments of other organisms. The sen- 
suous characters are largely the same for organisms endowed 
with like apparatus of sense perception; though there are 
always differences in these characters due to differences in 
these apparatuses and to the conditions under which the 
things enter into relation with the senses of the various 
organisms. Other characters such as nutritiousness for an 
animal that can digest and assimilate certain things, danger- 
ousness or protection, equally arise as objective characters 
when the objects enter relations with certain organisms, and 
take on these meanings. Such characters evidently emerge 
with the development of organisms and in their changing 
experience. 

Science undertakes to isolate the conditions under which 
these new things arise, or have arisen. It abstracts from 
the peculiarities of particular experience and seeks that 
which is common among as many experiences as possible. 
It thus reaches things which upon the supposition of analysis 
have a common reality apart from the particular experience 
within which the analysed objects existed. We thus reach 



118 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

things that belong to any possible experience up to the limits 
of our powers of generalization. The question arises whether 
that which answers to these widest generalizations escapes 
from experience, and from the characters and meanings 
which belong to experience. Can we in thought reach that 
which is independent of the situation within which the think- 
ing takes place? I am asking the question not from the 
standpoint of the metaphysician and logician, who start with 
an apparatus of thinking and a cognition that are precondi- 
tions of the experience within which they appear; but from 
the standpoint of a science that has undertaken to trace the 
development of thought out of the lowliest types of behavior. 
If we posit a mind having an inherent power of entering 
into cognitive relation with objects that are simply there for 
its awareness and thought, this mind may be able to identify 
things independent of the experiences of the organisms 
that have become in some fashion endowed with such minds. 
Or we may with the idealists transfer all environments to 
mind itself. But if mind is simply an emergent character of 
certain organisms in their so-called intelligent responses to 
their environments, mind can never transcend the environ- 
ment within which it operates. Nor can it by generalizing all 
possible experiences get beyond any possible experience; 
for it must do its thinking within some experience, and the 
meanings that arise out of the relation of the minded organ- 
ism to its environment must belong to the object of its 
perception and its widest thought. It may be claimed that 
an emergent evolution can not deny the possibility of the 
emergence of a realist's mind, with just that power of enter- 
ing into cognitive relations with objects; the answer, how- 
ever, will be found in the natural history of mind and the 
study of mental operations. 



II 

THE PHYSICAL THING 1 

A. It is evident that a definition of the physical thing in 
terms of manipulatory and distance experience must apply 
also to the organism as a physical thing. The organism is 
seen and felt. We supplement what comes through direct 
vision by what is obtained through mirrors and visual 
images, and our hands come into contact with practically 
the whole surface of our bodies. Kinaesthetic and visceral 
experiences can be located as inside our organisms only when 
these organisms have attained outsides. If we use pres- 
sures of surfaces of our own bodies against each other in 
the experience of bodies acting upon us, this only takes 
place in so far as the body and other objects have been 
organized in a common field of physical things. Without 
doubt surfaces in contact and organic experiences bounded 
by these surfaces are, in the experience of the infant, the 
experiences out of which the outsides and insides of things 
arise. However, the child can delimit his bodily surfaces 
only through things not his body, and he reaches the entire 
surfaces of things not his body before he reaches his own 
organism as a bounded thing. Genetically the infant ad- 
vances from the periphery toward his body. If he uses the 
pressures of the organism in putting insides into things, the 
body must earlier have been defined by its contacts with 
bounded things. It is important to recognize that this con- 
tinues in experience to be the relationship between physical 
things and the body as a physical thing, and between physical 

1 Sections (A) and (B) in this Essay are parallel accounts taken 
from, two different manuscripts. 

119 



120 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

things other than the body. We get by analysis into the in- 
sides of things only by reaching new outsides which are 
actually or imaginatively the conditions for that pressure 
experience which appears as the inside either of the body 
or of other physical things. 

Sets of physical things are then defined by their 
boundaries, and among those things the bodily organism 
obtains its definition in the same fashion. If for example 
we regard the colors and tactual feel of things as dependent 
upon physiological processes within the organism, the argu- 
ment proceeds upon the assumption of definable physical 
things including the organism as there. In experience there 
is no priority of reality ascribed to the bodily organism. If 
it is conceivable that the hand should pass through the table 
that is seen, it is equally conceivable that the hand should 
pass through the seen leg. These physical things are all of 
them distance experiences. That is, they are placed in a 
space, and to be so placed they are ordered from center 
of a system of coordinates. The forms in which they 
appear are optical perspectives, and perception realizes them 
in terms of the experience of the manipulatory area, in which 
they are subject to the test of contact, for their perceptual 
reality; but they remain in that area visual objects. Within 
this manipulatory area the distortions of the optical perspec- 
tives disappear. Things reach standard sizes. That they 
have standard sizes implies that the center O may be found 
at any point where the things would have the spatial values 
found in this manipulatory area. The fundamental postu- 
late of Newtonian physics that any set of Cartesian co- 
ordinates may be taken as the basis for the ordering and 
measuring of things and their motions is involved in our 
perceptual world. Conceptual thought has formulated logi- 
cally the attitude of perceptual experience. The question 
then arises, what is the nature of this attitude by which per- 



THE PHYSICAL THING 121 

ception shifts indifferently from one center O to another? 

In immediate perception distance stimulations are ade- 
quate to call out approach or withdrawal, and consequent 
contacts and consummations. That perception should pre- 
sent distant objects as having the physical values of the 
manipulatory area is not involved in the successful behavior 
of a percipient organism. To say that the memory image of 
the distant stimulation as it appeared in a manipulatory area 
is fused with the distant stimulation is to cover up a process 
with a term. It can be so fused because the distant stimula- 
tion is already a physical thing. Within the manipulatory 
area the object acts upon the percipient organism, and action 
in the perceptual experience means the pressure of its volume 
upon the organism. There are an infinity of other character- 
istics of its action, its temperature, its odor and so forth; 
but these are all characteristics of it as a massive thing, and 
this inner nature of the physical thing we never reach by 
subdividing its visual boundaries. There appears in the 
physical thing a content which originally belongs only to 
the organism, that of pressure, what Whitehead has called 
the "pushiness" of things, and the question is how it gets 
into the thing. Distant visual and contact tactual bound- 
aries are there in immediate experience. I am not con- 
sidering the metaphysical question of how we get from an 
inner experience to a world outside ourselves, but how dis- 
tant and bounded objects get the insides of perceptual 
objects insides never revealed by subdivision. The sug- 
gestion which I have already made is that the pressures of 
bodily surfaces against each other, preeminently of one 
hand against the other, are transferred to the object, and 
the question I am raising is how this transference takes 
place. 

The only answer that I can give to the question is that 
the organism in grasping and pushing things is identifying 



122 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

its own effort with the contact experience of the thing. It 
increases that experience by its own efforts. To take hold 
of a hard object is to stimulate oneself to exert that inner 
effort. One arouses in himself an action which comes also 
from the inside of the thing. It comes from the inside of 
the thing because the experience is increased by the action 
of bodies upon organisms and upon other things within the 
perceptual world. The organism's object arouses in the 
organism the action of the object upon the organism, and 
so becomes endowed with that inner nature of pressure which 
constitutes the inside of the physical thing. It is only in 
so far as the organism thus takes the attitude of the thing 
that the thing acquires such an inside. 

The formula for this process is that the thing stimulates 
the organism to act as the thing acts upon the organism, and 
that the action of the thing is the organism's resistance to 
pressure such as arises when a hard object is firmly grasped 
in the hand. The resistance of the object is continuous 
with the effort of the hand. In the development of the 
infant this experience must come earlier than that of its 
own physical organism as a whole. The infant must be 
placing this effort of his inside of things before he is in a 
position to identify the effort as his own. His surroundings 
stretch away on all sides, and colored shapes come to be 
located and familiar in a world within which his body comes 
finally to occupy a defined place. Meantime the pressure 
of his body and the grasping of his hands have to localize 
things from an inside attitude, and he finally reaches him- 
self as a thing through the action of other things upon him. 
Matter is the name we give to this nature of things, and its 
characteristic is that it is identical with the response that it 
calls out. Weight as pressure, or inertia as resistance to 
change of rest or motion, is identical with the effort by which 
the weight is upheld or the body is brought into motion or 



THE PHYSICAL THING 123 

set at rest. The body has an abundance of other characters 
which inhere in the matter, but none of these others has 
this characteristic. Color, sound, taste, and odor cannot 
be identified with the responses which they elicit, either in 
organisms or in other objects; while the experiential inner 
content of matter is identical with the responses which it 
calls out in things. It was the striking achievement of 
Renaissance science that it isolated this character of matter 
as inertia. Newton could refer to it either as the quantity 
of matter or as the property of matter by which it continues 
in its state of rest or motion unless acted upon by an ex- 
ternal force. Inertia and force could then be equated. In 
the equations of Newtonian mechanics mass is defined in 
terms of force and force is defined in terms of mass. Here 
Newton was reflecting a fundamental attitude of experience 
toward things. 

We are now, I think, in a position to answer the question 
raised earlier: how do we come to give to the thing at a 
distance the physical values of the manipulatory area? 
Another phrasing of the question would be; what is the 
experiential background of the homogeneity of space? In 
the first place, the continuity of the experience of effort and 
the matter of the physical thing provide a common inner 
nature of things that is recognized whenever the distance 
experience is completed in its contact implications. In the 
second place, this inner nature is there only in so far as it 
calls out the response of effort. The distant object, setting 
in train the responses of grasping and manipulation, calls 
out in the organism its own inner nature of resistance. We 
have here the basis for Lipps' empathy. It would be a mis- 
take to regard this inner nature of matter as a projection 
by the organism of its sense of effort into the object. The 
resistance is in the thing as much as the effort is in the 
organism, but the resistance is there only over against effort 



124 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

or the action of other things. Brought thus within the field 
of effort, action and reaction are equal. The inner character 
of the thing is indeed due to the organism to the continuity 
of effort and resistance. However, the character of inner- 
ness arises only with the appearance of the organism as 
an object, with the definition of surfaces and experiences 
of the organism that lie inside of its bounded surfaces. What 
I wish to emphasize is that the physical thing in contact 
pressures, and at a distance in awakening anticipatory manip- 
ulatory responses, calls out in the organism what is con- 
tinuous with its own inner nature, so that the action of the 
thing where it is, is identified with the response of the 
organism. It is this that makes it possible for the organism 
to place itself and its manipulatory area at any distant 
object, and to extend the space of the manipulatory area 
indefinitely, thus reaching out of dissonant perspectives a 
homogeneous space. What is essential is that the physical 
thing arouses in the organism its own response of resist- 
ance, that the organism as matter is acting as the physical 
thing acts. 

There are two expressions I have used above which 
call for further comment. One is the identification of the 
inner effort of the organism with the matter of the object. 
As I have indicated, this does not imply that the organism 
projects an inner content into the object. The resistance 
is there over against the effort, but in the organism of the 
infant there is not only the response of pressing against the 
thing, but also, through the integration of the central nervous 
system, the arousal of the response of pressing the other 
hand against the hand that is pressing the thing. The or- 
ganism acts upon itself, and in acting upon itself its re- 
sponses are identical with those it makes to things. The 
thing, then, arouses in the organism the tendency to respond 
as the thing responds to the organism. We have learned 



THE PHYSICAL THING 125 

in recent years that it is the function of the central nervous 
system in the higher forms to connect every response poten- 
tially with every other response in the organism. In a sense 
all responses are so interconnected by way of interrelated 
innervation and inhibition. There is a distinction to be made, 
however, between the object in the manipulatory area that 
is both seen and handled, and the distant object that is both 
out of reach and also lies in a visual perspective. We have 
seen that the continuity of effort and the resistance of mat- 
ter facilitate the placing of the organism with its manipula- 
tory area at the distant object. The sense in which this 
takes place is found in the responses which would arise at 
that location, responses which are aroused, though in- 
hibited, within the organism. What I have just been indicat- 
ing is that the distant object calls out the response of its 
own resistance as well as the effort of reacting to it. What 
is involved in a distant object being "there" is not simply 
the tendency to respond to it, even in an anticipatory fashion, 
nor is its location as a physical object achieved by a mere 
sensory image of its feel, unless we mean by the memory 
image the tendency in the infant's organism to press as the 
distant object presses, thus calling out the tendency to re- 
spond with his own pressure. It is this latter response that 
in our experience constitutes the physical object a some- 
thing with an inside. I am convinced that this embodiment 
of the object in the responses of the organism is the essential 
factor in the emergence of the physical thing. 

The object is there in its immediate resistance to the 
effort of the organism. It is not there as an object, how- 
ever, that is, it has no inside. It gets its inside when it 
arouses in the organism its own response and thus the 
answering response of the organism to this resistance. What 
has been termed this nature of the object as it is called out 
in the organism appears in the sensation of hardness or re- 



126 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

sistance. There is indeed, as Locke assumed, the same 
extended resistant nature in the experience of the individual 
as in the world, but for Locke this was in the experience of 
the individual an "idea," that is, a sensation. If we recognize 
the identity of resistance and effort, then the character of 
an "idea," i.e., something that belongs in the experience of 
the individual, comes to it when the response of the organism 
is aroused in the form of the resistance, the inner nature of 
the thing. These are, as we have seen, identical in character. 
Both the physical object and the organism are material. 
What must be shown is that the object arouses in the or- 
ganism not only an organic response to the physical thing 
but also a response to itself as an object calling out this 
response. The mechanism by which this is accomplished 
is the cerebrum. The mechanism of the cord and its bulb 
is one simply of responses to outer stimuli. Such stimuli 
are imperative in their demands. The cerebrum, on the 
other hand, is an organ which integrates a vast variety of 
responses, including the lower reflexes, and is specifically 
the center for the distance sense organs located in the head. 
In the integrative process there are different alternative com- 
binations and corresponding alternatives also for the inhibi- 
tions that integration necessarily involves. This introduces 
delay in response, and adjustment by way of selection of 
type of response, i.e., choice. Choice implies more than the 
contest of two or more stimuli for the control of the organic 
response. It implies that the situation is in some sense 
within the behavior pattern in the organism. What is not 
done defines the object in the form in which we do react to 
it. The bounding surfaces of an object, its resistances in 
various possible reactions upon it, the uses to which it could 
be put in varying degrees, go to make up that object, and 
are characters of the object that would lose their static na- 
ture if the responses they involve were actually carried out. 



THE PHYSICAL THING 127 

They are competitors for the action of the organism, but 
in so far as they are not carried out they constitute the 
object upon which the action takes place, and within the 
whole act fix the conditions of the form the act takes on. 
All these responses are found in the nervous system as paths 
of reaction interconnected with all the other paths. If cer- 
tain responses are prepotent they ipso facto inhibit all the 
others. It is possible to follow this process of inhibition in 
some detail in the use of antagonistic muscles and conflicting 
reflexes. There is as definite a relaxation of certain muscles 
as there is innervation of others. In order to carry out one 
response, the cerebrum inhibits other responses. The system 
is as responsible for what it does not do as for what it does. 
Within the field of matter, the resistance which the volume 
of a body offers to the hand, or to any surface of the body, 
and the tendencies to manipulate it when seen at a distance, 
are organized in various ways. There is, for example, the 
tendency to pick up a book on a distant table. The form 
and resistance of the book are present in some sense in the 
adjustment already present in the organism when the book is 
seen. My thesis is that the inhibited contact responses in the 
distance experience constitute the meaning of the resistance 
of the physical object. They are, in the first place, in op- 
position to the responses actually innervated or in prospect 
of being innervated. They are competitors for the field of 
response. They also within the whole act fix the conditions 
of the actual response. I am referring specifically to the 
responses which go to make up matter in the distance ex- 
perience. If I see a distant book an indefinite number of 
manipulatory responses are aroused, such as grasping it in 
a number of ways, opening, tearing its leaves, pressing upon 
it, rubbing it, and a host of others. One, picking up the 
book, is prepotent and organizes the whole act. It therefore 
inhibits all others. The tendencies to perform these others 



128 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

involve the same resistance of manipulation, and are now 
in direct opposition to the prepotent response; but while in 
opposition they provide the conditions for the exercise of the 
prepotent response. The feel of the book if one rubbed it, 
the contours if one passed one's hands about it, the possibility 
of opening the book, etc., determine the form that the grasp- 
ing and lifting up of the book will take. In general what 
one does not do to the book, in so far as this calls out the 
same resistance as that given in actually manipulating the 
book, and in so far as it is inhibited by what one does do 
to the book, occupies in the experience the "what the book 
is" over against the response which is the expression of the 
act. Inhibition here does not connote bare nonexistence of 
these responses, for they react back upon the prepotent re- 
sponse to determine its form and nature. The way in which 
one grasps the book is determined by the other paths of 
response, both by those that are inhibited and by the controls 
of adjustments in which responses not carried out are yet 
partially innervated. The act is a moving balance within 
which many responses play in and out of the prepotent re- 
sponse. What is not done acts in continual definition of 
what is done. It is the resistance in what is not done that 
is the matter of the object to which we respond. 

So far as the world exists for the organism, so far as it 
is the environment of the organism, it is reflected in the 
reactions of the organism to the world. What we actually 
come into contact with is there over against the organism, 
but by far the larger part of what surrounds us we do not 
rest upon nor manipulate. It is distant from us in space and 
in time; yet it has an inner content that is a continuation of 
what lies under our feet and within our grasp. These distant 
objects not only call out in us direct responses of moving 
toward or away from and manipulating them, but they also 
arouse in us the objects that act upon us from within our- 



THE PHYSICAL THING 129 

selves. I have been seeking to present the neural mechanism 
by which this inner nature of the outside thing appears in 
experience. 

If the sight of the book calls out a direct response of 
movement toward it, there is in this response nothing but 
the excitement of the organism to that act. If, however, all 
the other responses the book may be responsible for, are 
aroused, they can only enter into the act in so far as they 
are inhibited or coordinated. They are in opposition to 
the prepotent response of moving toward the book until the 
integration of the act arranges them in their spatial and 
temporal relations with the inhibition of their immediate 
expression. It is this opposition which I have referred 
to as resistance. The brain is the portion of the central 
nervous system that belongs to the distance senses. It has, 
however, direct connection with the reflexes of the spinal 
system. It not only orients the head, and so the organism, 
toward distant objects, but also connects these distant stimuli 
with the responses of the trunk and the limbs which these ob- 
jects call out when the organism has been brought into con- 
tact range of the objects, so that these later responses are 
aroused in advance of the situation within which they can be 
effectively innervated. The object is then expressing itself 
in the organism not only in stimulating it to approach or 
withdrawal but also in arousing in anticipatory fashion re- 
actions that will later be carried out. By the term "ex- 
presses itself" I mean that the relations that make of the 
surrounding objects the environment of the organisms are 
active in the organism. The environment is there for the 
organism in the interrelationship of organism and environ- 
ment. The delayed responses integrated in the act toward 
the distant object constitute the object as it will be or at 
least may be for the organism. But that it may be an object 
it must have aji inner content, which we refer to as the re- 



130 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

suits of responses now delayed. That these should be in 
some sense present in the distant object is what calls for 
explanation. The explanation I am offering is in terms of 
the resistance they meet in the prepotent act with reference 
to which they must be integrated. This resistance is found 
in the adjustment and delay in execution and the inhibitions 
these entail. 

The primary phase of this resistance we have found to 
lie in the matter of the physical object. The continuity of 
the resistance of the object with the resistances of parts of 
the organism to each other constitutes the matter both of the 
objects and of the organism, and carries over to objects 
the innerness of organic resistances to them, while the ob- 
jects in their spatial organization lead to the definition of 
the organism as a physical object. But, as I have already 
noted, this resistance appears as the innerness of the physical 
thing only when the object calls out in the organism the 
object's own attitude of resistance. The physical thing uses 
our tendencies to resist in advance of actual contact, so that 
it exists in the behavior of the organism, not as the organism's 
sensation, but as the entrance of the organism into objects, 
through its assuming their attitudes and thus defining and 
controlling its own response. There is, of course, the im- 
mediate response of the organism to the pressure that comes 
upon it, into which the object as object does not enter. 
Here there is no character of an object which would be 
denominated as a sensation. There is merely the brute 
response of organism to its environment. But when this 
attitude of resistance of the object to the organism can be 
aroused within the organism itself, over against the 
organism's resistance to it, then there is that which a phi- 
losophy of mind could locate in the organism as mental 
an idea, in Locke's sense. An examination of the growth 
of the infant's experience, however, shows that the environ- 



THE PHYSICAL THING 131 

ment must first have entered the organic responses of the 
child as a resistance it possesses in common with resistances 
which the organism offers to itself, before the organism could 
define itself and its experiences over against the physical 
things around it. It is the mechanism of the cerebrum 
which, in its connections with the responses of the cord and 
the brain stem, has made possible this playing the part of 
the physical object within the behavior of the organism; 
and in particular it has utilized the manipulatory responses 
of the hand in their interruption of the procedure of the re- 
sponse to its consummation. Here the common resistance of 
thing and hand opens the door to the thing to play its part 
in the behavior of the organism. And it remained for 
Renaissance science to isolate these measurable character- 
istics of the physical thing, as the conditions for all other 
characters of the thing as they appear in experience. 

In immediate experience the thing is smooth or rough, 
is pleasant or painful, as directly as it is resistant. Smooth- 
ness or roughness or pleasantness or distress involve various 
responses carried out toward the distant object, and these 
enter into the organization of the act even though im- 
mediately inhibited. That they are not immediately carried 
out means that they are organized about the prepotent re- 
sponse of approach or withdrawal and subsequent reactions. 
My thesis is that the resistance which this organization of 
the act puts upon them identifies them as characters of 
the thing, though as qualities which inhere in the physical 
thing as a resistant object. The surface we call smooth 
calls out a tendency to stroke it, but that one may not do 
this until he has reached it and got hold of it means that the 
actual appearance of smoothness or pleasantness awaits the 
manipulatory resistance of the physical thing. The de- 
pendence of the appearance of these characters upon the 
act organized with reference to the attainment of the physical 



132 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

object is the organic phase of the contact reality of the 
distance object. My point is that this contact reality of 
the distance object asserts itself in neural organization by 
the inhibition of the reaction which these characters of the 
distant object call out through the organized act which 
realizes them. In so far as the tendency to stroke the distant 
smooth object is held in check by the organization of the act 
which will realize the tendency, it is an affirmation of the 
conditional reality of the smoothness of the object. If it 
cannot fit into the organization of such an act we dismiss it 
as illusory; e.g., the apparent wetness of the shimmer above 
the desert sand cannot be fitted into the act of going to and 
drinking the illusory water. It is the acceptance of inhibi- 
tions involved in the organized attitude of approach that con- 
fers these qualities upon the distant object. The resistances 
involved in organization lead up to processes that are aroused 
before they can be realized and which yet can determine the 
form of the act which completes them. 

The development of the head, and of the cerebrum as 
the seat of the distance senses, has given to the organism 
the two fundamental characters that belong to mind. It has 
brought about the anticipatory arousal of reactions that can 
only be realized upon the accomplishment of the reaction of 
the body to its immediate resistances in reaching its goal. 
In the organization of the act so that these aroused but un- 
completed reactions may be fulfilled it has introduced the 
future into the mechanism of the act, and the conditioning 
of the present and future by each other. Again, it has made 
possible the excitement within the organism of that resist- 
ance of the physical thing which is common to thing and 
organism. The physical thing external to the organism can 
call out its own response and the answering reaction of the 
organism. In the form of spatially defined resistance the 
action of the distant object is present in the responses of the 



THE PHYSICAL THING 133 

organism, with its value in exciting the appropriate reactions 
of the organism. In the form of a response the distant 
object is present in the conduct of the organism. Further- 
more, other characters of the object, dependent for their 
realization upon the carrying out of an organic act, become, 
through the organization of the responses to them into the 
act and the acceptance of its control, ways in which the 
object appears in the conduct of the organism. The object 
can thus appear in experience through the reaction of the 
organism to it, given the mechanism of the upper nervous 
system. It is there in the values it will have, reflected in 
the responses of the organism; but it is there in advance 
of the responses. And it is because the objects are there 
that the organism can become an object itself in its experi- 
ence. 

B. There is a characteristic difference between the so- 
called primary and the secondary qualities. The stuff of 
matter appears in the primary qualities of extension, effec- 
tive occupation of space and mobility. These answer in our 
experience to what has been called by Newton the quantity 
of matter. This appears in immediate experience of the 
spatial resistance of the body. It appears in momentum. At 
least this is experience of the object as offering extended re- 
sistance, of our own bodies acquiring momentum, of the 
effort necessary to set a massive body in motion and to 
change its state of motion. Extension, volume, and resist- 
ance to change of rest or motion, these cannot be exactly 
defined in terms of our sensuous experience, but they are 
characters which enable us to put ourselves inside of the 
physical object. Its resistance is equal to ours. It feels the 
same. In the case of the secondary qualities the characters 
which appear in our vision, hearing, tasting and smelling can- 
not be shared with the characters in the physical object which 
they answer to. It is not by being red, or salt, or noisy, or 



134 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

redolent that the organism finds itself in relation with objects 
having these characters. It is by resisting that the organ- 
ism is in relationship with resistant objects. If we seek for 
the biological mechanism of this experience, as we do for 
that of the other so-called senses, we find it in the resistances 
which the different parts of the organism present to each 
other. The hand, notably, presses against different parts of 
the body, and they, in response to that pressure, resist it. 
When one presses against the surface of a table he has the 
same experience as when he presses against his hand, except 
for the absence of the response of resisting the pressure of 
the other hand. But there is a common content there, by 
means of which the organism later passes over into the in- 
sides of things. In no other sensuous experience do we pass 
over into the thing. It can affect us by its color, odor, flavor 
or temperature, but the relation does not set up in us the 
character of the object. Resistance, or the effective occupa- 
tion of space, Locke's "solidity," has in experience a com- 
mon character, as Locke felt, which is both in the individual 
and in outer things. If we state it in terms of an "idea," of 
a sensation in the mind, the whole affair, external effect as 
well as internal feeling, is shut up in the mind, where 
Berkeley placed it, and where Hume left it to be dispersed 
with the other impressions of the mind. What calls for 
further analysis than the psychology of their period admitted 
is that phase of the physical thing which I have referred 
to as its inside. This term does not refer to the new surfaces 
discovered by subdivision of the thing. It does involve that 
unity of the thing which Kant and his idealistic followers 
located in the judging process; but it involves more than 
this viz., an element of activity, expressed in the term 
resistance. When one hand presses against the other, each 
hand resists the other from the inside. As I have said, when 
the hand presses against a table there is an element in the 



THE PHYSICAL THING 135 

resistance of the table that is identical with what we find 
in the mutual resistance of the two hands; but while the 
table resists the hand as effectually as does the other hand, 
the resistance of the table, taken as an abstracted experience, 
lacks the character of activity that belongs to the pressure 
of the opposing hand. Yet it requires an abstraction to take 
this character out of the table. To say that we put this 
character into the thing, whose mass or inertia resists forces 
acting upon it, means either going back to a doctrine of 
consciousness of stuff which separates the individual from 
physical things rather than interrelates him with them, or 
else it ignores the fact that the individual's organism comes 
into experience only as other objects define and orient it. 
Nor are we justified in assuming that an individual locates 
an inside within himself before he does in other things. It 
ought to be sufficiently evident, though it is in fact quite 
generally overlooked, that we become physical things no 
sooner than do the objects that surround us, and that we 
anatomize ourselves, as Russell has recently pointed out, 
only as we anatomize others. But it is possible to recognize 
in the evolution of the neo-pallium a mechanism by which 
higher organisms can live in an environment occupied by 
physical things, including themselves, all of which have in- 
sides. Undoubtedly a response from an inside must come 
from the organism and not from the physical thing outside it, 
but it cannot be located within the organism until the 
organism has been defined by its interrelations with other 
things. 

What the extensive development of the cerebrum has 
made possible is the innervation and organization of re- 
sponses in advance of their execution. When an organism 
endowed with such organs finds its hand pressing against a 
resistant object, there will be an experience common to the 
pressure of the object and of the other hand, and there will 



136 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

be also a stimulus to respond with answering pressure just 
as the other hand would respond. The organism has stimu- 
lated itself, by its action on an object, to act upon itself 
in the fashion of the other object. To an animal whose 
central nervous system includes only a spinal column and a 
brain stem, whose responses, therefore, take place without 
delay, such a tendency to react to its own reaction to an 
object would be incongruous and meaningless. To an 
animal, whose exteroceptors put it into relation with the 
object from afar, and whose neo-pallium enables it to start 
and organize its responses in advance of satisfying or dan- 
gerous contact, it is of immense advantage to be able to 
act in a manner in the place of the distant object and thus 
to be ready for its own subsequent reaction. Where the 
action of other things upon us is in some degree identical 
with responses of our own, so that the beginning of our 
action upon them can stimulate us to call out in our organ- 
isms delayed response that puts us in their attitudes, they 
can become objects to us at the same time that we can be- 
come objects to ourselves, since we are approaching our 
own later action from the point of view of the other. For 
we can never become selves unless the action in which we 
are involved includes actiopi toward our own organisms. 
Undoubtedly to become conscious selves the mechanism of 
communication is necessary, but the matrix for communica- 
tion is the stimulation we give to ourselves to act as those 
upon whom we are acting will act. 

There are then two characters of the physical thing, if 
we regard it from the standpoint of the genesis of experience 
as we find it in the individual, and as we infer it to have 
taken place in the early history of the human community. 
The first character is that of the continuity of the experience 
of pressure in the organism and of resistance in the physical 
object. The experience of the organism in its contact with 



THE PHYSICAL THING 137 

the physical object is the pressure which is the character of 
the physical object. This, as we have seen, distinguishes the 
contact experience from the experiences of so-called 
secondary qualities. What is experienced is the resistance 
of the physical thing, and the experience of this resistance 
is itself resistance in the organism. As the expression, 
"experience of," carries with it dangerous implications it is 
better to state the proposition in this manner: that in contact 
experience the resistant character of the object is identical 
with the resistant character of the organism; while in dis- 
tance experience the character of the object is in no way 
present in the organism. The second character the object un- 
doubtedly borrows from the organism, in becoming an object, 
that of actually or potentially acting upon the organism from 
within itself. I have also called this character that of "having 
an inside." It is the character of resistance identical in the 
organism and in the object that opens the door to this bor- 
rowing. To take the attitude of pressing against an object 
is to arouse in the organism the attitude of counter-pressure. 
This is a fundamental attitude reflected also in Newton's 
law of action and reaction. There must be an action of 
the object equal to the action of the organism upon it, in 
order that it may be in our experience a physical thing. In 
grasping the object, in pushing it, in leaning against it, 
in any manipulation of it, the object must come back upon 
the organism with equal resistance, if it is to be and maintain 
itself as a thing. Psychological analysis has here used the 
term "kinaesthetic imagery," and aesthetic analysis has 
referred to it as "empathy." We see the object not simply 
as offering passive resistance, but as actively resisting us. 
But the fundamental importance of these facts for- the 
emergence of the physical object in experience has not, I 
think, been recognized. It is easily overlooked, because the 
attitude of the thing's response to pressure is identical with 



138 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

that of the organism, though opposite in direction. This 
opposition reveals itself in the appearance of the organism 
as a physical object. Such an object can only appear when 
the organism has taken the attitude of acting toward itself, 
and the invitation to this is found in the fact that we have 
stimulated ourselves by our attitude toward the physical 
thing to respond in pressure as the thing responds. 

There are two matters to be considered here. One is the 
relatively late abstraction of the physical object from the 
social object and the necessity that the organism take the 
attitude of the other in order to become an object to himself. 
The other is the structure of space in our experience. This 
finds its expression in the Cartesian coordinates and in the 
preservation of the identical structure no matter where the 
origin of the system is placed. It is the first item in New- 
tonian relativity. In our perceptual space an individual 
finds the center of the system within himself, and the co- 
ordinates extend up and down, to right and left and before 
and behind him. They are organically given in his bilateral 
symmetry and his maintenance of his erect position over 
against a distant object in the line of vision. What I wish 
to point out is that perceptual space involves something 
more than this orientation. Distortions of distant visual 
space are corrected in perception to a very considerable 
degree. We see things in the dimensions and structure of 
the manipulatory area. That is, we extend to them the 
space of the manipulatory area. Now evidently this can 
only be accomplished in immediate experience if there is in 
perception a mechanism for taking the attitude of the distant 
object. It is the sight of the distant physical thing that 
stimulates the organism to take its attitude of resistance, 
which is the import of seeing a hard thing. The sight of a 
physical thing anywhere in our field of perception locates 
us there as well as where we are, and, indeed, because it 



THE PHYSICAL THING 139 

locates us where we are. Over and above the tendency to 
move toward or away from the distant object, immediate 
location in perceptual space implies the presence of a thing 
at the point, and the presence of a thing beyond the stimula- 
tion to approach or move away involves the character of 
action of the thing at the point its active resistance, bor- 
rowed, as I have said, from the responses of the organism. 



Ill 

SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS AND EXPERIENCE 

The knowledge process takes a different route for the 
scientist from that which it takes for the epistemologist. 
The scientist starts with an unquestioned material world and 
with unquestioned objects that appear in the problem with 
which his research is occupied; from these he proceeds by 
inference to the formulation of his hypothesis and the con- 
sequences which it involves, and then on to the observation 
and experiment by which his hypothesis is tested. Although 
he criticizes his perceptual experiences and exhibits the er- 
rors and illusions of perception, his criticism is always 
founded on objects that are there; and his criticism does not 
invalidate these, since he must appeal to them as tests of the 
errors he discovers. In the process of thinking out the 
hypothesis his ideas symbolize relations in a world that is 
there, and he tentatively seeks to find among them such 
interrelations as will overcome conflicts between objects and 
their meanings, or between different meanings of things. He 
finally deduces the results that follow from his hypothetical 
reconstruction, and by observation and experiment in an 
unquestioned world finds, or fails to find, the confirmation he 
is seeking. His cognitive proceeding is from an accepted 
perceptual world through exceptional instances and con- 
flicting meanings on to the same world, after its meanings 
have been reconstructed. That world itself he never ques- 
tions. 

The epistemologist, on the other hand, proceeds from the 
fact that all perceptual experiences are dependent upon the 
relation of the world to the organism, and makes use of such 

140 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 141 

experiences as illusions and perceptual errors in order to 
locate percepts in a consciousness entirely separate from the 
world of objects to which these percepts refer. This posi- 
tion was strongly fortified by the doctrine of Renaissance 
science that secondary qualities cannot belong to the 
physical world with which physical science is occupied. 
Knowledge, as the epistemologist conceives it, undertakes 
to proceed from these states of consciousness, including all 
perceptual experience, over to an ontologically separate 
world to which these states of consciousness seem to refer. 
He is thus led to the conclusion that a cognitive reference at- 
taches to all perceptual experience. The existence of a 
world to which such states of consciousness refer becomes 
the epistemologist's problem. 

It is important to place the scientific object in its relation 
to the perceptual world, which is, as we have seen, presup- 
posed both in the scientist's problem and in his experimental 
data. That object is an abstraction of that within experi- 
ence which is subject to exact measurement. It is further- 
more a physical thing, i.e., it occupies a volume of extension 
that could conceivably be brought within the range of a 
manipulatory experience. Even when we pursue de Broglie's 
idea and state matter in terms of wave motion, we must 
come back to a definable portion of space which is in so far 
within our field of conceivable manipulation that we could 
measure the waves. The ether, as long as science retained 
it, could be conceived of as the stuff occupying this space, 
and elasticity and rigidity could be ascribed to it. 

If we turn to the experimental findings to which even 
the most abstruse hypothesis must appeal, if appeal is by 
any device possible, we find that the test takes place within 
what I have called the manipulatory area. We are here 
dealing with pointer readings that reflect changes lying at a 
distance from the changes in the apparatus. Within this 



THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

manipulatory area visual perspectives disappear, and we 
can reach a high degree of accuracy in measurement. Its 
spatial structure, as we have seen, is that of the rigid body, 
and so far as physical tests can go it is that of Euclidean 
geometry. What is of peculiar importance is that it is 
within this field that we find, directly or indirectly, our 
common objects. For example, the penny with which epi- 
stemologists have been so much occupied is the same penny 
for different observers at different angles and at different 
distances in so far as these different visual pennies are recog- 
nized as appearances of one and the same penny which any 
of the observers, under the control of his visual experience, 
could touch and handle. As a result of a common method of 
manipulation, measurement and location, the manipulatory 
areas of the different observers thus become identical. It 
is important to recognize that while each individual will re- 
ceive from the penny an experience of pressure, in a sense 
peculiar to himself, the method of identifying the penny 
that all will experience is not peculiar to himself. It is a 
logical procedure whose entities and relations exist only in 
so far as they constitute a universal factor in the experience 
of the individual. The individual, that is, does not first 
make his own measurements and reach his own identifica- 
tions, and then compare these with those of others in order 
to reach a common object; his method of determination 
is rather in terms of a language that with its various symbols 
comes into existence only through the fact that the in- 
dividual assumes the attitude common to all those involved 
in the common undertaking. This common penny attains 
the reality of experimental findings, however, only if it comes 
back directly or indirectly to a measurable something in the 
manipulatory area. At the basis of the process of measure- 
ment, of course, there lies the fundamental mechanism of 
perception, in which distance experiences lead to contact 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 143 

experiences that control the environment in the interest of 
the organism. The contact experiences are the reality of the 
distance experiences. The physical object, however, con- 
stitutes a break in the primitive biological process that finds 
its completion in the consummation which the biological 
needs of the organism call for. It is the hand under the 
control of the eye that is responsible for the manipulatory 
area. The handled object comes betwixt and between the 
vision of food and its eating. If the biological process, 
under the distance stimulation, goes through to consumma- 
tion without interruption, no physical object arises in ex- 
perience. In a biological sense the manipulated or physical 
object is thus a mediate reality. In its abstraction from 
consummation it is first of all an implement, and then the 
physical thing of a later science. 

When the Michelson-Morley experiment and the diffi- 
culties brought to light by the lack of invariance in the 
Maxwell equations of electro-magnetism had ejected ether as 
a physical thing, the ether of "stuff," or, to use Whitehead's 
term, the event, was substituted for it, and time entered as a 
dimension of the physical thing. We have already seen that 
in the perceptual world space and time are inevitably sepa- 
rated. Motion involves a something that moves which is 
irrelevant to the temporal process. An event always hap- 
pens to something. A striking result of recent changes in 
physical science, and of the new theories to which these 
changes have given rise, is that the event has taken the place 
of the physical thing. In the perceptual world and in the 
world of masses in motion events happen to things. Over 
against change there are unchanged things which are the 
conditions of change. That is, in the perceptual world space 
and time are necessarily separate. Space-time cannot be 
the form of perceptual experience. We can shift from one 
perspective to another, and realize that what from one stand- 



144 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

point is rest, from another is motion; but in each perspective 
there are permanent things, irrelevant to time, that give 
meaning to the changes that go on within time. If per- 
spectives can be reduced to diverse appearances of things 
that have remained the same during all changes, relativity 
will not bite into the nature of the things; but if the nature 
of things is found in process, in a system of changes, the 
different values which this process takes on from the various 
standpoints of different but related observers must affect the 
natures of the things themselves. Yet we cannot really 
reduce things to processes, for it is not possible that proc- 
esses should go on that are not processes of things, and meas- 
urements can only be made in a situation within which 
something abides irrelevant to time. 

While the event is taking place we watch it or listen 
to it or feel it; but if we can complete the behavior it 
initiates, we isolate the thing to which the event is happening. 
But from the standpoint of relativity no physical object can 
be isolated from what is happening to it. If it is at rest in 
one consentient set under the measurement of a scientist, it 
is moving in another set; and not only are its measurements 
in time and space shifting with the relative velocities of the 
sets, but its inner content of mass varies also. There is noth- 
ing that can be laid hold of except the transformations of 
these measurements from one set to another and the coin- 
cidences of events in an absolute space. Now what this 
amounts to is that we have no sooner got hold of the thing 
in a permanent space within which we can ifleasure it and 
determine its inner mass-content than we must put ourselves 
at a distance from it in another space and determine its 
changes due to the relative velocities of these two spaces and 
their consentient sets. 

We have thus reversed the fundamental order of our 
behavior and have made the "what a thing is" a distance 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 145 

experience instead of a contact experience. The reason for 
this shifting is evident. The object in the manipulatory 
area belongs to the perspective of the individual, and, in so 
far as this manipulatory area can be determined by measure- 
ments which are common to all members of the community 
to which he belongs, to the space and time of the consentient 
set of which his organism as a physical thing is a member. 
It is only by putting ourselves in the distant consentient set 
that we can realize that the distortions the objects of that set 
suffer are the same as those our set undergoes when seen 
from that standpoint. Since there is no absolute space to 
which these differing standpoints can be referred, as the 
perspectives of vision can be referred to a common manip- 
ulatory area, there can be no manipulatory area to which 
these perspectives or frames of reference may be referred. 
The measuring-rod and the clock that gives the local time 
belong to the manipulatory area, and the quantities they 
measure will vary from one set to another. There is no 
common measuring rod, and no common clock, that all can 
accept. The different observers can only make use of 
formulae of transformation by which measurements made 
in one set can be read into those of another. We are left 
therefore with a language of distance light-signals which 
can refer to no object common to the experience of all. It 
is true that by application of the formulae we can isolate 
a constant value for the interval between the coincidences 
of events in a Minkowski space-time, and that this constant 
value may be regarded as the common reality to which all 
the different measurements, made from the standpoints of 
various perspectives, ultimately refer. This space-time, 
however, abstracts from every character in the distance ex- 
perience whose meaning lies in its reference to a common 
physical object. Only those characters in the distance ex- 
perience are left that refer to a single form of calculation 



146 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

common to all the different perspectives. It is this abstrac- 
tion that makes it possible to assimilate time to space as 
a fourth dimension. For this calculation what is a time- 
interval in one perspective is a space-interval in another. It 
would, however, be a mistake to assume that we have thus 
passed into a field of communication in which our symbols 
have lost all significance except that of reference to a com- 
mon referent. In fact we are still in a visual world, with a 
finite value for the velocity of light; only the physical thing 
to which that visual experience refers is stated in terms of a 
calculation-value common to an indefinite number of diverse 
visual experiences. 

A similar criticism may be made of the view that would 
regard energy as constituting the nature of the physical 
thing. For the perceptual world there must be a system of 
things, and energy is the measure of the changes brought 
about in this system when a force is brought to bear upon 
it from without. Experiments, and the mathematical formu- 
lation in which thermodynamics has clothed the results of 
these experiments, however, have justified the conclusion 
that such measurement reveals only the potential energy 
within the system. How widely we are justified in spread- 
ing the generalization of the conservation of energy has been 
made the subject of dispute, though, as Poincar6 has pointed 
out, we can always assume potential energy to keep the 
doctrine intact. When, however, we make this energy the 
nature of the thing, we are as necessarily passing out of 
the perceptual world as when we substitute space-time for 
space and time. 

Energy, like space-time, is a transformation value. We 
select a process in the manipulatory field the amount of 
work done as the measure of energy; but what is measured 
is not stated as a function of the mass of the body, on the 
contrary mass itself is stated in terms of energy. Thus, 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 147 

when we reduce physical things either to space-time or to 
energy, we are in either case utilizing a process of measure- 
ment in a perceptual, manipulatory area to give the nature 
of the physical thing, while the nature thus ascribed to the 
physical thing does not belong to the field of the measure- 
ment. In the one case instead of the thing we set up an 
event located in a space-time that lies outside of experience; 
in the other, we appeal, as in Ostwald's view, to a meta- 
physical field equally remote from experience. 

Reduction of mass to electro-magnetism would provide 
us with a further illustration, for electro-magnetism and 
light have thus been brought back to the same process 
viz., that which relates an organism to distant objects. If 
mass could be stated in electro-magnetic terms we should 
have substituted the distance-value of the object for its 
manipulatory value. That it should be so stated, however, 
presupposes that we are using the wave formulation and not 
the corpuscular formulation for electro-magnetism, and that 
we are not driven to introduce the corpuscular concept, 
the photon, into the theory of light. 

This brings us to Professor Bridgman's program of rigidly 
reducing all our physical concepts to the operations we make 
use of in measurement. 1 His proposal seems to amount to 
an undertaking to bring the object back to the manipulatory 
area, but not to interpret the physical thing as a volume of 
mass in motion, but rather to redefine the physical thing of 
the manipulatory area in terms of its uses in scientific 
measurement. The simple Newtonian doctrine interpreted 
the light and heat of the sun as evidence of molecules of 
massive elements in violent motions; but the elements have 
now become particles of electricity that can conceivably be 
defined entirely in electro-magnetic terms, and this means 

*"The Logic of Modern Physics," especially chapter 1. 



148 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

that we can define them only in terms of mathematical form- 
ulations whose constants are certain pointer-readings. The 
mathematical formulations fix as exactly as possible the 
conditions under which we can obtain these pointer read- 
ings. We are thus getting a picture, not of the movements 
of manipulatory things, which, within the realm of our ob- 
servations, are the conditions of our distance experiences, 
but of ideal conditions of control of manipulatory situations 
in which these distance experiences can be reproduced. If 
we conceive the sun as made up of electrons and protons, 
we can present in an imagined manipulatory area the move- 
ments of these particles, with their distances from each 
other and their velocities. We can present the electron and 
the proton as pressing toward each other and as held apart 
by the centrifugal force of the incredible velocity with which 
the electron revolves about the proton. But if we go on to 
picture the electron and proton as crushed together in the 
center of the sun, thus setting free, in the form of radiation, 
the electro-magnetic energy, including that of mass, which 
is the "what it is" of these electrical particles, we have 
transformed the stuff or manipulatory content of the thing 
into distance experience. The indestructibility of Newtonian 
mass reflected our fundamental attitude that what we get 
hold of is the permanent reality of what we see, hear and 
otherwise sense at a distance. If this permanent reality 
disappears in radiation, and this comes to us, say, in heat 
and light, or in the form of cosmic rays, it is no longer 
a distance experience of anything. The same is true of 
fields of force. We may say that they are events but there 
are no things to which the events happen at the location 
where they are. 

I am not voicing a hankering after the fleshpots of what 
Whitehead has called the materialism of the Newtonian 
period. That view was afflicted by the bifurcation that 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 149 

Whitehead deplored, and harbored the whole nest of epi- 
stemological problems that Lovejoy has extensively spread 
before us. 2 I am only insisting that whatever view we may 
take of the momentous changes that science has brought in 
its wake since electro-magnetism began to dominate its re- 
search and doctrine, we cannot get away from the perceptual 
findings that all science accepts as its most fundamental 
criterion of reality. The appeal of science to its perceptual 
findings as its criterion evidently involves more than any 
mere confirmation of distance experience by contact experi- 
ence; the appeal is rather to the perceptual occurrence of 
events predicted on the basis of an hypothesis, in order to 
confirm that hypothesis. The importance of the percep- 
tually real thing of the manipulatory area appears when an 
object of this sort can be identified under observation and 
experiment in an exceptional instance; consider, for ex- 
ample, the radiation of black bodies where the reality of the 
object as a perceptual thing must be accepted, wholly in 
advance of any further interpretation of it that a later 
hypothesis may give. Here we reach a something that 
maintains itself as an object that can be felt as seen. It is 
further evident that the reliability of measurements of 
pointer readings must be assured within this same percep- 
tual field. Even if we can neither spread out the space and 
time of this area into the Euclidean space of the Newtonian 
doctrine, nor subdivide its perceptual things into Newtonian 
mass-particles, we nevertheless in some fashion relate the 
assumed reality of a universe that goes way beyond the 
boundaries of our perceptual experience to the decisive 
reality of the scientist's findings. 

Even if we reduce our physical concepts to operational 
processes, we must confess that our physical things belong 



2 "The Revolt Against Dualism," passim. 



ISO THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to the field of our control the field of measurement of 
changes in our experience. The causal antecedents of these 
changes can no longer be stated in terms of physical things, 
in the sense that they are conceivable permanent contact- 
experiences referred to by distance-experiences; but our 
relevant measurements must still take place by means of 
physical things. The causal antecedent may, for example, 
be both physical and mental. It may be an event with 
adjectives supplied by ingression from a world of eternal 
objects or universals. Or the expression for it may be an 
elaborate mathematical apparatus for carrying out exact 
measurements within the field of experiment and observa- 
tion, as in Bridgman's Logic of the Physical Sciences. Or 
again it may be a logical pattern corresponding to some 
structure in a metaphysical world beyond experience an 
absolute world of space-time whose coincidences of events 
and the intervals between them cannot appear in our relative 
spaces and times. But in no case can the nature of these 
elements of the subatomic, electro-magnetic world take the 
place of the physical mass-particles of Newtonian doctrine 
which could be conceived of as subdivisions of the massive 
objects that come under our own hands. 

The breakdown of the Newtonian mechanical system was 
reached when, with the development of the laws of thermo- 
dynamics and of the theory of electro-magnetism, that mean- 
ing of physical things which fits our perceptual experience 
could no longer be applied to the so-called material universe. 
We now find that exactly determined distance-experiences 
occur, which answer to something going on something, 
however, that cannot be stated in terms of changes among 
manipulatory things. In fact, we now postulate in our 
physical hypotheses, as the inner nature of the things re- 
ferred to by the earlier distance experiences, other distance 
experiences, such as energies, or radiations. In the account 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 151 

given of the pressure of gases, on the other hand, we present 
to ourselves a picture of mass-particles bombarding each 
other and the walls of the container. Here the ultimate 
elements are physical things conceived in perceptual terms. 
But when we speak of the content of the electrons and pro- 
tons as an energy which may take the form of radiation, we 
are describing them in terms of another distance experi- 
ence one which, moreover, can refer to no conceivable 
contact-experience. We cannot however simply brush to 
one side the whole of perceptual experience with the claim 
that we are dealing rather with the conceptual objects of 
science, for both our problems and our observations and 
experiments are stated in perceptual experience. 

There are two sides to the question. I think we must 
admit that the distance-experience does and must imply 
that what is going on there would be responsible for contact- 
experiences if the organism could be at the place where the 
process responsible for the distance experience is going on, 
and were provided with the appropriate sensitivity. The 
other side of the question is, why do we state the nature of 
the object not in these terms but in terms of distance- 
experience? I assume that the reason for this is that the 
scientist is seeking for what is permanent, that he finds 
this in the uniformities of the processes, that it is in terms 
of these uniformities that he defines his objects, and that 
this therefore is what he means when he speaks of conceptual 
objects. The scientist seems thus to have transcended the 
perceptual field. He seems to be dealing no longer either 
with distance or with contact-experience, but rather with 
an organized system of changes which may in perceptual ex- 
perience reflect themselves in either of these categories, but 
which is really entirely independent of such experience. The 
door thus is thrown open to the representative theory of 
perception. The perceptual content of the object comes 



152 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to be defined in terms of sense-data, which are correlated 
with scientific objects, but have their proper locus in a 
consciousness, or else lie somewhere between the mind and 
nature. 

There are two reasons why the scientist does not make 
use of this realm of consciousness, either in terms of con- 
sciousness or in terms of sense data. The first is that the 
world which is out there in his observations and experiments 
is the world of reality. No satisfactory line can be drawn 
that will leave what is real for him on one side and sense- 
data on the other. This fact becomes particularly evident 
when we consider what we term the meanings of things. 
These are inextricably interwoven with what must be termed 
consciousness; yet these meanings are the very nature of the 
scientific objects. The other reason is that so-called con- 
sciousness has now been brought within the range of biologic 
science. Mind can no longer be put outside of nature. 

As long as the scientist could be at home in a world of 
Newtonian mechanics, before the atom disintegrated into 
particles of electricity, he could look with Du Bois-Rey- 
mond's telescopic eye through the masses of things down to 
ultimate particles whose motions followed relatively simple 
laws. The connection of scientific with perceptual objects 
was close enough to make him feel that his observations and 
experiments were in the same world with the objects of his 
science. It is true that the so-called sensory qualities, 
whether secondary or primary, could not be the actual char- 
acters of the object; but the agreement between the 
Euclidean space of science and that of perception was ade- 
quate, and the correlation of weight with mass was so 
complete that the imaginary subdivision of the matter of 
sense-perception still paralleled the analyses of physics. The 
scientist was compelled, of course, so far as he considered 
the matter, to locate all secondary qualities in consciousness, 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 153 

since the mechanical universe consisted simply of mass- 
particles in motion, and of ether waves. In the physical 
world it was types of motion that corresponded to color, 
sound, taste, odor and temperature. If the scientist had 
been consistent he would have had to relegate to conscious- 
ness the resistances of things as well; but as a matter of 
fact nothing interfered with his building up mechanical 
models of mass-particles in his perceptual imagination of 
what was going on in nature. Lord Kelvin is an excellent 
example of the scientist of the period that had come to terms 
with thermo-dynamics and electro-magnetism, yet still 
sought to preserve in the vortices and stresses of the ether 
a mechanical picture of the anatomy of the universe within 
which the perceptual imagination could be at home. Milli- 
kan's oil-drops, Rutherford's photographs of the bombard- 
ment of atoms by alpha-particles, and the models of the 
Bohr atom, seemed to connect the galaxies of the sub- 
microscopical world with those of stellar space. As long as 
pushing and resistant things with calculable velocities could 
be located in space, scientific imagination did not leave the 
world of perception. 

It is relativity that changed all this. In the geometry 
of a Minkowski space-time perceptual motion disappears. 
The ether has vanished, and events take the place of physical 
things. Time is assimilated to space, and the mind with its 
own spatial frame of reference adventures into this space- 
time whose curvature corresponds to the gravitational con- 
stant. The result is to carry the whole world of perception 
and perceptual imagination into perspectives that exhibit 
only a logical correlation between patterns affected with 
transformation formulae and events in a four dimensional 
time-space and intervals between them. By definition both 
events and intervals here lie outside of any experience. We 
reach them by way of the reference in the knowledge process 



154 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

to something beyond itself, and by a theory of probability. 
In our mathematical formulations of scientific experience we 
have come upon a cipher that seems to refer to inexperienc- 
able entities and their mutual relations; and this hyposta- 
sized structure of logical entities satisfies our desire for an 
absolute reality to which our confessedly relative experience 
shall refer. 

Yet, however far the scientists' procedure may go it never 
reaches any situation except one in which a transformation, 
or a possible transformation, takes place. If we ask for 
what lies back of all transformations, we are asking for 
something outside of any experience, whether actual or 
imaginary. We do, for example, postulate stages of de- 
velopment of the universe which antedate any possible 
human experience, but in imagination these are spread be- 
fore an inner eye, or at least before a mind. If we exclude 
the imagination, we have the abstractions of symbolic 
analysis, which are of the same logical character as the 
transformation formulae to which I have referred. If I say 
that this is a color, and hold this color in its universality 
before my mind, I am isolating that which enables me to 
reduce any other visual experience to the present experience 
in so far as this is occupied with visual as distinct from 
auditory or sensuous qualities of things. There is a common 
way of acting toward all qualities that exist for the eye, as 
there is another way of acting toward those that exist for the 
ear; and the isolation of this typical reaction enables me to 
"transform" my conduct toward red into that toward blue, 
in so far as I am able to react to color by one response and 
to sound by another. 

What we designate as "mental" is this attitude of isolation 
of common features that call out identical responses provided 
that we have symbols by which we refer to them. To set 
up a world of essences or universals or eternal objects within 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 155 

which these entities subsist or exist is parallel to the pro- 
cedure of setting up a Minkowski space-time or a four 
dimensional aggregate of events. Presumably objects in 
motion with reference to us have different values spatially, 
temporally and in terms of mass from those at rest; and if 
we are to measure them as we measure objects at rest about 
us we must isolate the common feature viz., the relational 
character of space and time common to the two situations of 
rest and motion. The expression of this common feature in 
the transformation formulae that Larmor and Lorentz 
worked out in order to give invariance to the Maxwell equa- 
tions carries with it most interesting implications, especially 
with reference to the constant velocity of light; but it does 
not change the fact that what is going on is measurement in 
one situation of something whose measurable characters are 
partly dependent upon the fact that it is in another situation 
as well. It does not carry with it the necessity of setting up 
a space-time realm. The postulation of such a realm rests 
upon the assumption that because the same object may be 
dealt with either as at rest or in motion, it must therefore 
be affected with the coordinate of time in the same fashion 
in each situation. This assumption consequently wipes out 
motion and substitutes for it geometrical determination in 
a four dimensional realm outside of any possible experience. 
It all comes back to this; the separation of space and 
time is essential to the perceptual fact of motion. There 
must be a timeless space within which motion takes place. 
But timeless spaces differ according as the individual or 
"percipient event" is in motion or at rest. If, as in the 
example of the railway train, we transfer ourselves from the 
space of the compartment within the train to that of the 
landscape, then the space of the compartment within the 
train is in motion, and that space, if measured, will be 
measured in units differing from those of the space of the 



156 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

landscape. The same is true of the times. Given the rela- 
tional character of space and time, their structural characters 
differ according to what may be called the temporal per- 
spective of the individual. And, as Whitehead insists, these 
differences belong to nature. They are not subjective. But 
the scientist is satisfied with the transformation from one 
situation to another. Whether he accepts a geometry of 
space-time or not, his operation is occupied only with the 
transformation and does not require the assumption of a 
transcendent space-time. The physicist's aim is an in- 
variant set of equations that will formulate the conditions 
under which we may control our physical conduct. In order 
to reach an invariance for the Maxwell equations, and to 
interpret the Michelson-Morley experiment, it became neces- 
sary to work out transformations from one temporal per- 
spective to another. The possibility of successful formulae 
of transformation involves numerical statements identical 
for all different perspectives. These can be expressed in 
terms of intersections of events, and intervals between them, 
in an absolute space-time; but such a formulation is not 
made use of in the physicist's transformations. In every 
instance the physicist is in a perceptual world, transforming, 
so far as may be necessary, one perceptual perspective into 
another. Nor is the situation changed when we pass from 
the special to the general principle of relativity. In the 
application of the special theory the coordinates have im- 
mediate physical significance, denoting measures expressed 
in terms of standard measuring-rods and clocks, while in 
the general theory the numbers refer to a continuum lying, 
as we have seen, outside of any possible experience. The 
constants remain therefore mere numbers in terms of which 
natural laws can be so expressed that they hold in any 
frame of reference, that a transformation of axes of co- 
ordinate systems may be substituted for a field of gravita- 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 157 

tional force, and, in general, that the metrical properties of 
space are wholly determined by the masses of bodies. Ein- 
stein's genius has on the basis of these principles elaborated 
a physical theory which not only carries through to logical 
completeness the relativity of space and time, but also gives 
a more perfect and accurate formulation of physical proc- 
esses one, moreover, that has stood the test of observation 
and experiment at those points at which it could be brought 
to the test. In the special theory we are formulating measur- 
able values in terms of different systems of coordinates 
for one perceptual perspective in terms of another perceptual 
perspective, i.e., we are dealing with local times and local 
measuring rods. The numbers have physical significance. 
In the general theory we obtain equations that are covariant, 
i.e., we do not transform from one set of coordinates to an- 
other, but obtain expressions that hold for all possible sets 
of coordinates. The numbers evidently cannot express the 
measures of time and space in any one coordinate system, as 
distinct from another. They arise out of the possibility of 
transformation from any possible set to any other possible 
set. They are reached by the use of a Riemannian geometry 
of a four-dimensional manifold, and tensor mathematics. 
These provide the mathematical apparatus for the measure- 
ment of the intervals in a continuum however it may be 
deformed a continuum, in this case, of space-time, and 
determine the form which equations that express natural 
laws must have if they are to hold for every set of co- 
ordinates. 

It is as if we should take the formula by which we trans- 
form the value of the dollar in 1913 into that of 1930, and 
into that of any other possible date in human history, and 
should pass over from the constants of food, clothing and 
the like and what they will exchange for, to a generalized 
economic field in which the distances between the exchange- 



158 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

able goods we possess and those we want could be expressed 
in a certain formula which would serve in any possible situa- 
tion. If we should set up such a world of determined inter- 
vals between abstract values, and if in our effort to give our 
economic laws such a formulation that they would obtain in 
any possible situation, we should state the values in terms 
of their scarcity, i.e., in terms of the intervals if we suc- 
ceeded in this undertaking, we might conceive of this ab- 
stract economic world as the world of real valuation, of 
which our experienced economic situations were subjective 
reflections. The orthodox school of economics did in a 
manner thus reduce all values to the work necessary for 
their production, that is, to the economic interval between 
the raw material and the finished product, and sought thus 
within an economic process to obtain more exact laws of ex- 
change such as should be capable of universal application 
within all economic situations. The Austrian school, how- 
ever, brought out the unique character of the want that lies 
behind the valuation, which therefore could not be dissolved 
into the abstract formulae of exchange. 

I do not wish to pursue too far a somewhat far-fetched 
analogy; yet it may serve to bring out the fallacy of refer- 
ence common to both cases. The constants that appear in 
formulae of exchange or transformation refer not to en- 
tities that can be defined in terms of symbols of exchange 
or transformation, but to such uniformities in these processes 
as enable us to give them the widest generalization. I make 
bold to say that the successful development of the theory 
of general relativity, with its seeming reference beyond ex- 
perience, is due to the power of its mathematical apparatus, 
which has exploited the conception of the "field," taken from 
electro-magnetism and carried over to gravitation. The 
generalization belonging to the Riemannian geometry, the 
Gaussian coordinates, and the Tensor Mathematics, aj> 



SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS 159 

plied to the field of physics, introduce a new entity only in 
so far as their application presupposes a four-dimensional 
manifold within which time is one dimension. The assimila- 
tion of time to space, as we have seen, divests reality of the 
character of novelty inherent in change. It relegates change, 
including motion, to subjective experience, and substitutes 
for it a geometry of space-time within which every event is 
inexorably charted. In the Newtonian mechanics, given uni- 
formities of nature such as the law of gravitation, a like 
determination of physical events was involved; but the de- 
termination did not flow from formal characters in which a 
lapse of time could be equated with a spatial extent, or in 
which spatial and temporal extents fell together as pre- 
determined numbers in the determination of an interval. 
Space, whether Euclidean or non-Euclidean, was a necessary 
frame-work within which change must take place, and the 
changes that had taken place could be spatially charted and 
geometrically described; but none of this necessity spread 
over into the causes of motion. The mind might be wholly 
possessed by a faith that the laws of change were as in- 
exorable as were the structural characters of space; but it 
was a faith, resting at best upon an induction that could 
never go beyond a presumption. A change might always 
conceivably be other than it is. A geometrical structure 
and what follows from that structure can never conceivably 
be other than it is. In a space-time whose structure is once 
given nothing could conceivably be other than it is. As long, 
then, as nature appears in experience with the brute con- 
stants we discover, which change under our further in- 
vestigation, the reference of formulae such as those of 
generalized relativity will always be to a situation that may 
conceivably be other than it is. They can never disappear, 
in our thinking of the world, into the geometry of a space- 
time. For example, it will always be conceivable that the 



160 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

constant of gravitation will prove to be such as not to 
resolve itself into curvatures of space-time. I recur to 
the statement I made earlier, that the reference of general 
relativity as well as that of special relativity is to the field 
of experience within which scientific problems, observations 
and experiments lie. 



IV 

THE OBJECTIVE REALITY OF PERSPECTIVES 1 

The grandiose undertaking of Absolute Idealism to bring 
the whole of reality within experience failed. It failed be- 
cause it left the perspective of the finite ego hopelessly 
infected with subjectivity and consequently unreal. From 
its point of view the theoretical and practical life of the 
individual had no part in the creative advance of nature. 
It failed also because scientific method, with its achieve- 
ments of discovery and invention, could find no adequate 
statement in its dialectic. It recognized the two dominant 
forces of modern life, the creative individual and creative 
science only to abrogate them as falsifications of the ex- 
perience of the absolute ego. The task remained unfulfilled, 
the task of restoring to nature the characters and qualities 
which a metaphysics of mind and a science of matter and 
motion had concurred in relegating to consciousness, and of 
finding such a place for mind in nature that nature could 
appear in experience. A constructive restatement of the 
problem was presented by a physiological and experimental 
psychology that fastened mind inextricably in an organic 
nature which both science and philosophy recognized. The 
dividend which philosophy declared upon this restatement 
is indicated in William James's reasoned query "Does Con- 
sciousness exist?" The metaphysical assault upon the 
dualism of mind and nature, that has been becoming every 
day more intolerable, has been made in regular formation 
by Bergson's evolutionary philosophy, by neo-idealism, by 

1 Reprinted by permission from the Proceedings of the Sixth In- 
ternational Congress of Philosophy. 

161 



162 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

neo-realism, and by pragmatism. And no one can say as 
yet that the position has been successfully carried. 

I wish to call attention to two unconnected movements 
which seem to me to be approaching a strategic position 
of great importance which may be called the objectivity 
of perspectives. These two movements are, first, that phase 
of behavioristic psychology which is planting communica- 
tion, thinking, and substantive meanings as inextricably 
within nature as biological psychology has placed general 
animal and human intelligence; and second, an aspect of 
the philosophy of relativism which Professor Whitehead 
has presented. 

Professor Whitehead interprets relativity in terms of 
events passing in a four-dimensional Minkowski world. The 
order in which they pass, however, is relative to a consen- 
tient set. The consentient set is determined by its relation 
to a percipient event or organism. The percipient event 
establishes a lasting character of here and there, of now and 
then, and is itself an enduring pattern. The pattern repeats 
itself in the passage of events. These recurrent patterns 
are grasped together or prehended into a unity, which must 
have as great a temporal spread as the organism requires 
to be what it is, whether this period is found in the revolu- 
tions of the electrons in an iron atom or in the specious 
present of a human being. Such a percipient event or or- 
ganism establishes a consentient set of patterns of events 
that endure in the relations of here and there, of now and 
then, through such periods or essential epochs, constituting 
thus slabs of nature, and differentiating space from time. 
This perspective of the organism is then there in nature. 
What in the perspective does not preserve the enduring 
character of here and there, is in motion. From the stand- 
point of some other organism these moving objects may 
be at rest, and what is here at rest will be, in the time 



PERSPECTIVES 163 

system of this other perspective, in motion. In Professor 
Whitehead's phrase, in so far as nature is patient of an 
organism, it is stratified into perspectives, whose intersec- 
tions constitute the creative advance of nature. Professor 
Whitehead has with entire success stated the physical theory 
of relativity in terms of intersecting time systems. 

What I wish to pick out of Professor Whitehead's philoso- 
phy of nature is this conception of nature as an organiza- 
tion of perspectives, which are there in nature. The 
conception of the perspective as there in nature is in a sense 
an unexpected donation by the most abstruse physical 
science to philosophy. They are not distorted perspectives 
of some perfect patterns, nor do they lie in consciousnesses 
as selections among things whose reality is to be found in a 
noumenal world. They are in their interrelationship the 
nature that science knows. Biology has dealt with them 
in terms of forms and their environments, and in ecology 
deals with the organization of environments, but it has 
conceded a world of physical particles in absolute space 
and time that is there in independence of any environment 
of an organism, of any perspective. Professor Whitehead 
generalizes the conception of organism to include any uni- 
tary structure, whose nature demands a period within which 
to be itself, which is therefore not only a spatial but also a 
temporal structure, or a process. Any such structure strati- 
fies nature by its intersection into its perspective, and dif- 
ferentiates its own permanent space and time from the 
general passage of events. Thus the world of the physical 
sciences is swept into the domain of organic environments, 
and there is no world of independent physical entities out 
of which the perspectives are merely selections. In the 
place of such a world appear all of the perspectives in their 
interrelationship to each other. 

I do not wish to consider Professor Whitehead's Berg- 



164 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

sonian edition of Spinoza's underlying substance that in- 
dividualizes itself in the structure of the events, nor his 
Platonic heaven of eternal objects where lie the hierarchies 
of patterns, that are there envisaged as possibilities and 
have ingression into events, but rather his Leibnizian filia- 
tion, as it appears in his conception of the perspective as the 
mirroring in the event of all other events. Leibniz made a 
psychological process central in his philosophy of nature. 
The contents of his monads were psychical states, percep- 
tions, and petites perceptions, which were inevitably repre- 
sentative of the rest of the reality of the universe of which 
they were but partially developed expressions. The repre- 
sented content of all monads was identical, in so far as it 
was clear and distinct, so that the organization of these 
perspectives was a harmony preestablished in an identity 
of rational content. Professor Whitehead's principle of 
organization of perspectives is not the representation of an 
identical content, but the intersection by different time 
systems of the same body of events. It is, of course, the 
abandonment of simple location as the principle of physical 
existence, i.e., that the existence of a physical object is found 
in its occupancy of a certain volume of absolute space in an 
instant of absolute time; and the taking of time seriously, 
i.e., the recognition that there are an indefinite number of 
possible simultaneities of any event with other events, and 
consequently an indefinite number of possible temporal 
orders of the same events, that make it possible to conceive 
of the same body of events as organized into an indefinite 
number of different perspectives. 

Without undertaking to discuss Professor Whitehead's 
doctrine of the prehension into the unity of the event of the 
aspects of other events, which I am unable to work out 
satisfactorily, from the summary statements I have found 
in his writings, I wish to consider the conception of a body 



PERSPECTIVES 165 

of events as the organization of different perspectives of 
these events, from the standpoint of the field of social 
science, and that of behavioristic psychology. 

In the first place, this seems to be exactly the subject 
matter of any social science. The human experience with 
which social science occupies itself is primarily that of in- 
dividuals. It is only so far as the happenings, the environ- 
mental conditions, the values, their uniformities and laws 
enter into the experience of individuals as individuals that 
they become the subject of consideration by these sciences. 
Environmental conditions, for example, exist only in so far 
as they affect actual individuals, and only as they affect 
these individuals. The laws of these happenings are but 
the statistical uniformities of the happenings to and in the 
experiences of A, B, C, and D. Furthermore the import 
of these happenings and these values must be found in 
the experiences of these individuals if they are to exist for 
these sciences at all. 

In the second place, it is only in so far as the individual 
acts not only in his own perspective but also in the perspec- 
tive of others, especially in the common perspective of a 
group, that a society arises and its affairs become the object 
of scientific inquiry. The limitation of social organization 
is found in the inability of individuals to place themselves 
in the perspectives of others, to take their points of view. 
I do not wish to belabor the point, which is commonplace 
enough, but to suggest that we find here an actual organiza- 
tion of perspectives, and that the principle of it is fairly 
evident. This principle is that the individual enters into 
the perspectives of others, in so far as he is able to take their 
attitudes, or occupy their points of view. 

But while the principle is a commonplace for social con- 
duct, its implications are very serious if one accepts the 
objectivity of perspectives, and recognizes that these per- 



166 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

spectives are made up of other selves with minds; that here 
is no nature that can be closed to mind. The social perspec- 
tive exists in the experience of the individual in so far as 
it is intelligible, and it is its intelligibility that is the condi- 
tion of the individual entering into the perspectives of others, 
especially of the group. In the field of any social science the 
objective data are those experiences of the individuals in 
which they take the attitude of the community, i.e., in which 
they enter into the perspectives of the other members of 
the community. Of course the social scientist may generalize 
from the standpoint of his universe of discourse what re- 
mains hopelessly subjective in the experiences of another 
community, as the psychologist can interpret what for the 
individual is an unintelligible feeling. I am speaking not 
from the standpoint of the epistemologist, nor that of the 
metaphysician. I am asking simply what is objective for 
the social scientist, what is the subject matter of his science, 
and I wish to point out that the critical scientist is only 
replacing the narrower social perspectives of other com- 
munities by that of a more highly organized and hence more 
universal community. 

It is instructive to note that never has the character of 
that common perspective changed more rapidly than since 
we have gained further control over the technique by which 
the individual perspective becomes the perspective of the 
most universal community, that of thinking men, that is, the 
technique of the experimental method. We are deluded, 
by the ease with which we can, by what may be fairly 
called transformation formulae, translate the experience of 
other communities into that of our own, into giving finality 
to the perspective of our own thought; but a glance at 
the bewildering rapidity with which different histories, i.e., 
different pasts have succeeded each other, and new physical 
universes have arisen, is sufficient to assure us that no 



PERSPECTIVES 167 

generation has been so uncertain as to what will be the com- 
mon perspective of the next. We have never been so un- 
certain as to what are the values which economics under- 
takes to define, what are the political rights and obligations 
of citizens, what are the community values of friendship, 
of passion, of parenthood, of amusement, of beauty, of social 
solidarity in its unnumbered forms, or of those values which 
have been gathered under the relations of man to the highest 
community or to God. On the other hand there has never 
been a time at which men could determine so readily the 
conditions under which values, whatever they are, can be 
secured. In terms of common conditions, by transforma- 
tion formulae, we can pass from one value field to another, 
and thus come nearer finding out which is more valuable, 
or rather how to conserve each. The common perspective 
is comprehensibility, and comprehensibility is the statement 
in terms of common social conditions. 

It is the relation of the individual perspective to the 
common perspective that is of importance. To the biologist 
there is a common environment of an ant-hill or of a 
beehive, which is rendered possible by the intricate social re- 
lationships of the ants and the bees. It is entirely improb- 
able that this perspective exists in the perspectives of 
individual ants or bees, for there is no evidence of communi- 
cation. Communication is a social process whose natural his- 
tory shows that it arises out of cooperative activities, such 
as those involved in sex, parenthood, fighting, herding, and 
the like, in which some phase of the act of one form, which 
may be called a gesture, acts as a stimulus to others to carry 
on their parts of the social act. It does not become com- 
munication in the full sense, i.e., the stimulus does not be- 
come a significant symbol, until the gesture tends to arouse 
the same response in the individual who makes it that it 
arouses in the others. The history of the growth of language 



168 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

shows that in its earlier stages the vocal gesture addressed 
to another awakens in the individual who makes the gesture 
not simply the tendency to the response which it calls forth 
in the other, such as the seizing of a weapon or the avoid- 
ing of a danger, but primarily the social role which the other 
plays in the cooperative act. This is indicated in the early 
play period in the development of the child, and in the rich- 
ness in social implication of language structures in the speech 
of primitive peoples. 

In the process of communication the individual is an other 
before he is a self. It is in addressing himself in the role 
of an other that his self arises in experience. The growth 
of the organized game out of simple play in the experience 
of the child, and of organized group activities in human 
society, placed the individual then in a variety of roles, in 
so far as these were parts of the social act, and the very 
organization of these in the whole act gave them a common 
character in indicating what he had to do. He is able then 
to become a generalized other in addressing himself in the 
attitude of the group or the community. In this situation 
he has become a definite self over against the social whole 
to which he belongs. This is the common perspective. It 
exists in the organisms of all the members of the community, 
because the physiological differentiation of human forms be- 
longs largely to the consummatory phase of the act. 

The overt phase within which social organization takes 
place is occupied with things, physical things or imple- 
ments. In the societies of the invertebrates, which have 
indeed a complexity comparable with human societies, the 
organization is largely dependent upon physiological dif- 
ferentiation. In such a society, evidently, there is no phase 
of the act of the individual in which he can find himself 
taking the attitude of the other. Physiological differentia- 
tion, apart from the direct relations of sex and parenthood, 



PERSPECTIVES 169 

plays no part in the organization of human society. The 
mechanism of human society is that of bodily selves who 
assist or hinder each other in their cooperative acts by the 
manipulation of physical things. In the earliest forms of 
society these physical things are treated as selves, i.e., those 
social responses, which we can all detect in ourselves to 
inanimate things which aid or hinder us, are dominant among 
primitive peoples in the social organization that depends on 
the use of physical means. The primitive man keeps en 
rapport with implements and weapons by conversation in 
the form of magic rites and ceremonies. On the other hand 
the bodily selves of members of the social group are as 
clearly implemental as the implements are social. Social 
beings are things as definitely as physical things are social. 
The key to the genetic development of human intelligence 
is found in the recognition of these two aspects. It arises 
in those early stages of communication in which the organism 
arouses in itself the attitude of the other and so addresses 
itself and thus becomes an object to itself, becomes in other 
words a self, while the same sort of content in the act consti- 
tutes the other that constitutes the self. Out of this process 
thought arises, i.e., conversation with one's self, in the role 
of the specific other and then in the role of the generalized 
other, in the fashion I indicated above. It is important to 
recognize that the self does not project itself into the other. 
The others and the self arise in the social act together. The 
content of the act may be said to lie within the organism 
but it is projected into the other only in the sense in which 
it is projected into the self, a fact upon which the whole of 
psycho-analysis rests. We pinch ourselves to be sure that 
we are awake as we grasp an object to be sure that it is 
there. The other phase of human intelligence is that it is 
occupied with physical things. Physical things are per- 
ceptual things. They also arise within the act. This is 



170 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

initiated by a distant stimulus and leads through approxima- 
tion or withdrawal to contact or the avoidance of contact. 
The outcome of the act is in consummation, e.g., as in eat- 
ing, but in the behavior of the human animal a mediate 
stage of manipulation intervenes. The hand fashions the 
physical or perceptual thing. The perceptual thing is fully 
there in the manipulatory area, where it is both seen and 
felt, wKere is found both the promise of the contact and 
its fulfilment, for it is characteristic of the distant stimula- 
tion and the act that it initiates that there are already 
aroused the attitudes of manipulation, what I will call 
terminal attitudes of the perceptual act, that readiness to 
grasp, to come into effective contact, which in some sense 
control the approach to the distant stimulation. It is in 
the operation with these perceptual or physical things which 
lie within the physiological act short of consummation that 
the peculiar human intelligence is found. Man is an imple- 
mental animal. It is mediate to consummation. The hand 
carries the food to the mouth, or the child to the breast, 
but in the social act this mediation becomes indefinitely com- 
plicated, and the task arises of stating the consummation, 
or the end, in terms of means. There are two conditions 
for this: one is the inhibition, which takes place when con- 
flicting ways of completing the act check the expression of 
any one way, and the other is the operation of the social 
mechanism, which I have described, by which the individual 
can indicate to others and to himself the perceptual things 
that can be seized and manipulated and combined. It is 
within this field of implemental things picked out by the 
significant symbols of gesture, not in that of physiological 
differentiation, that the complexities of human society have 
developed. And, to recur to my former statement, in this 
field selves are implemental physical things just as among 
primitive peoples physical things are selves. 



PERSPECTIVES 171 

My suggestion was that we find in society and social 
experience, interpreted in terms of a behavioristic psychol- 
ogy, an instance of that organization of perspectives, which 
is for me at least the most obscure phase of Professor 
Whitehead's philosophy. In his objective statement of rela- 
tivity the existence of motion in the passage of events de- 
pends not upon what is taking place in an absolute space 
and time, but upon the relation of a consentient set to a 
percipient event. Such a relation stratifies nature. These 
stratifications are not only there in nature but they are the 
only forms of nature that are there. This dependence of 
nature upon the percipient event is not a reflection of nature 
into consciousness. Permanent spaces and times, which 
are successions of these strata, rest and motion, are there, 
but they are there only in their relationship to percipient 
events or organisms. We can then go further and say that 
the sensuous qualities of nature are there in nature, but 
there in their relationship to animal organisms. We can 
advance to the other values which have been regarded as 
dependent upon appetence, appreciation, and affection, and 
thus restore to nature all that a dualistic doctrine has rele- 
gated to consciousness, since the spatio-temporal structure 
of the world and the motion with which exact physical 
science is occupied is found to exist in nature only in its 
relationship to percipient events or organisms. 

But rest and motion no more imply each other than do 
objectivity and subjectivity. There are perspectives which 
cease to be objective, such as the Ptolemaic order, since it 
does not select those consentient sets with the proper dynam- 
ical axes, and there are those behind the mirror and those 
of an alcoholic brain. What has happened in all of these 
instances, from the most universal to the most particular, 
is that the rejected perspective fails to agree with that com- 
mon perspective which the individual finds himself occupy- 



172 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

ing as a member of the community of minds, which is 
constitutive of his self. This is not a case of the surrender 
to a vote of the majority, but the development of another 
self through its intercourse with others and hence with 
himself. 

What I am suggesting is that this process, in which a 
perspective ceases to be objective, becomes if you like sub- 
jective, and in which new common minds and new common 
perspectives arise, is an instance of the organization of 
perspectives in nature, of the creative advance of nature. 
This amounts to the affirmation that mind as it appears in 
the mechanism of social conduct is the organization of per- 
spectives in nature and at least a phase of the creative 
advance of nature. Nature in its relationship to the organ- 
ism, and including the organism, is a perspective that is 
there. A state of mind of the organism is the establish- 
ment of simultaneity between the organism and a group of 
events, through the arrest of action under inhibition as above 
described. This arrest of action means the tendencies within 
the organism to act in conflicting ways in the completion 
of the whole act. The attitude of the organism calls out 
or tends to call out responses in other organisms, which re- 
sponses, in the case of human gesture, the organism calls 
out in itself, and thus excites itself to respond to these 
responses. It is the identification of these responses with 
the distant stimuli that establishes simultaneity, that gives 
insides to these distant stimuli, and a self to the organism. 
Without such an establishment of simultaneity, these stimuli 
are spatio-temporally distant from the organism, and their 
reality lies in the future of passage. The establishment 
of simultaneity wrenches this future reality into a possible 
present, for all our presents beyond the manipulatory area 
are only possibilities, as respects their perceptual reality. 
We are acting toward the future realization of the act, as if 



PERSPECTIVES 173 

it were present, because the organism is taking the role of 
the other. In the perceptual inanimate object the organic 
content that survives is the resistance that the organism both 
feels and exerts in the manipulatory area. The actual spatio- 
temporal structure of passing events with those characters 
which answer to the susceptibilities of the organism are there 
in nature, but they are temporally as well as spatially away 
from the organism. The reality awaits upon the success 
of the act. Present reality is a possibility. It is what would 
be if we were there instead of here. Through the social 
mechanism of significant symbols the organism places itself 
there as a possibility, which acquires increasing probability 
as it fits into the spatio-temporal structure and the demands 
of the whole complex act of which its conduct is a part. But 
the possibility is there in nature, for it is made up of actual 
structures of events and their contents, and the possible 
realizations of the acts in the form of adjustments and 
readjustments of the processes involved. When we view 
them as possibilities we call them mental or working hy- 
potheses. 

I submit that the only instance we have of prehension 
in experience is this holding together of future and past as 
possibilities for all pasts are as essentially subject to re- 
vision as the futures, and are, therefore, only possibilities 
and the common content which endures is that which is 
common to the organism and environment in the perspec- 
tive. This in the organism is identified with the spatio- 
temporally distant stimuli as a possibly real present, past, 
and future. The unity lies in the act or process, the pre- 
hension is the exercise of this unity, when the process has 
been checked through conflicting tendencies, and the condi- 
tions and results of these tendencies are held as possibilities 
in a specious present. 

Thus the social and psychological process is but an in- 



174 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

stance of what takes place in nature, if nature is an evolu- 
tion, i.e., if it proceeds by reconstruction in the presence 
of conflicts, and if, therefore, possibilities of different re- 
constructions are present, reconstructing its pasts as well 
as its futures. It is the relativity of time, that is, an 
indefinite number of possible orders of events, that intro- 
duces possibility in nature. When there was but one 
recognized order of nature, possibility had no other place 
than in the mental constructions of the future or the in- 
completely known past. But the reality of a spatio- 
temporally distant situation lies ahead, and any present 
existence of it, beyond the manipulatory area, can be only 
a possibility. Certain characters are there, but what things 
they are can only be realized when the acts these distant 
stimulations arouse are completed. What they are now is 
represented by a set of possible spatio-temporal structures. 
That these future realizations appear as present possibilities 
is due to the arrest of the act of the organism, and its 
ability to indicate these possibilities. 

That these possibilities have varying degrees of prob- 
ability is due to the relation of the various inhibited tenden- 
cies in the organism to the whole act. The organization 
of this whole act the human social organism can indicate 
to others and to itself. It has the pattern which determines 
other selves and physical things, and the organism as a self 
and a thing, and the meanings which are indicated have the 
universality of the whole community to which the organism 
belongs. They constitute a universe of discourse. It is the 
fitting in of the particular tendencies into this larger pattern 
of the whole process that constitutes the probability of the 
present existence of the things which any one act implies. 
Its full reality is still dependent upon the accomplishment 
of the act, upon experimental evidence. It is then such a 
coincidence of the perspective of the individual organism 



PERSPECTIVES 175 

with the pattern of the whole act in which it is so involved 
that the organism can act within it, that constitutes the 
objectivity of the perspective. 

The pattern of the whole social act can lie in the individual 
organism because it is carried out through implemental 
things to which any organism can react, and because indica- 
tions of these reactions to others and the organism itself 
can be made by significant symbols. The reconstruction 
of the pattern can take place in the organism, and does take 
place in the so-called conscious process of mind. The 
psychological process is an instance of the creative advance 
of nature. 

In living forms lower than man the distant perspective 
may through sensitivity exist in the experience of the form 
and the grasping of this in the adjustments of conduct 
answer to the formation of the stratification of nature, but 
the reconstruction of the pattern within which the life of 
the organism lies does not fall within the experience of the 
organism. In inanimate organisms the maintenance of a 
temporal structure, i.e., of a process, still stratifies nature, 
and gives rise to spaces and times, but neither they nor the 
entities that occupy them enter as experiential facts into 
the processes of the organisms. The distinction of objec- 
tivity and subjectivity can only arise where the pattern of 
the larger process, within which lies the process of the in- 
dividual organism, falls in some degree within the experience 
of the individual organism, i.e., it belongs only to the ex- 
perience of the social organism. 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF AND SOCIAL CONTROL* 

It is evident that a statement of the life of each individual 
in terms of the results of an analysis of that which is im- 
mediately experienced would offer a common plane of events, 
in which the experience of each would differ from the 
experiences of others only in their extent, and the complete- 
ness or incompleteness of their connections. These differ- 
ences disappear in the generalized formulations of the social 
sciences. The experiences of the same individuals, in so 
far as each faces a world in which objects are plans of 
action, would implicate in each a different succession of 
events. In the simplest illustration, two persons approach 
a passing automobile. To one it is a moving object that 
he will pass before it reaches the portion of the street that is 
the meeting-place of their two paths. The other sees an 
object that will pass this meeting-point before he reaches 
it. Each slices the world from the standpoint of a different 
time system. Objects which in a thousand ways are identi- 
cal for the two individuals, are yet fundamentally different 
through their location in one spatio-temporal plane, involv- 
ing a certain succession of events, or in another. Eliminate 
the temporal dimension, and bring all events back to an 
instant that is timeless, and the individuality of these objects 
which belongs to them in behavior is lost, except in so far 
as they can represent the results of past conduct. But 
taking time seriously, we realize that the seemingly timeless 
character of our spatial world and its permanent objects 

1 Reprinted in part from "The International Journal of Ethics," Vol. 
35, No. 3, April 1925. 

176 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 177 

is due to the consentient set which each one of us selects. 
We abstract time from this space for the purposes of our 
conduct. Certain objects cease to be events, cease to pass 
as they are in reality passing and in their permanence be- 
come the conditions of our action, and events take place 
with reference to them. Because a whole community selects 
the same consentient set does not make the selection less 
the attitude of each one of them. The life-process takes 
place in individual organisms, so that the psychology which 
studies that process in its creative determining function 
becomes a science of the objective world. 

Looked at from the standpoint of an evolutionary history, 
not only have new forms with their different spatio-temporal 
environments and their objects arisen, but new characters 
have arisen answering to the sensitivities and capacities for 
response. In the terms of Alexander, they have become 
differently qualitied. It is as impossible to transfer these 
characters of the habitats to the consciousness of the forms 
as it is to transfer the spatio-temporal structure of the 
things to such a so-called consciousness. If we introduce 
a fictitious instantaneousness into a passing universe, things 
fall to pieces. Things that are spatio-temporally distant 
from us can be brought into this instant only in terms of 
our immediate contact experience. They are what they 
would be if we were there and had our hands upon them. 
They take on the character of tangible matter. This is 
the price of their being located at the moment of our bodies 7 
existence. But this instantaneous view has the great advan- 
tage of giving to us a picture of what the contact experience 
will be when we reach the distant object, and of determining 
conditions under which the distance characters arise. If 
the world existed at an instant in experience, we should be 
forced to find some realm such as consciousness into which 
to transport the distance or so-called secondary qualities of 



178 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

things. If consciousness in evolutionary history, then, has 
an unambiguous significance, it refers to that stage in the 
development of life in which the conduct of the individual 
marks out and defines the future field and objects which 
make up its environment, and in which emerge characters 
in the objects and sensitivities in the individuals that answer 
to each other. There is a relativity of the living individual 
and its environment, both as to form and content. 

What I wish to trace is the fashion in which self and the 
mind has arisen within this conduct. 

It is the implication of this undertaking that only selves 
have minds, that is, that cognition only belongs to selves, 
even in the simplest expression of awareness. This, of 
course, does not imply that below the stage of self- 
consciousness sense characters and sensitivity do not exist. 
This obtains in our own immediate experience in so far as 
we are not self-conscious. It is further implied that this 
development has taken place only in a social group, for 
selves exist only in relation to other selves, as the organism 
as a physical object exists only in its relation to other 
physical objects. There have been two fields within which 
social groups have arisen which have determined their en- 
vironment together with that of their members, and the 
individuality of its members. These lie in the realm of the 
invertebrates and in that of the vertebrates. Among the 
Hymenoptera and termites there are societies whose in- 
terests determine for the individuals their stimuli and habi- 
tats, and so differentiate the individuals themselves, mainly 
through the sexual and alimentary processes, that the in- 
dividual is what he is because of his membership within 
those societies. In the complex life of the group, the acts 
of the individuals are completed only through the acts of 
other individuals, but the mediation of this complex conduct 
is found in the physiological differentiation of the different 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 179 

members of the society. As Bergson has remarked of the 
instincts, the implements by which a complex act is carried 
out are found in the differentiated structure of the form. 
There is no convincing evidence that an ant or a bee is 
obliged to anticipate the act of another ant or bee, by tend- 
ing to respond in the fashion of the other, in order that it 
may integrate its activity into the common act. And by 
the same mark there is no evidence of the existence of any 
language in their societies. Nor do we need to go to the 
invertebrates to discover this type of social conduct. If one 
picks up a little child who has fallen, he adapts his srms 
and attitude to the attitude of the child, and the child 
adapts himself to the attitude of the other; or in boxing or 
fencing one responds to stimulus of the other, by acquired 
physiological adjustment. 

, Among the vertebrates, apart from the differentiation of 
the sexes and the nurture and care of infant forms, there 
is little or no inherited physiological differentiation to 
mediate the complexities of social conduct. If we are to 
cooperate successfully with others, we must in some manner 
get their ongoing acts into ourselves to make the common 
act come off. As I have just indicated, there is a small 
range of social activity in which this is not necessary. The 
suckling of an infant form, or a dog fight, if this may be 
called a social activity, does not call for more than inherited 
physiological adjustment. Perhaps the so-called herding 
instinct should be added, but it hardly comes to more than 
the tendency of the herd to stick together in their various 
activities. The wooing and mating of forms, the care of 
the infant form, the bunching of animals in migrations, and 
fighting, about exhaust vertebrate social conduct, and be- 
yond these seasonal processes vertebrate societies hardly 
exist till we reach man. They exhaust the possibilities in 
vertebrate structure of the mediation of social conduct, for 



180 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

the vertebrate organism has shown no such astonishing 
plasticity in physiological differentiation as that which we 
can trace among the insects, from isolated forms to mem- 
bers of the societies of the termites, the ants, and the bees. 

A social act may be defined as one in which the occasion 
or stimulus which sets free an impulse is found in the 
character or conduct of a living form that belongs to the 
proper environment of the living form whose impulse it is. 
I wish, however, to restrict the social act to the class of 
acts which involve the cooperation of more than one in- 
dividual, and whose object as defined by the act, in the 
sense of Bergson, is a social object. I mean by a social 
object one that answers to all the parts of the complex act, 
though these parts are found in the conduct of different 
individuals. The objective of the act is then found in the 
life-process of the group, not in those of the separate in- 
dividuals alone. The full social object would not exist in 
the environments of the separate individuals of the societies 
of the Hymanoptera and termites, nor in the restricted 
societies of the vertebrates whose basis is found alone in 
physiological adjustment. A cow that licks the skin of a 
calf stuffed with hay, until the skin is worn away, and then 
eats the hay, or a woman who expends her parental impulse 
upon a poodle, cannot be said to have the full social object 
involved in the entire act in their environments. It would 
be necessary to piece together the environments of the dif- 
ferent individuals or superimpose them upon each other to 
reach the environment and objects of the societies in ques- 
tion. 

Where forms such as those of the Hymenoptera and the 
termites exhibit great plasticity in development, social acts 
based on physiological adjustment, and corresponding socie- 
ties, have reached astonishing complexity. But when the 
limit of that plasticity is reached, the limit of the social 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 181 

act and the society is reached also. Where, as among the 
vertebrates, that physiological adjustment which mediates 
a social act is limited and fixed, the societies of this type 
are correspondingly insignificant. But another type of social 
act, and its corresponding society and object, has been at 
least suggested by the description of the social act based 
upon physiological adjustment. Such an act would be one 
in which the different parts of the act which belong to 
different individuals should appear in the act of each in- 
dividual. This cannot mean, however, that the Single in- 
dividual could carry out the entire act, for then, even if it 
were possible, it would cease to be a social act, nor could 
the stimulus which calls out his own part of the complex 
act be that which calls out the other parts of the act in so 
far as they appear in his conduct. If the social object is 
to appear in his experience, it must be that the stimuli 
which set free the responses of the others involved in the 
act should be present in his experience, not as stimuli to 
his response, but as stimuli for the responses of others; and 
this implies that the social situation which arises after the 
completion of one phase of the act, which serves as the 
stimulus for the next participant in the complex procedure, 
shall in some sense be in the experience of the first actor, 
tending to call out, not his own response, but that of the 
succeeding actor. Let us make the impossible assumption 
that the wasp, in stinging a spider which it stores with its 
egg, finds in the spider a social object in the sense which I 
have specified. The spider would have to exist in the ex- 
perience of the wasp as live but quiescent food for the 
larva when it emerges from the egg. In order that the 
paralyzed spider should so appear to the wasp, the wasp 
would need to be subject to the same stimulus as that which 
sets free the response of the larva; in other words, the wasp 
would need to be able to respond in some degree as the 



182 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

larva. And of course the wasp would have to view the 
spider under the time dimension, grafting a hypothetical 
future onto its passing present, but the occasion for this 
would have to lie in the wasp's tending to respond in role 
of larva to the appropriate food which it is placing in storage. 
This, then, presents another possible principle of social or- 
ganization, as distinguished from that of physiological dif- 
ferentiation. If the objects that answer to the complex 
social act can exist spatio-temporally in the experience of 
the different members of the society, as stimuli that set free 
not only their own responses, but also as stimuli to the 
responses of those who share in the composite act, a principle 
of coordination might be found which would not depend 
upon physiological differentiation. Any one necessary 
psychological condition for this would be that the individual 
should have in some fashion present in his organism the 
tendencies to respond as the other participants in the act 
will respond. Much more than this would be involved, but 
this at least would be a necessary precondition. A social 
object answering to the responses of different individuals 
in a society could be conceived of as existing in the ex- 
periences of individuals in that society, if the different re- 
sponses of these individuals in the complex acts could be 
found in sufficient degree in the natures of separate in- 
dividuals to render them sensitive to the different values of 
the object answering to the parts of the act. 

The cortex of the vertebrate central nervous system pro- 
vides at least a part of the mechanism which might make 
this possible. The nervous currents from the column and 
the stem of the brain to the cortex can there bring the acts 
that go out from these lower centers into relation with each 
other so that more complex processes and adjustments can 
arise. The centers and paths of the cortex represent an 
indefinite number of possible actions; particularly they 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 183 

represent acts which, being in competition with each other, 
inhibit each other, and present the problem of organization 
and adjustment so that overt conduct may proceed. In 
the currents and cross-currents in the gray matter and its 
association fibers, there exist the tendencies to an indefinite 
number of responses. Answering to these adjustments are 
the objects organized into a field of action, not only spatially 
but temporally; for the tendency to grasp the distant object, 
while already excited, is so linked with the processes of 
approach that it does not get its overt expression till the 
intervening stretch is passed. In this vertebrate apparatus 
of conduct, then, the already excited predispositions to 
thousands of acts, that far transcend the outward accom- 
plishments, furnish the inner attitudes implicating objects 
that are not immediate objectives of the individual's act. 
But the cortex is not simply a mechanism. It is an organ 
that exists in fulfilling its function. If these tendencies to 
action which do not get immediate expression appear and 
persist, it is because they belong to the act that is going 
on. If, for example, property is a social object in the ex- 
perience of men, as distinguished from the nut which the 
squirrel stores, it is because features of the food that one 
buys innervate the whole complex of responses by which 
property is not only acquired, but respected and protected, 
and this complex so innervated is an essential part of the 
act by which the man buys and stores his food. The point 
is not that buying food is a more complicated affair than 
picking it up from the ground, but that exchange is an act 
in which a man excites himself to give by making an offer. 
An offer is what it is because the presentation is a stimulus 
to give. One cannot exchange otherwise than by putting 
one's self in the attitude of the other party to the bargain. 
Property becomes a tangible object, because all essential 
phases of property appear in the actions of all those involved 



184 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

in exchange, and appear as essential features of the individ- 
ual's action. 

The individual in such an act is a self. If the cortex has 
become an organ of social conduct, and has made possible 
the appearance of social objects, it is because the individual 
has become a self, that is, an individual who organizes his 
own response by the tendencies on the part of others to 
respond to his act. He can do this because the mechanism 
of the vertebrate brain enables the individual to take these 
different attitudes in the formation of the act. But selves 
have appeared late in vertebrate evolution. The structure 
of the central nervous system is too minute to enable us 
to show the corresponding structural changes in the paths 
of the brain. It is only in the behavior of the human animal 
that we can trace this evolution. It has been customary 
to mark this stage in development by endowing man with 
a mind, or at least with a certain sort of mind. As long as 
consciousness is regarded as a sort of spiritual stuff out of 
which are fashioned sensations and affections and images 
and ideas or significances, a mind as a locus of these entities 
is an almost necessary assumption, but when these contents 
have been returned to things, the necessity of quarters for 
this furniture has disappeared also. 

It lies beyond the bounds of this paper to follow out the 
implications of this shift for logic and epistemology, but 
there is one phase of all so-called mental processes which is 
central to this discussion, and that is self-consciousness. If 
the suggestions which I have made above should prove 
tenable, the self that is central to all so-called mental ex- 
perience has appeared only in the social conduct of human 
vertebrates. It is just because the individual finds himself 
taking the attitudes of the others who are involved in his 
conduct that he becomes an object for himself. It is only 
by taking the roles of others that we have been able to 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 185 

come back to ourselves. We have seen above that the social 
object can exist for the individual only if the various parts 
of the whole social act carried out by other members of the 
society are in some fashion present in the conduct of the 
individual. It is further true that the self can exist for 
the individual only if he assumes the roles of the others. 
The presence in the conduct of the individual of the tend- 
encies to act as others act may be, then, responsible for 
the appearance in the experience of the individual of a social 
object, i.e., an object answering to complex reactions of a 
number of individuals, and also for the appearance of the 
self. Indeed, these two appearances are correlative. Prop- 
erty can appear as an object only in so far as the individual 
stimulates himself to buy by a prospective offer to sell. 
Buying and selling are involved in each other. Something 
that can be exchanged can exist in the experience of the 
individual only in so far as he has in his own make-up 
the tendency to sell when he has also the tendency to buy. 
And he becomes a self in his experience only in so far as 
one attitude on his own part calls out the corresponding 
attitude in the social undertaking. 

This is just what we imply in "self-consciousness." We 
appear as selves in our conduct in so far as we ourselves 
take the attitude that others take toward us, in these cor- 
relative activities. Perhaps as good an illustration of this 
as can be found is in a "right." Over against the protection 
of our lives or property, we assume the attitude of assent 
of all members in the community. We take the role of 
what may be called the "generalized other." And in doing 
this we appear as social objects, as selves. It is interesting 
to note that in the development of the individual child, 
there are two stages which present the two essential steps 
in attaining self-consciousness. The first stage is that of 
play, and the second that of the game, where these two are 



186 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

distinguished from each other. In play in this sense, the 
child is continually acting as a parent, a teacher, a preacher, 
a grocery man, a policeman, a pirate, or an Indian. It is the 
period of childish existence which Wordsworth has described 
as that of "endless imitation.' 7 It is the period of FroebeFs 
kindergarten plays. In it, as Froebel recognized, the child 
is acquiring the roles of those who belong to his society. 
This takes place because the child is continually exciting 
in himself the responses to his own social acts. In his infant 
dependence upon the responses of others to his own social 
stimuli, he is peculiarly sensitive to this relation. Having 
in his own nature the beginning of the parental response, 
he calls it out by his own appeals. The doll is the universal 
type of this, but before he plays with a doll, he responds 
in tone of voice and in attitude as his parents respond to 
his own cries and chortles. This has been denominated 
imitation, but the psychologist now recognizes that one imi- 
tates only in so far as the so-called imitated act can be 
called out in the individual by his appropriate stimulation. 
That is, one calls or tends to call out in himself the same 
response that he calls out in the other. 

The play antedates the game. For in a game there is a 
regulated procedure, and rules. The child must not only 
take the role of the other, as he does in the play, but he 
must assume the various roles of all the participants in the 
game, and govern his action accordingly. If he plays first 
base, it is as the one to whom the ball will be thrown from 
the field or from the catcher. Their organized reactions to 
him he has imbedded in his own playing of the different 
positions, and this organized reaction becomes what I have 
called the "generalized other" that accompanies and con- 
trols his conduct. And it is this generalized other in his 
experience which provides him with a self. I can only refer 
to the bearing of this childish play attitude upon so-called 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 187 

sympathetic magic. Primitive men call out in their own 
activity some simulacrum of the response which they are 
seeking from the world about. They are children crying 
in the night. 

The mechanism of this implies that the individual who 
is stimulating others to response is at the same time arous- 
ing in himself the tendencies to the same reactions. Now, 
that in a complex social act, which serves as the stimulus 
to another individual to his response is not as a rule fitted 
to call out the tendency to the same response in the in- 
dividual himself. The hostile demeanor of one animal does 
not frighten the animal himself, presumably. Especially in 
the complex social reactions of the ants or termites or the 
bees, the part of the act of one form which does call out 
the appropriate reaction of another can hardly be conceived 
of as arousing a like reaction in the form in question, for 
here the complex social act is dependent upon physiological 
differentiation, such an unlikeness in structure exists that 
the same stimulus could not call out like responses. For 
such a mechanism as has been suggested, it is necessary to 
find first of all some stimulus in the social conduct of the 
members of an authentic group that can call out in the in- 
dividual that is responsible for it, the same response that it 
calls out in the other; and in the second place, the in- 
dividuals in the group must be of such like structure that 
the stimulus will have the same value for one form that 
it has for the other. Such a type of social stimulus is found 
in the vocal gesture in a human society. The term gesture 
I am using to refer to that part of the act or attitude of one 
individual engaged in a social act which serves as the stimu- 
lus to another individual to carry out his part of the whole 
act. Illustrations of gestures, so defined, may be found in 
the attitudes and movements of others to which we respond 
in passing them in a crowd, in the turning of the head toward 



188 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

the glance of another's eye, in the hostile attitude assumed 
over against a threatening gesture, in the thousand and one 
different attitudes which we assume toward different modula- 
tions of the human voice, or in the attitudes and suggestions 
of movements in boxers or fencers, to which responses are 
so nicely adjusted. It is to be noted that the attitudes to 
which I have referred are but stages in the act as they ap- 
pear to others, and include expressions of countenance, posi- 
tions of the body, changes in breathing rhythm, outward 
evidence of circulatory changes, and vocal sounds. In 
general these so-called gestures belong to the beginning of 
the overt act, for the adjustments of others to the social 
process are best made early in the act. Gestures are, then, 
the early stages in the overt social act to which other forms 
involved in the same act respond. Our interest is in finding 
gestures which can affect the individual that is responsible 
for them in the same manner as that in which they affect 
other individuals. The vocal gesture is at least one that 
assails our ears who make it in the same physiological 
fashion as that in which it affects others. We hear our own 
vocal gestures as others hear them. We may see or feel 
movements of our hands as others see or feel them, and 
these sights and feels have served in the place of the vocal 
gestures in the case of those who are congenitally deaf or 
deaf and blind. But it has been the vocal gesture that has 
preeminently provided the medium of social organization 
in human society. It belongs historically to the beginning 
of the act, for it arises out of the change in breathing rhythm 
that accompanies the preparation for sudden action, those 
actions to which other forms must be nicely adjusted. 
(If, then, a vocal gesture arouses in the individual who 
makes it a tendency to the same response that it arouses 
in another, and this beginning of an act of the other in him- 
self enters into his experience, he will find himself tending 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 189 

to act toward himself as the other acts toward him. In our 
self-conscious experience we understand what he does of 
says. }The possibility of this entering into his experience 
we have found in the cortex of the human brain. There 
the coordinations answering to an indefinite number of acts 
may be excited, and while holding each other in check enter 
into the neural process of adjustment which leads to the 
final overt conduct. If one pronounces and hears himself 
pronounce the word "table," he has aroused in himself the 
organized attitudes of his response to that object, in the 
same fashion as that in which he has aroused it in another. 
We commonly call such an aroused organized attitude an 
idea, and the ideas of what we are saying accompany all of 
our significant speech. If we may trust to the statement 
in one of St. Paul's epistles, some of the saints spoke with 
tongues which had no significance to them. They made 
sounds which called out no response in those that made 
them. The sounds were without meaning. [Where a vocal 
gesture uttered by one individual leads to a certain response 
in another, we may call it a symbol of that act; where it 
arouses in the man who makes it the tendency to the same 
response, we may call it a significant symbol. These or- 
ganized attitudes which we arouse in ourselves when we 
talk to others are, then, the ideas which we say are in our 
minds, and in so far as they arouse the same attitudes in 
others, they are in their minds, in so far as they are self- 
conscious in the sense in which I have used that term. But 
it is not necessary that we should talk to another to have 
these ideas. We can talk to ourselves, and this we do in 
the inner forum of what we call thought. We are in pos- 
session of selves just in so far as we can and do take the 
attitudes of others toward ourselves and respond to those 
attitudes. We approve of ourselves and condemn ourselves. 
We pat ourselves upon the back and in blind fury attack 



190 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

ourselves. We assume the generalized attitude of the group, 
in the censor that stands at the door of our imagery and 
inner conversations, and in the affirmation of the laws and 
axioms of the universe of discourse. Quod semper, quod 
ubique. Our thinking is an inner conversation in which we 
may be taking the roles of specific acquaintances over 
against ourselves, but usually it is with what I have termed 
the "generalized other" that we converse, and so attain to 
the levels of abstract thinking, and that impersonality, that 
so-called objectivity that we cherish. In this fashion, I 
conceive, have selves arisen in human behavior and with 
the selves their minds. It is an interesting study, that of 
the manner in which the self and its mind arises in every 
child, and the indications of the corresponding manner in 
which it arose in primitive man. I cannot enter into a dis- 
cussion of this. I do wish, however, to refer to some of 
the implications of this conception of the self for the theory 
of social control. 

I wish to recur to the position, taken earlier in this paper, 
that, if we recognize that experience is a process continually 
passing into the future, objects exist in nature as the pat- 
terns of our actions. If we reduce the world to a fictitious 
instantaneous present, all objects fall to pieces. There 
is no reason to be found, except in an equally fictitious 
mind, why any lines should be drawn about any group of 
physical particles, constituting them objects. However, no 
such knife-edge present exists. Even in the so-called 
specious present there is a passage, in which there is suc- 
cession, and both past and future are there, and the present 
is only that section in which, from the standpoint of action, 
both are involved. When we take this passage of nature 
seriously, we see that the object of perception is the existent 
future of the act. The food is what the animal will eat, and 
his refuge is the burrow where he will escape from his 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 191 

pursuer. Of course the future is, as future, contingent. He 
may not escape, but in nature it exists there as the counter- 
part of his act. So far as there are fixed relations there, 
they are of the past, and the object involves both, but 
the form that it has arises from the ongoing act. Evolu- 
tionary biology, in so far as it is not mere physics and 
chemistry, proceeds perhaps unwittingly upon this assump- 
tion, and so does social science in so far as it is not static. 
Its objects are in terms of the habitat, the environment. 
They are fashioned by reactions. I am merely affirming 
the existence of these objects, affirming them as existent 
in a passing universe answering to acts. 

In so far as there are social acts, there are social objects, 
and I take it that social control is bringing the act of the 
individual into relation with this social object. With the 
control of the object over the act, we are abundantly 
familiar. Just because the object is the form of the act, 
in this character it controls the expression of the act. The 
vision of the distant object is not only the stimulus to move- 
ment toward it. It is also, in its changing distance values, 
a continual control of the act of approach. The contours 
of the object determine the organization of the act in its 
seizure, but in this case the whole act is in the individual 
and the object is in his field of experience. Barring a break- 
down in the structure or function, the very existence of the 
object insures its control of the act. In the social act, how- 
ever, the act is distributed among a number of individuals. 
While there is or may be an object answering to each part 
of the act, existing in the experience of each individual, in 
the case of societies dependent upon physiological differen- 
tiation the whole object does not exist in the experience of 
any individual. The control may be exercised through the 
survival of those physiological differentiations that still carry 
out the life-process involved in the complex act. No com- 



192 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

plication of the act which did not mediate this could survive. 
Or we may take refuge in a controlling factor in the act, 
as does Bergson, but this is not the situation that interests 
us. The human societies in which we are interested are 
societies of selves. The human individual is a self only in 
so far as he takes the attitude of another toward himself. 
In so far as this attitude is that of a number of others, and 
in so far as he can assume the organized attitudes of a num- 
ber that are cooperating in a common activity, he takes the 
attitudes of the group toward himself, and in taking this or 
these attitudes he is defining the object of the group, that 
which defines and controls the response. Social control, 
then, will depend upon the degree to which the individual 
does assume the attitudes of those in the group who are 
involved with him in his social activities. In the illustra- 
tion already used, the man who buys controls his purchase 
from the standpoint of a value in the object that exists for 
him only in so far as he takes the attitude of a seller as well 
as a buyer. Value exists as an object only for individuals 
within whose acts in exchange are present those attitudes 
which belong to the acts of the others who are essential to 
the exchange. 

The act of exchange becomes very complicated; the degree 
to which all the essential acts involved in it enter into the 
acts of all those engaged therein varies enormously, and 
the control which the object, i.e., the value, exercises over 
the acts varies proportionately. The Marxian theory of 
state ownership of capital, i.e., of exclusive state production, 
is a striking illustration of the breakdown of such control. 
The social object, successful economic production, as pre- 
sented in this theory, fails to assume the attitudes of in- 
dividual initiative which successful economic production 
implies. Democratic government, on the theory of action 
through universal interest in the issues of a campaign, breaks 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 193 

down as a control, and surrenders the government largely 
to the political machine, whose object more nearly answers 
to the attitudes of the voters and the non-voters. 

Social control depends, then, upon the degree to which 
the individuals in society are able to assume the attitudes 
of the others who are involved with them in common en- 
deavor. For the social object will always answer to the 
act developing itself in self-consciousness. Besides property, 
all of the institutions are such objects, and serve to control 
individuals who find in them the organization of their own 
social responses. 

The individual does not, of course, assume the attitudes 
of the numberless others who are in one way or another im- 
plicated in his social conduct, except in so far as the atti- 
tudes of others are uniform under like circumstances. One 
assumes, as I have said, the attitudes of generalized others. 
But even with this advantage of the universal over the 
multiplicity of its numberless instances, the number of dif- 
ferent responses that enter into our social conduct seems 
to defy any capacity of any individual to assume the roles 
which would be essential to define our social objects. And 
yet, though modern life has become indefinitely more com- 
plex than it was in earlier periods of human history, it is 
far easier for the modern man than for his predecessor to 
put himself in the place of those who contribute to his neces- 
sities, who share with him the functions of government, or 
join with him in determining prices. It is not the number 
of participants, or even the number of different functions, 
that is of primary importance. The important question is 
whether these various forms of activities belong so naturally 
to the member of a human society that, in taking the role 
of another, his activities are found to belong to one's own 
nature. As long as the complexities of human society do 
not exceed those of the central nervous system, the problem 



194 THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE PRESENT 

of an adequate social object, which is identical with that 
of an adequate self-consciousness, is not that of becoming 
acquainted with the indefinite number of acts that are in- 
volved in social behavior, but that of so overcoming the 
distances in space and time, and the barriers of language 
and convention and social status, that we can converse with 
ourselves in the roles of those who are involved with us in 
the common undertaking of life. A journalism that is in- 
satiably curious about the human attitudes of all of us is 
the sign of the times. The other curiosities as to the condi- 
tions under which other people live, and work, and fight 
each other, and love each other, follow from the fundamental 
curiosity which is the passion of self-consciousness. We 
must be others if we are to be ourselves. The modern realis- 
tic novel has done more than technical education in fashion- 
ing the social object that spells social control. If we can 
bring people together so that they can enter into each other's 
lives, they will inevitably have a common object, which will 
control their common conduct. 

The task, however, is enormous enough, for it involves 
not simply breaking down passive barriers such as those of 
distance in space and time and vernacular, but those fixed 
attitudes of custom and status in which our selves are 
imbedded. Any self is a social self, but it is restricted to 
the group whose roles it assumes, and it will never abandon 
this self until it finds itself entering into the larger society 
and maintaining itself there. The whole history of warfare 
between societies and within societies shows how much more 
readily and with how much greater emotional thrill we 
realize our selves in opposition to common enemies than in 
collaboration with them. All over Europe, and more specif- 
ically at Geneva, we see nationals with great distrust and 
constant rebounds trying to put themselves in each other's 
places and still preserve the selves that have existed upon 



THE GENESIS OF THE SELF 195 

enmities, that they may reach the common ground where 
they may avoid the horror of war, and meliorate unendurable 
economic conditions. A Dawes Plan is such a social object, 
coming painfully into existence, that may control the con- 
flicting interests of hostile communities, but only if each can 
in some degree put himself in the other's place in operating 
it. The World Court and the League of Nations are other 
such social objects that sketch out common plans of action 
if there are national selves that can realize themselves in 
the collaborating attitudes of others. 



INDEX 



ABSOLUTE Idealism, 161. 
Alexander, S., 43, 44, 177. 
Aristotle, 8, 35, 38, 89, 102, 103. 
Augustine, 89. 

gACON, F., 104. 

Bergson, H., 21, 22, 26, 161, 163- 

164, 179, 180, 192. 
Berkeley, 107, 134. 
Bohr, G., 94. 
Bohr atom, 61, 153. 
Brahe, T., 114. 
Bridgman, P. W., 147, 150. 
Broglie, L. de, 13, 17, 141. 

(CAUSATION, defined, 33. 

Cerebrum, mechanism of arousing 
response to physical thing in 
the organism, 126-133, 135-139, 
182-184. 

Cognition, as reconstructive, 3, 18, 
22, 107-118, 140; differentiated 
from consciousness, 4-5 ; belongs 
only to selves, 178, 184. 

Communication, conveyance of 
meaning, 83, 86, 87. 

Consciousness, as meaning and 
ideation, 4, 68-90; of the self, 
184-190, 192-195. 

)AWES plan, 195. 

Democritus, 38, 103. 

Descartes, 98, 102, 103, 120, 138. 

Dewey, J., 18, 115. 

Du Bois-Reymond, E., 152. 

Durations, as sliding presents, 28. 

gDDINGTON, A. S., 3, 10, 46, 

55, 57, 94. 
Einstein, A., 21, 26, 40, 41, 51, 



54, 56, 58, 64, 78, 82, 93, 94, 
100, 104, 109, 110, 113, 157. 

Emergence, does not follow from 
the past, 2 ; in Whitehead's phi- 
losophy, 10; in the present, 11; 
task of philosophy, 14, 42; as 
incompletely determined, 15- 
16; as conditioning the past, 18- 
19, 23; as conferring characters 
on the world, 35-36, 47, 50, r>5- 
67; defined, 69. 

Empathy, 137. 

Energy, essential feature of the 
doctrine, 34; as nature of the 
physical thing, 146-147; see 
"Relativity, doctrine of." 

Environment, relation to the or- 
ganism, 4, 35-36, 42, 128, 165- 
195. 

Epistemology, problem of, 68; of 
the scientist, 93, 95-96, 98-106, 
140, 151; relation to perceptual 
experience, 107 r lll, 140-160; 
and experience, 115. 

Euclidean Geometry, 142. 

Euclidean space, 60, 149, 152, 159. 

Event, defined, 21; uniqueness of 
the, 33; distinguished from 
things, 36, 144; exhaustive ac- 
count of impossible, 38; can- 
not be a perceptual object, 111. 

Evolution, general term covering 
emergence, 50; see "Emer- 
gence." 

FARADAY, M., 59. 
Fitzgerald contraction, 54. 
Froebel, 186. 

Future, denied existence, 1; see 
"Past," and "Present." 



197 



198 



INDEX 



QALILEAN dynamics, SO. 
Gaussian coordinates, 158. 
General theory of relativity, 64, 

157, 158, 160; see "Relativity, 

doctrine of." 

fJUME, 14, 134. 

JDEA, nature of, 87; see "Con- 

sciousness, as meaning and idea- 

tion." 
Induction, basis of rationality in 

the universe, 11-12. 
Inference, operation in reflection, 

68. 

JAMES, Wm., 161. 
Jeans, J, 3, 12, 21, 46. 

JANT, 12, 14, 52, 134. 
Kantian hypothesis, 46. 
Kelvin, 109, 153. 
Kinaesthetic imagery, 137. 

LAPLACEAN hypothesis, 46. 

Larmor, 45, 55, 109, 155. 

League of Nations, 195. 

Leibniz, 164. 

Lipps, T., 123. 

Locke, 126, 130, 134. 

Lorentz, H. A., 40, 45, 54, 55, 58, 

104, 109, 155. 
Lovejoy, A. 0., 149. 



, E., 94. 

Marxian social theory, 192. 
Matter, as the nature of things, 

122; see "Physical thing." 
Maxwell, J. C., 40, 45, 55, 56, 

57, 109, 143, 155, 156. 
Memory, refers to the condition- 

ing phase of the passing present, 

28-31. 
Meyerson, E., 23, 102. 



Michelson-Morley experiment, 40, 
55, 56, 97, 104, 143, 156. 

Millikan, R. A., 106, 153. 

Mind, locus of past and future, 
24; field of, 25, 80-81, 82; a 
natural development, 84-85, 
172-173; belongs only to selves, 
178, 184. 

Minkowski, H., 94. 

Minkowski space-time, 2, 9, 13, 
58, 78, 82, 98, 113, 145, 153, 
155, 162. 

Morgan, L., 43. 

NEWTON, 26, 41, 45, 65, 110, 

123, 133, 137. 
Newtonian world, 37, 40, 41, 42, 

46, 53, 55, 62, 64, 93, 98, 103, 

104, 109, 113, 120, 123, 138, 

147, 148, 150, 152, 159. 

ORGANISM, relation to the en- 
vironment, 24-25, 33, 36, 68- 
90, 107-118, 128, 165-195; as 
process, 34, 38, 65; as social, 
49, 165, 178; as physical thing, 
119-120, 138. 

Ostwald, W., 43, 147. 

pARMENIDEAN Reality, 1, 
38, 98, 102. 

Passage, a temporal progress, 13- 
14; conditioning events, 16-19, 
33,77,79,85,88,96,97; an ab- 
straction, 21, 23; see "Present." 

Past, denied existence, 1; revo- 
cable and irrevocable, 2-3, 13, 
16, 26, 30; as viewed by the 
historian, 3, 8; in relation to 
the organism, 5-9, 88; as re- 
interpretation in present, 10, 12, 
22, 27, 29, 76; conditioned by 
and conditioning the emergent, 



INDEX 



199 



15, 17-19, 25, 64; producing 
reality, 26; in memory, 28-31; 
how inadequate, 31; function 
in experience, 48. 

Physical thing, perception of, 120, 
141-160, 169-170; how related 
to the organism, 121-133; pri- 
mary and secondary qualities of, 
133, 137; as resistant to the 
organism, 134-139; as social, 
169. 

Planck, M., 17, 94. 

Plato, 89, 104, 164. 

Poincare, H., 146. 

Prepotent responses, 127-130. 

Present, as becoming and disap- 
pearing, 1, 28; as conceived by 
the scientist, 9, 11; referent to 
the emergent, 23; temporal 
spread, 23-24, 90; as containing 
all implications and values which 
lie beyond it, 25, 27-28, 32, 36, 
173-174, 190; social nature of, 
47, 63; social character of, as 
a standpoint, 51, 52. 

Probability, 33. 

Ptolemaic system, 171. 

QUANTA, 100, 104, 106. 

REALITY, exists in a present, 1 ; 
transcends the present, 11; ref- 
erence reversed, 60. 

Relativity, paradoxes of, 12; ex- 
pressed in organisms, 38; doc- 
trine of, 39-46, 50-51, 52-67, 
78, 79, 93, 95, 98-100, 104, 144- 
146, 153, 156-157. 

Riemannian Geometry, 157, 158. 



Rousseau, 52. 
Russell, B., 82, 135. 
Rutherford, E., 94, 106, 153. 

gCHROEDER, 17, 94. 

Science, physical vs. biological, 
35; theories of, dependent upon 
perceptual findings, 61. 

Social, nature of the present, 47, 
63; organism as, 49; nature of 
the present as a standpoint, 51, 
52; nature of thought, 62-63; 
science as a perspective, 165- 
195; act defined, 180-182. 

Sommerfeld, A., 94. 

Space-time, see "Minkowski space- 
time." 

Special principle of relativity, 64, 
157, 160. 

Spinoza, 164. 

St. Paul, 89, 189. 

CENSOR Mathematics, 158. 

Time, as passage without becom- 
ing, 19; relation to passage, 20; 
see "Relativity, doctrine of" 
and "Minkowski space-time." 

Truth, test of, 68. 

yiTAL force, 35. 
Visual experience, "reality" of, 
106-118, 120. 

\YEYL, H., 21, 94. 

Whitehead, A. N., 1, 10, 12, 19, 
20, 23, 43, 49, 56, 78, 93, 94, 
98, 100, 121, 143, 148, 149, 156, 
162-164, 171. 

Wordsworth, 186. 

World Court, 195. 



